Excellent product! I really appreciate the option to choose any of the 50 given mystery cases to solve. After playing all 50, you can just start all over again! Fun, fun, fun game! THANKS</review_text>
Very nicely done.  Brought it for my grand-daughter who is 5yrs old and it is sturdy and has room to gro</review_text>
My kids love this game.  They sit down together and play this game all of the time.  The neighbor kids come over to our house because they love to play board games and SORRY is the one they choose the most.  We do not have video games at our house, and this was considered a drawback to the neighbor kids until my kids introduced them to board games.  Now they come over all of the time just to play board games.  I say hide the video games and let the kids interact with each other playing board games.Sorry is top game in our house</review_text>
I bought this kitchen for my 18 mos. old and she really enjoys cooking and working in it.  It is a nice, compact size that doesn't take up too much space.  She can work at all the different stations and not get frustrated.  Another bonus for me was that it came fully assembled and ready to use straight out of the box.  My only complaint would be that the doors are somewhat difficult for my daugter to open, but I know as she gets older, it will become easier.  I would definitely recommend this kitchen to anyone who in interested in purchasing one for their child</review_text>
This kitchen is not the first one I've purchased. I am more happy with this one than the other two I have purchased. It has plenty of storage space for all the food and gives the child more doors to open and be more creative. I am very happy with this kitchen, it's durable and a good buy</review_text>
Very pleased with this purchase... My 2 yr. old daughter loves playing with her new kitchen!  The kitchen came fully assembled and all plastic parts are very sturdy.  The telephone is fun - and is actually my daughter's favorite part of the whole kitchen!  I know of 4 other friends who have this same kitchen - and all are pleased with their purchase</review_text>
My kids grew up overseas and are quite familiar with Renaissance paintings. They've seen many of these paintings and are very familiar with them. I realize this is not the typical situation.I was disappointed that the game is basically a game of luck. It is not challenging or reinforcing of our kid's knowledge. I had hoped for a game like "Famous Authors" which builds on and tests the level of knowledge of the players.Nonetheless, the game is well presented. It's on the expensive side, but the book alone is worth half the price. Looking for a fancy gift with cultural overtones? I recommend this</review_text>
I received this game as a gift and it really is a great! The book that comes with it would have been a perfect 'Cliff Notes' for the Art History classes I had in school.  My eight-year-old daughter won the first game we played and I'm re-learning lots of stuff I had forgotten. Highly recommended</review_text>
My 16 month old loves her new groceries.  The produce &amp;amp; sandwich parts are plastic &amp;amp; each piece has a wonderful texture. The canned goods are very interesting to read.  They are actually labeled by a supermarket in the UK, so they are a bit different from the groceries you would find in the US.  I put the cardboard frozen food items away until she is older. She has been entertained at length because each piece is so intricate.  This was a great purchase.</review_text>
This toy looks very appealing. I purchased this for my son, 16 months at the time thinking it would be a great toy to stash in the kitchen cupboard so he could play while I cooked cleaned etc. He played with it about 4 times total and he's 2 now! It doesn't do enough and does have much other than a shape sorter. I consider it wasted money but if my experience helps anyone I'm glad</review_text>
Wonderful product. We bought this as a gift for my son's 7th birthday as a fun incentive to get him a little writing and spelling practice.  He loved to make his own books at home with computer paper and the stapler, so a real book was a huge hit.  He thought this was great because it is a real bound book with his own words and pictures.  His book will be a cherished keepsake and I'm sure it will be great fun to look at when he is grown</review_text>
I can't say enough about Illustory!  My daughter is 6 and in Kindergarten and loved to make stories on paper stapled together. So, Santa brought her an Illustory kit and we did it together as she can't write many of the words yet.  So, she drew all the pictures and told me what she wanted to story to say.  We got our book in the mail yesterday, and she was so thrilled to see her story bound like a real book!  The quality was great, and it even had the dedicaton page and an "about the author" page with her picture (which I provided).  We even ordered an extra copy for grandma with a dedication to her!  I highly reccomend this kit</review_text>
An unexciting piece. Of value only to the completist collector (like myself). There's nothing wrong with it, it's just that there's nothing "great" about it either. The lauching projectiles are unnecessary for a "holographic" figure. Hasbro could has done better by choosing another "host" sculpt to base this exclusive off of. The "Phantom Menace" version was much better</review_text>
Excellent product! I really appreciate the option to choose any of the 50 given mystery cases to solve. After playing all 50, you can just start all over again! Fun, fun, fun game! THANKS</review_text>
I bought this for my 5 year old son for Christmas.  Not only did he think it was great but also his 7 and 9 year old sisters.  There are so many games that there was something for all of them. We took the toy with us to Grandma's and even the older cousins found it very fun and entertaining.I really like that they can play all the games in Spanish too.  Once they have got the hang of a game in English they can do it in Spanish and it helps increase their vocabulary.  I was a little nervous if it would be worth the $50 because I had seen the barbie laptops and some others at radio shack. This one seemed like the best choice and was hoping this would be worth it.  In my opinion it is much better than the others we tried in the store and I would definately recommend it</review_text>
Just purchased this for my 7 year old son that has cerebral palsey- He only has use of his right hand- this cartridge is perfect- game does not allow mistakes and can play this cartridge with only one hand and not both. Since my son has use of only one hand he has trouble playing the other vsmile games- he's hooked. Is very engaging also where some of the other games fall short</review_text>
This is really fun for adults.  We get together once a month and we really enjoy the company, the food and the spirits.  This was meant for adults to solicize not for children.  I am sure they might learn somehting at another gathering.  I have really enjoyed Bunco.</review_text>
We have enthusiastically played Candy Land with each of our three kids.  It is easily the best starting point for introducing a child to board games.  Players take turns drawing from a deck and moving their pieces around the board.  The cards have one or two squares of a particular color (such as red, green, yellow, etc.) and players move pieces ahead on the path to the next matching spot of the same color.  No counting or reading is required.  There are also special cards that can move a player ahead or behind, and they are indicated by  picture of the spot on the board to which the player should move their piece.  Play continues until one player reaches the end.Some of my observations:1) Most kids can probably start playing and enjoying this game before the recommended 36 months of age.  If you have a child with the attention span and the desire to sit down for a 10-15 minute game, I'm pretty confident they could enjoy it.2) Among the lessons our kids learned from CandyLand: taking turns, recognizing colors, and dealing with disappointment.   Luckily, the games are quick enough that it is usually possible to play multiple games in one seting.  This makes it possible to keep playing until each child has had at least one win.  (Very helpful for managing little egos)3) For such a simple game, it manages to perfectly balance the possibility of changes in fortune without seeming arbitrary.  The game is literally in doubt until the last card is played (one of the "special" cards might send a player back to near the start).  This is great for teaching that most valuable of lessons: "NEVER give up".4) With most simple games, it is almost impossible to get older kids to play after they reach a certin age.  We have not found that to be as true with Candy Land.  We've had games with an adult and kids ages 3, 6, and 9 playing together and having fun.  If you have more than one kid, you know how hard this can be.As a parent of three, I give this game my highest recommendation</review_text>
I bought this for my three year old godson last Thanksgiving, and he loved it.  The pieces are bright, sturdy, and easy to grasp with tiny hands.  I've purchased several Melissa and Doug products, and I've never been disappointed</review_text>
My son love this toy.  It also reenforces this shapes and colors.  it's a stepping stone for geometric patterns</review_text>
This toy is so much fun! I play with it every day with my sister & brother. Altogether we have about 50 LPS. I have the most</review_text>
Both girls, ages 4 and 2 loved this</review_text>
This game has no board therefore no time is wasted trying to move from one room to another to make accusations. The luck in this game depends on which sleuth cards you draw rather than rolls of the dice. Strategy is the same as the original game only game play moves more quickly with one being able to gather information on nearly every turn they have. Sometimes you can actually eliminate more than one item on your list during your turn. All in all, this is a fun game that you can play over and over again in an evening with out getting bored with it</review_text>
I always thought Clue looked like a complicated game I'd never touch!  That is until I played it at my friends house!  Now I'm a Clue fanatic trying to collect all the versions!  This game can never get old because it's a different outcome every time!  I strongly reccomend it to anyone 8 and older</review_text>
This is an extremely fun and addictive game. You shuffle the cards, and place three (room, weapon, person) in the secret envelope. In every room you go into, you can make accusations. If someone has the card you accused (like the room), then they show it to you and you write it down on your notepad. The game changes constantly, so it never gets boring. The character pieces have teeny details, like Mr. Green has straps and buckles on his briefcase. I gave it 4 stars for education because it teaches you to focus and really THINK. Oh, and good problem-solving skills too. And coordination (you have to add all the clues up to see who did it). All in all, a terrific game. Great for rainy days or playdates. And did I mention the weapons? Very realistic. And cute</review_text>
This little motorcycle is cute.  However, it's very lightweight and is similar in quality to a ride-on toy that could be purchased for much less at any discount retailer.  The stickers do seem to be of high quality and to date, none have peeled off.  The extreme shipping price added another $10 to the $19.99 price tag.  This is definately not a $30 toy.</review_text>
I-Dog is so fun to use!  All you have to do is plug the included cable into your digital player's headphone port and I-Dog will play your music through a tiny internal speaker.  I-Dog's face will light up with various patterns and colored lights depending on what type of music you play.  His tail serves as a mute button, but be careful because he doesn't like you touching too often!  I-Dog will get sad if you don't give him any music to listen to.  If you don't have a digital player, you can set I-dog by your boombox or other music device and he can "hear" that way.  There are only two reasons why I didn't give I-Dog 5 stars:  (1) The internal speaker isn't very loud, so you have to have your music player turned up quite high, and (2) the battery cover on I-Dog's back leg is really hard to get off.  You will definitely need some kind of tiny screwdriver to get it off</review_text>
My 3 year old is very interested in space and LOVES this toy. Having said that one has to make sure that her child plays carefully with it----the payload doors don't really close, the robotic arm is a bit hard to use and the satellite dish on the truck is difficult to put back on. Meets the need for a realistic shuttle, though</review_text>
This is a must have for your little sweetheart! My daughter carries this purse around with her everywhere that she goes. It's quit interesting finding what she has placed in her purse next ;)The accessories are cute, but she'd rather use stuff from Mommy's purse. ;) The purse is oh so cute too, and durable. My daughter is 21 months old, she received this on Christmas and has been a favorite since.</review_text>
This shopping cart is the perfect height for my daughter.  My two boys even love to use it to cart around their cars and blocks!  Highly recommended</review_text>
The concept is more or less the same as the standard monopoly. The product is good and is worth the price. Its nice to have the family members sit toghther and Njoy</review_text>
This toy is a wonderful first toy. It captures their attention and has all kinds of handles for them to grab when they're ready! I absolutely love it, and so does my son</review_text>
Purchased the Batman Laptop Computer at Target for Christmas for my grandson who is not quite 5 years old.  He was totally drawn in because it is Batman....but the games kept his interest. The entire family enjoyed trying the different games. Dad, a musician, enjoyed the music game. Graphics are super... I love the way Batman gives his approval with a thumbs up when you get the answer right....and the cool light inside that allows you to adjust from green to red. Grandma played in the dark with grandson for fun even. Worth the $38.99 I paid at Target on sale for sure.</review_text>
Just wanted to let others know this info that I found out after reading the tip given by the reviewer about getting the table for a lot cheaper at Costco ...I called Costco and they carried the KIDKRAFT art table with two stools back in January of 2006, and will no longer be carrying it.  You can find it at Walmart for $66 plus shipping, just check the website.  The table is not the same however -- the dimensions are different, the sides of the tables is slightly different (on one side of the Kidcraft table has two cups and a mesh basket in between the two cups, and the other side has a space where little legos can snap onto).  The stools are also tiny compared to the ones that come with this table. Overall it looks a little less substantial, but since I haven't seen it in person, I really can't give my opinion.Hope that helps someone</review_text>
My daughter is 2 1/2 and she loves Dora.  She loves playing with Dora and the babies</review_text>
My seven month old thinks the pots and pans are the best thing ever, and I'd definitely rather he bang on the plastic ones than real ones. But I have to say that the songs are a little irritating and I find them running through my head when I'm trying to sleep</review_text>
I bought this set for my son who loves to draw and paint.  He absolutely loved this set.  The colors are wonderful and the different types of pens, paints and crayons make drawing alot more fun for him.  The case is sturdy and great so he doesn't lose anything.  The price can't be better for everything you get.</review_text>
I am so glad I bought this puzzle for my 3 year old! The pieces have the most beautiful pictures on them and the larger sized pieces are just right for toddler hands. This is one of those toys that you'll want to keep forever</review_text>
It is really expensive for what it is.  I have to say my children love it, esspecially since we can put it in the middle of the table and everyone can take what they need from it.  I love that when we are done you can put everything back and stick it on a shelf.  However, for the supplies you get it IS expensive.  The tote itself is nice but not worth more than $5, add the supplies to it, maybe I could see spending $10.  However, if you catch it on sale I would pick up a few, they make great gifts</review_text>
I BOUGHT THIS FOR MY 3 YEAR OLD DAUGHTER. SHE LOVED IT IN THE STORE AND I THOUGHT IT WAS CUTE. I ALSO AGREE WITH THE OTHER REVIEWERS THAT THERE SHOULD BE INSTRUCTIONS FOR THE STICKERS, BUT YOU DON'T NEED TO BE A GENIOUS TO FIGURE OUT WHERE THEY GO. I CHOSE TO NOT SHAROEN THE PENCIL BECAUSE SHE IS 3 AND I DIDN'T THINK IT WAS NECESSARY. FOR TWENTY DOLLARS IT IS A GOOD BUY. I KNOW MY DAUGHTER LOVES IT AND IS HAVING A LOT OF FUN WITH IT</review_text>
Very interesting spoof of the original game.  I found the first one boring after a few plays, but this one still interests my kids and I after 10+ plays.  It's a bit convoluted to put it together initially, but well worth it</review_text>
I always thought Clue looked like a complicated game I'd never touch!  That is until I played it at my friends house!  Now I'm a Clue fanatic trying to collect all the versions!  This game can never get old because it's a different outcome every time!  I strongly reccomend it to anyone 8 and older</review_text>
Every child should have a chance to play this game at least once in their lifetime. The characters on the game board are so awesome too. Queen Frosting (that was her name... right?) is so pretty, she was always my favorite character. All in all, it's a great game and a great gift for nearly any child</review_text>
We had so much fun with this game. There are truth or dares and all sorts of fun questions! I definatly recommend this game if you are having a party or even just a few people who want to have a good time! Totally worth buying this one</review_text>
I agree with the other reviewer that this is more like a shape sorter than a kitchen. My daughter loved it when she was 1. Now she's turned 2 and she's lost interest in it, like many other "baby toys". I had to get her a larger and more realistic toy kitchen so she can "cook" with it</review_text>
This was a great buy from Amazons sale rack at five dollars and 29 cents plus free shipping.  My [...] just loves puzzles and we are certainly fond of Melissa and Doug products.  We normally purchase them from Tuesday Morning or our local hobby store because they are usually cheaper.This puzzle has made my toddler happy.  He fits it together then dumps it, repeating the process several times a day.  The drawing is realistic and there are no pegs, so it gives a little more grown up feel to the piece.</review_text>
I got this message from the recipient's mother:He loves it, really! well-made drawer - shelf design. It's heartwarming when he settles down industriously using his art supplies</review_text>
My 9 year old son just started to understand this game, we bought it when he was 7.  He would get confused on how to call out the other persons ships.  He would say where his ships were.  This game helps kids understand they need to pay attention and coordinate where their ships are.  It depends on how quick your kids pick things up if they would enjoy playing this game.</review_text>
I thought that this would be toy my daughter would grow into and not be excited about at first.  This was the first toy she opened at Christmas at only 19 months and was not interested in any others for the rest of the week!  She enjoyed collecting the fingers and and "counting" them.  She also has grown in the last few months to putting the puzzle together herself although the fingers might not make it on the correct hand just yet. Very durable, love that it is a traditional wood toy that doesn't have flashing lights or needs batteries! She still loves it months later.  The only downside to any toy like this, is we have to collect the pieces after she has put them in various places around the house.</review_text>
My 3 years old son like's it but put's it together in no time. Not so hard</review_text>
This puzzle is a lot of fun and my son loves it. The container is a toy for itself</review_text>
My 28 month old son got this puzzle for Christmas and loves it.  He put it together the first time out of the box himself. It is the first thing he does every morning and then several times a day.  My almost 5 year old likes it too. It is not as sturdy as the Melissa & Doug floor puzzles, but it still really sturdy.</review_text>
A lot of people look at this figure and say 'he has no wings!'.While this is true,I still recommend this toy,an excellant hair sculpt and goku's famous 'I have no idea what's going on, but be happy anyway!'look.The wings  are actually  really cool,although the halo has a job staying on.0verall this is a great toy and a definate purchase for any dbz fan or toy collector</review_text>
My Grandson has truly enjoyed the Easyscore Basketball Set from the first day he tried it.  Wonderful to have the adjustment for heightening as he grows.</review_text>
i got this toy for my nephew and i know he will get alot of good years out of it.</review_text>
This made our 6 year old so happy!Great colors, great markers</review_text>
This set is perfect for a younger child! Having 100 markers to work with is great. I know when I was younger, I loved having little carrying cases for eveything to keep organized...I wish I had had this cute little case when I was 5</review_text>
These dogs are adorable and are a cute addition to the dollhouse set. My daughter sends the other pets outside to play with this set. Plays with them as much as the people. Great addition</review_text>
This deck is amazing the best structure deck out there. I'm a warrior fan so i loved it. its great for begginers just add the e-heroes and its perfect!</review_text>
We got this as an 11th birthday present for one of my daughter's friends.  It was the hit of the birthday party -- all the girls went home with new yarn belts, and my daughter, who can already knit a little, asked if she could have one, too.  The colors of yarn are bright and the texture is easy to work with.  For our purposes, this was a great birthday present</review_text>
This was exactly what I was looking for to complete my little set</review_text>
Bertie is nice.  He has no magnetic pieces so he won't hook to other things.  Nice 16month old tries to use him on the train track which does work but he wasn't really meant for that and can be hard to push on the track</review_text>
My two year old has several of these cars, and the race track. He loves all things Cars, so these were a big hit. All of the Shake and Go Cars talk before they run, which he especially likes. They are VERY easy for a toddler to operate, but his four year old sister enjoys playing with them, too. They don't run for very long per shake, but that doesn't seem to bother him at all</review_text>
This board is of excellent quality and is highly transportable, but a little small for Go players who play avidly. The stones are also small, but they get the job done. Why I bought this board was because I wanted to be able to take it with me, without a huge board dragging me down. This fits what I want almost perfectly. Thanks</review_text>
When my 25 year old daughter sat down to play Wedgits with her younger siblings, she declared that she wanted a set for Christmas.  She thinks it will be a great coffee table game for all her college friends.  My friend got a set for her grandkids but when the family gets together her son and son-in- law monopolize them with their little competitions.  These are wonderful for the imagination, and with Wedgits you will have a toy that adults will enjoy playing with and that makes the children very happy</review_text>
Both my 4 & 2 year olds love the wedgits, my 4 year old however really gets into it.  She loves to try and make what the pictures tell her.  I was surprised at how good she was it.  It really holds her interest</review_text>
This was the best therapy game ever.  My girls bought it for me, a gift because I love board games.  We mostly played it with their friends.   I have played with my children several times and found out some very interesting views that they have about me.  I decided to bring it to a family gathering.  I have always been distant with my eight siblings.  The game started out with the kids and my sisters ect.  then when they saw I was ok with laughing at myself they asked the children to leave and just the sisters played.  We had a total awakening of how we see each other.  We have never been closer, since that game our communication has been wonderful.  This game is the best.  We laughed so hard we ached the next day.  We played till 2:00 a.m.  Our husbands kept calling us asking when we were going be home.  We started our game at 9:00 p.m. and told them we'd just be an hour or two. LOL  I have been instructed to bring the game to this Summers get-together</review_text>
My 2 year old daughter loves these dolls and I like them because you can't remove their clothes or shoes! Very cute and durable dolls</review_text>
My cousin loves these dolls. She loves that she gets to be a "little mommy" to a boy AND girl...that's what i love about this set...plus the dolls are adorable and the only thing I don't like about them is the hats. I wish the hats were...cuter? I don't know but it doesn't matter. I'd buy these dolls for any really little girl. She used to cry when she lost accessories for her other dolls...but at least with these there isn't much to lose</review_text>
It seems that just about every house in our subdivision has an electric ride-on toy. There are few "Barbie" Jeeps, few polaris ATVs, one Corvette and three Gators and few others. My 4 year old daughter was the first Gator owner.I must say, it is expensive.. This thing is by far the most expensive toy my daughter has, bar none. Should you buy your 4 year old $300 ride-on toy? Well... that's up to you.But she loves her gator. She had to give up on lot of other toys to get this one, but she is extremely happy with it. Sometimes I wish I was 40lbs so I can ride this thing. She can't care less about the "barbie" thing, so this green utility machine was fine with her.The gator is slightly faster than others and the fat tires and truck bed makes the gator looks a lot more serious than the Barbie jeep. The truck bed is really useful. Although not recommended, she hauled two kids on the bed. With 4 kids on the car, it still zoomed around the street quite well. One time I loaded nail gun, air compressor, electric drill and jigsaw and panel saw all on the bed and asked my daughter to drive to the other side of the yard to fix the fence. I saw our neighbor hauling few bags of mulch on theirs. It made such a funnt scene.. little electric toys carrying real tools and stuff. Very cute.Enough of fun stuff.Problem 1. Battery location and the hassle to recharge this thing. You have to open the front grill and sometimes the latch can pinch your finger. It hurts.Problem 2. The left front wheel fell off while my daughter was driving it. I tightened it again and never happened.Problem 3. Slipping tires. People complain about the tires having very low friction. They slip very easily on driveway and grass. But this is how it "protects" its gearbox so I don't really care, but I heard they are expensive once they wear out.I think this is the best ride-on toy on the market today. If extra $[...] won't hurt you too much, then do consider the gator. Your children will not be disappointed.</review_text>
We got this toy for my son when he was 2 1/2 years old he is now 4 years old. It still runs like new. He drives it like a champ. We have used it to haul mulch to the back yard and some yard bricks. It never fails us and he think he is a big helper which he is. I am thinking of buying a 2nd one for my younger son now.</review_text>
The doll looks nothing like the Aidan in the movie.  Actually, his face is kind of funny looking.  The movie Aidan is cuter.  The doll could definitely have been made better</review_text>
My son got these blocks when he was 2 for christmas.  he is now 4 and 1/2 and still playing with them.  It seems no matter what new toy he has gotten, every morning I hear him carrying out his bucket of these megabloks.  I only wish they came is a larger quantity.</review_text>
I ought this for my daughter for her 1st birthday.  She loves the bead maze at the top and she goes round and round the cube exploring all the different sides!So as the title would suggest, the stickers on the cog wheels are starting to come off (after 1 week).  This doesnt affect the functionality of the toy, just the aesthetics.  If you are not bothered by some bare cogwheels this is still a great toy!It stands 2 feet tall to the top of the maze and is the perfect height for little ones.  The other 3 sides are: ABC with pictures rotating blocks, Abacus, Sliding plastic pegs.  The only side with stickers is the cog wheels so no worries about other sides losing stickers.If they had made the cog wheels out of wood or had the design painted or imprinted into the plastic this toy would be a 10</review_text>
The checkbook package was opened.  No pieces were missing.  But It was hard to glue the plastic to the cardboard to give it as a Christmas gift</review_text>
I bought this for my grandson, and he no sooner got it out of the box (with help), and he was outside in the sand with it, having a great time.  Cannot lose with these oversized trucks for little hands.  It is a good purchase</review_text>
My son, who is 3, loves dinosaurs and everything green.  This toy was perfect.  The dinosaur comes in Green and Red. I bought green for my son and gave the red one to his cousin.  They have dino wars.  This dinosaur moves, roars, and flashes its eyes red, which looks really cool in the dark.  My son flys it around the room & uses it to attack other toys.  This proved to be a such agreat toy, I bought another (#2) green dino to have my son and husband have dino fights.  This toy is the best I have found.</review_text>
This toy was bought for my son (14 months) because he has an obsession with the phone.  My son instantly LOVED this toy and has been a great subsitute when he is reaching for the phone and I'm on it.It is a great travel toy as well.  Being in the armed forces, we are constantly on the move and he loves sitting in his car seat on the rides and playing with his phone.Sure this toy gets a bit old after a bit but it's a small price to pay for your kids true happiness.  My one gripe with this phone is that within two days of him playing with it, he broke the center button that flips the features.  We returned it to the store and have not been able to find it except online.  I'm sure it was just a fluke flaw and am buying it again</review_text>
this is an awesome game. the fun thing about it is building it. its better than the rollercoasters because you dont just watch it going in circles. it actually does stunts. its also not so easy to. its VERY!!!!!!!!!!!!! DURABLE. JUST KEEP IT AWAY FROM BABIES. YOU HAVE TO ORDER IT OFF THE INTERNET SO DONT GO LOOKING FOR IT AT STORES. OVERALL ITS AN EXCELLENT TOY</review_text>
I purchased the mat to use with it and it works great</review_text>
My son got this for his 5th birthday and he loves it! He likes to turn off the lights and give "shows" for the family. We have not listened to the Cds yet but I am sure they are a great add-on. My son is fascinated by space adn this porjector was a cool way for him to learn even more. I don't know if they revamped the design or someting but we love it and have no complaints. In fact, we are going to purchase some of the other packs available</review_text>
This game set it of amazing quality. Every piece has so much detail it just looks good without doing anything! The Dubloons are the best part, and like others have said, make the BEST clinking sound when you drop a pile into your hand.This game is definately worth buying.... IF you come up with some new rules that make the game more interesting. The gameplay is very uninteresting, boring, and brainless. My wife never passes up an opportunity to tell me how boring it was, and even her younger (12 year old) sister thought it was boring and had more fun playing with the pieces. My wife says I should have bought us Settlers of Catan instead of spending my money on this (before we got our own set... now we have one), but when I bought it I knew it would be just for the game pieces. I am brewing up some good rules to change the gameplay dramatically and make it much more interesting. She likes Settlers so much.. maybe I will get some trade of spices into the game and whatnot.Anyways, if you are creative and have a good idea for a ship game, then DEFINATELY get this game set. It is high quality and beautiful. But, if you don't have the interest to make your own game, then pass this one up because you would most likely love to play any other game you own before this</review_text>
The item arrived in perfect condition and right when I was told it would be here. I am very happy with this product and seller. Would have no problem doing busy with them agai</review_text>
The story of "Hansel and Gretel" is more than a warning against children talking to strangers (or trying to eat their houses).  The recurring image of the forest in German fairy tales is a supernatural world where interesting things happen, while the fact the father of Hansel and Gretel is a woodcutter is significant because this was one of the lowliest occupations at that time.  Therefore, what we have here is the triumph of the poor working class characters over the witch and her upper class pretentions (she stores not only treasure but food), which would make her death some sort of proto-Marxist warning if you are ideologically inclined in that direction.In the original manuscript of the story of the siblings were referred to as Little Brother and Little Sister.  The Brothers Grimm chose Hansel because it was a common name in German fairy tales (their equivalent of John Doe so to speak) and picked Gretel for essentially the same reason (which makes her Jane Doe).  Gretel (or Gretchen) is a form of the name Margaret, which in Latin (Margarita) means "pearl."All that background makes it rather ironic that for its Twisted Fairy Tale series McFarlane Toys has turned Gretel into a German princess, striking a pose that suggests "Getting lost in the woods is the least of her worries."  This six-inch figure has tattoos, a spiked collar around her neck, and torn fish net stockings.  There are more details for you to discover when you look over the figure carefully, and while she is not exactly a princess of bondage, Gretel appears to be familiar with the neighborhood.  She also has a mop and a pail, and there is ample reason to think she knows how to use them (the mind reels at the possibilities for rewriting the Grimms tale).Twisted Fairy Tales is the fourth series of McFarlane's Monsters, and the rest of the menagerie consists of not only Gretel's tag team partner Hansel, but Red Riding Hood, Peter Peter Pumpkin Eater, and Little Miss Muffet.  If you were aware about the probable origins of a lot of the classic fairy tales then you already knew that Mother Goose had a twisted sense of humor.  With these figures McFarlane Toys certainly takes being twisted to the next level.  Even if you do not want the entire set, there should be one of these figures that captures the Jungian dark side of the tales that we were all raised on once upon a time that most appeals to you</review_text>
The wagon is great, as expected.  5 stars for the wagon, no stars for delivery.It arrived with a dent, though, and when we called they told us a replacement wouldn't be available until mid-February, plus we'd have to figure out how to re-pack the thing, which was halfway assembled before we noticed the dent . . . so we gently banged it out and spray-painted the spot, and the recipients probably won't care, but it was a pain-in-the-butt, and there didn't seem any way to deal with it that wouldn't have been too much trouble.</review_text>
I got a wagon like this when i was really small. Now I am 14 and Istill use it for getting grocries from the store.  It is still in good condition except it is rusty because i used to fill it with water nd make my friends  ride in it.   It is fun to ride down the hill from the store too my home.   It can go really fast and it's easy to steer.   You have to be careful if  you cross the road and go onto a curb with kids in it.  One time my mom was  pulling me and my sister to the store.  When she went over the curb it  tipped over and my sister scraped underneath her nose. It is a great toy  and even though i'm too old for it i still like it a lot</review_text>
I had a Radio Flyer wagon just like this as a child and loved it,  which is why I wanted one for my daughter.  We bought ours when our daughter was a year old, and she loved being pulled around the neighborhood in it. Now  that she's four, she loves pulling her one-year-old little brother around,  or posing for pictures with him in it. We use it for picnicing in the local  park, or setting up an impromptu lemonade stand on the front lawn. The  wagon seems to keep popping up in our family photos, from the Labor Day  block party to Halloween trick-or-treating. It's a &quot;classic&quot; for  good reason--kids love it, and never stop loving it</review_text>
My son received this as a christmas gift, and thoroughly enjoys it. This is not a regular DVD. It is designed to go with the "Read With Me DVD" system (a separate remote control that works with it on your TV). A previous reviewer was not aware of this, so it should not have received a bad review for consumer error</review_text>
My 2 year old grandson loves balls of any kind,when I found this activity set I knew he would really enjoy it,he plays with it for hours. The only downside of this is that he cannot keep up with the balls. It would be great if this company would give parents,or grandparents an order form to get replacement balls to give this fun toy longer life</review_text>
I bought this for my son's second Christmas; he was almost 2.  It was a recommendation of one of my parenting magazines and I had to hunt it down 3 years ago. He loved pounding the balls and he even could match the color of the ball to the color of the hole!  He still plays with it and I will be buying his baby brother one when he's big enough</review_text>
My 18-month old has been playing with this for three months now and just loves it.  She even knows now which color balls goes in the correct slot.   She whacks them all in, puts the balls back, and keeps doing this over and  over and over</review_text>
My 5 year old twins really like this game...it is sometimes difficult to balance the toppings, but that is why they like it so much.  On the other hand, my 3 year old finds it very frustrating. If you are considering purchasing this for a younger child you can rough up the pizza part with a piece of sand paper to help with the slippage.</review_text>
My son loves these! They arrived in perfect condition. LOVE that they are machine washable</review_text>
My sister said her 3yo son loved and and was able to play in it with his 1yo brother! I don't really know how durable it is, she lives in another state but said they liked it alot</review_text>
My eight and nine year old sons are big Lego fans. I bought one set for each of my boys and they each built a different model. Both models came out great. The parts fit together beautifully and the finished product moves very well when played with. The vehicles are even better than they look in the pictures on the box. This was the first Technic set that they tried. I hope they enjoy future Technic sets as much</review_text>
If your child likes the Wiggles like my 2 year-old does, then she'll love this keyboard.  Except that there is no volume button, which I consider rude to the parents.  :</review_text>
My 23-month old son received this toy for Christmas and it was one of his favorites. He played with it off and on for hours. Woke up this morning and ran right to it. It isn't very educational but the fact that he recognizes the songs from the show makes it more fun. It's not too bulky so it's something we can take in the car. Overall, we love it and would recommend it to any Wiggles fan ;-</review_text>
THIS IS THE BEST GAME EVER, HAS OVER 100,000 WORDS. YOU CAN SELECT YOUR CATIGORY AND HOW MANY LETTERS. EACH TIME YOU GET THE WORD RIGHT YOU GET POINTS, AND THEY GET HIGHER AND HIGHER, AND IF U GET IT WRONG IT GETS LOWER. ..</review_text>
I have wanted to buy a Musini for my son for a few years now, but never found one in a retail store, online or local. I recently gave in and bought one gently used on eBay for a fantastic price including the cartridge. My entire family LOVES it, including my 2-year-old son. It was very easy to figure out how to use, even without a manual. On the battery case are very clear, easy to follow instructions on how to calibrate the sensitivity of your Musini. Within minutes we had found the perfect setting for our carpeted living room and we were all dancing. Even my parents who came to visit one night were bopping to the Musini! My dad couldn't keep his feet still, insisting on drumming them on the floor constantly to keep the music going when my toddler had taken a seat to rest for a minute. I have found myself taking it out during my son's nap time to put near me while I do the mundane chores around the house. It is really addicting and keeps us all moving!I can't say enough good things about this toy. The music quality is absolutely wonderful and is clear and crisp and a joy to listen to. You also tend to feel like you are actually playing an instrument when you're dancing around or even sitting on the floor tapping your fingers. The songs are mostly familiar and well-loved songs that you will instantly recognize. I have also noticed that you can use the Musini to up your child's physical activity. If you change the sensitivity so that they must jump or stomp hard, you suddenly have an even greater outlet for energy and a great source of exercise! You can, of course, adjust the sensitivity so that a single finger tap across the room will register. It's up to you, and I think it's fantastic! Highly recommended</review_text>
The test of a toy is if the child loves it.  This toy was perfect</review_text>
We had a simpler and earlier Quercetti marble run.  This was an upgrade/add-on, and well worth it.  The motorized elevator keeps the action going.  A five year old will need help setting up, but can operate the final run easily.  Safe pieces, easy construction and good directions.  Fun, even for the adults</review_text>
Gave this to my 6 year old for his birthday.  I helped him to construct it from the clear (no reading) directions along with my 10-year old daughter.  The pieces go together flawlessly - the engineering of the plastic is superb.  The elevator works as designed and the battery pack (2xAA) connects via a short cord - very convenient.  He has already spent many hours playing with it</review_text>
Our three children, who are now in their forties, were young when we purchased a Bozo Bop Bag for them.  They loved it, used it all the time, and it held up beautifully through the years.   Now our daughter has a daughter of her own and we purchased one for her.  Same design, same wonderful quality, same use as forty years ago.  Bozo is a "friend" who likes to be punched so he can bounce back up.  Our 3 year old grand daughter loves him.  She now has a baby sister 7 months old who will also be able to make use of Bozo.  For toddler activity and appropriate "acting out", I thoroughly recommend this product with no reservation.  It's a bit pricey, but worth 5 stars for sure</review_text>
I looked for years to get the Bozo punching bag as it was a part of my youth.  Finally I located it and purchased it for my grandson, 7.  He loves it as does all of his family who use it to take out their frustrations. LOL  Built very sturdy as he drags it around the backyard as well</review_text>
I received this sudoku handheld for christmas as a gift. I started to get into sudoku a few months ago. while i still like to clip out the newspaper clipping, this handheld lets me take my growing gaming addiction on the go. there aren't many buttons so it's pretty intuitive on what to push to make it work. hope this helps</review_text>
Love this new edition to Yatzee.  It is so handy to have the tray so your dice don't go flying everywhere.  This game is really a good game for the whole family</review_text>
Its the best table out there. I did a lot of research and now have a year of "testing." We bought it for my daughter when she was 1, and she's almost 3. I also run a daycare. The chairs don't tip and various ages from 2-5 have put them to their worst. It cleans easily and is easy to put aside, if needed. I did have to replace a chair once (I stood on it.) and the customer service was fast and friendly.</review_text>
We did not buy the refill but purchased the original set with sandbox. It works wonderfully and my kids have played with it for hours. Clean up is easy. Another family I know just used theirs for the 1st time and they also had a wonderful experience.</review_text>
This large collection of lego bricks is to my mind the "classic collection".  Children of all ages (and adults) can build ships, planes, houses -- whatever the mind imagines -- in a variety of colors.  The bricks come in a nice sturdy plastic container for convenient storage.While Lego has gone on to develop a wide range of other products, for those who want a good starter kit and bricks not specific to any particular image or character, this is a great product</review_text>
FINALLY - a way to buy just the Lego bricks to build using your imagination.  I only have one, but no more "kits" for me!!  Even the Lego company on line doesn't have this one!  Highly recommended</review_text>
This figure of the great Wayne Gretzky is a must-have for those who collect hockey memorabilia.The figurine is life-like, with Gretzky's expression looking just as it did whenever he scored a goal.What I love most about this toy is that you can purchase Gretzkys that wore different jerseys to represent the eras in hockey his playing career spanned. If you are like me and collect Gretzky memorabilia (pictures, cards, jerseys, etc), this is an artifact that will fit quite nicely in your collection.</review_text>
Since I had always wanted a "mad scientist" lab when I was a girl and never got one, my husband purchased this for my 4 1/2 yr old son and I to do together.  Overall, it's been fun.  Everything but water has been included which is a plus.  The "lab" comes with interlocking pieces which can be assembled in a variety of ways.  I like this component because it helps children with problem solving, creativity and motor skills.  The kit also comes with recipie cards and its own measuring spoon and beaker.  It's really taught my son to learn how to measure.  However, the recipie cards tend to generalize and direct you to refer to other recipie cards, which my son would not be able to figure out without my help.  The steps on the cards come with both words and pictures which was a plus but they omitted some details that probably only a grown up would catch.  On the other hand, the "experiments" or recipies go from simple gelatin molds of bugs to more complicated creatures that progressively build upon previous experiments.  They also encourage creativity by giving further suggestions for mixing colors, flavors.  I was also pleasantly surprised at how well the "experiments" actually tasted for a toy kit.  On the other hand, if made as directed we found it difficult to actually fill the monster molds with the amounts directed on the "recipie" cards.  Overall, this was a great gift because it got my son and I to spend some fun time together</review_text>
I found this hamper storage bin to be great the kids can see into the bins and the bins don't add weight to the unit so the kids can carry the bins easily to pick up toys. However the bins could be a little bigger because they tend to fall off the holding rods if you bump the unit. The hamper is great because my 3 year old son can fill up his hamper but he can't tip it over and spill dirty clothes on the floor but it is light weight and easy for him to help haul to the laundry if he wants to. Good Ite</review_text>
I looked everywhere for a plastic durable toybox, seems so simple but unfortunately no one kept anything in stock to look at in person. I took a chance on this one because the price was right, and I'm very pleased. I like the pockets on the front, my son loves putting his books in & out. If I would change one thing it is the lid. It is lightweight as to not hurt little hands & fingers (which is good), but is never locked onto the toybox, it lifts off very easily, so sometimes just bumping it causes it to fall out of the shallow indentations it sits in. Other than that we love it</review_text>
We got this toybox for our daughter when she turned one.  We love that it doesn't have any sharp corners or hinges to get fingers stuck inside.  It still looks like new 6 month later so it is very durable. If your child likes to get inside it like ours does there is no worry about them breaking it since the bottom is fabric.  We also really like the pockets in front for storing smaller items- we always stick her favorite dolls and animals in there.  We don't use the cover so that she can get the toys herself and it works perfect for us.  Highly recommend!</review_text>
I have been wanted a non-electronic non-paper Sudoku game for some time.  Rubik's Sudoku is a self contained single player game board.  I can move it from room to room without the playing pieces moving from where I have placed them on the board.  There is one extra piece for each number/color tile included.  With the color coding it is easy to learn the strategy behind Sudoku.  I was not picking it up very fast when I tried the paper versions.  After I progress through the 100 puzzles included with this game I'll use the game board and pieces with the Sudoku magazine I have.  For the cost I would recommend this over the more expensive wood versions.  If cost is not an issue then you might go for one of the more durable all wood versions that Amazon has</review_text>
This is the toy with the background music and she'll play the croc toy along with this one and also dance</review_text>
i can't say how great this toy is i mean it's tall and the word he says is sweet pick it up today dont waste any time..... or and dont fall alsleep. it's just great in every way that's all i have to say i mean if you dont pick it up you for sure will be sorry... i hope this helped any one who was thanking about getting i</review_text>
J&J Sports Superstore shipped this as professioally packed & as lightning quick as Amazon has done!!!  This is a great gift for any one with a love for horses as my children do. Anything horse related is a hit in this home. I like the fact that Monopoly, one of my all time favorites, is available now in just about any theme. Go check out J & J Sports Superstore for your favorite themed Monopoly game</review_text>
My daughter has been riding for about 3 years now and she was so excited to see this Christmas morning.  Of course that was one of the first things she wanted to play.  Her grandma and I played and I was surprised at the amount of things I have learned just from taking her to her lessons!  I'm sure there is a way to alter the game so there are more questions like Trivial Persuit but that was my only problem with the game.  There isn't questions asked every move.  But otherwise, it is an excellent game.  I would definately recommend it</review_text>
my five year old loves this . has the cutest songest and easiest lyrics to remember. So easy for a little kid.  Fun, Fun , Fu</review_text>
I bought my girls, ages 7 and 4, this product earlier this spring. It was easy to assemble, but finding the right height at which to hang it was a fairly time consuming process.  It has been up for 4 months now and has seen daily use. When our play group meets here, the kids line up to have a turn, over and over again.  I would recommend this for children who are reasonably coordinated and who have enough upper body strength to hold themselves up by their hands.  A very durable product and a fun physical activity</review_text>
I love light sabers,I got 13 years all if you think you are big for one of them let me tell you that you will be a kid onlly once so get one an play,I bought one of the basic light sabers and they are so cool, this saber is the best, you can fight and the saber will not get damage, i like it very much. I got a green and black and my brother a blue and black so we can fight. The light saber full extended is like 3/4 of a meter but it do his job. The electronic light sabers are to fancy and they get broke in a moment. THE FORCE BE WITH YOU.</review_text>
Our 2-year-old loves Thomas the Train, so this was a great gift for her. She has other Thomas items, but they're limited to playtime. This, however, is not only good for playtime, but safe enough for her to take to bed with her (she even kicked her Elmo out to make room for Thomas!). It's also small enough for her to be able to take on car rides. A great all around item to have if you've got a child that's really into Thomas</review_text>
I was a bit afraid after reading the reviews, but this game is a hit with kids all ages. It takes about 3 minutes to set up, but it's not hard and the bees don't fall thru. We played more times than I can count this past week, and everyone enjoyed. I bought it for my 5 year old, but her cousins (ages 19, 17 and 13yo) joined in the fun and actually asked to play. My husband and I also got a kick out of it! Even our 3yo loved it, but she is incredibly lucky and would just pull randomly at leaves and none dropped, she's good!Our child didn't get bored while we were setting it back up, but everyone was sticking leaves and talking, so I guess it depends on your children's patience or attention span.In a few words: We all loved it</review_text>
My nephew absolutely loved the games in this Nemo cartridge...I did do because they are educational and teach him various things that he probably would have no interest in...At least he is broading his horizons in a way that he enjoys</review_text>
Great game! Bright, Colorful, easy for preschoolers to play and  understand. This one rates right up there with Winnie the Pooh for the 3-5 age group.</review_text>
My 6 year old absolutly adores Junie B.  Santa brought her the Leapter for Chrismas and Grandma gave her the Junie B game.  She only puts it down to go to sleep.  There are a few games (word searches and finding a Noun/Verb/Adjective and Great for 1st/2nd graders. It is a great learning tool.  The software is set up like the Junie B Jones Journal book.  If you child loves Junie B she will definetly adore the game</review_text>
I chose this railway set over Learning Curve because I believe their prices are inflated, and I was not disappointed with it.  The set is well made overall, with smooth, well-fitting track and sturdy accessories.  My son (3) and daughter (6) have played with the set for hours every day since we got it, both with equal fascination.  It fits perfectly with Thomas accessories we already own.  I have only three small caveats:  1) Buy some "sure track" clips to use on elevated portions of the track.  We use it on a smooth, level surface (hardwood floor), but the clips really enhance the stability for active play.  2)  The round turntable did not spin freely when we got it, because the blue center piece was not perfectly round.  We drilled out the rivet and removed the blue center piece, sanded down the edges, and replaced it.  Now it's very easy for my kids to operate.  3)  The trains included have slightly wobbly wheels, compared to Thomas trains.  But they are functional, and my kids use the trains interchangeably.  It's a great set, and a real bargain</review_text>
I originally bought this for my husband, an EMT/FF. I wrote a poor review of company, based upon my entire experience w/ this storefront, and the other items I had purchased. I wasn't terribly pleased with the [...] pen but my husband took it to work and loved it. Said it went off several times from pocket while driving..and the entire ER loved it. Overall, it is fun and writes and does what it's supposed to: make you laugh</review_text>
I appreciate the previous reviews, but we had already gotten the game by the time I read them.  My family - ages 4, 6, 10 and three adults playing  really enjoyed this game. We played until we had a winner (not too long)and then everyone remaining wanted to play to get a second place winner.  Just our opinion - but we had a good time</review_text>
I bought this car for my 4 1/2 year old son who absolutely LOVES the movie Cars.  He also loves those Hot Wheels cars.  I got him this car, and he really liked it.  In fact, all of my kids (ages 4-15) like it!  It's a really cute toy.  It's even great if you are a Cars collector</review_text>
My daughters (ages 5 and 2 1/2) were given these dolls for Christmas. They love them and play with them every day, especially the 5-year-old. I think the littlest one may be a little too young to really enjoy her fully, but she plays with her when her big sister plays with hers.I'm glad I didn't let some of the reviews discourage me from getting these. All the problems people are having with the limited English can be very easily remedied, if they read the directions fully. First of all, you must switch the doll from "display" mode, by moving the little switch on her back. The doll comes in the mode used so that people can try her out in the store. In this mode, she will only say one or two things in English. One you move the switch, you just have to "wake her up" and hold the button util she's speaking English. From that point on, she should speak English, even after waking up. However, if you turn her completely off via the back switch, you will have to switch her back to English by holding the bracelet down.I really have not had a problem, and certainly don't have to spend time interpreting what she's saying. That's why they make directions - it tells about the display mode right on the front</review_text>
I bought this doll on ebay for my daughter for christmas because it wasnt  available in stores. My daughter who just turned 6 yrs old loves this doll. Doll speaks both english and spanish. The only thing I dont like is that this baby keeps going to sleep after meals, but if your child wants to keep it awake you can press the bracelet or put the bottle in the mouth. Its a good thing if you dont want to run out of batteries soon or to give the doll some rest</review_text>
This game is fun for the family.  It's very simple and can be played by young children learning to count.  It's not overly exciting by itself, but you can make it that way with your own spin on sound effects</review_text>
This set is perfect for my daughter's new toy oven (miele) that she received for Christmas.  The pots and pans are sized just right and the utensils are fit perfectly with the pots and pans.  One of my utensils already broke apart, but that happens.  I have a 3 year old girl who loves to cook, but she IS 3 and is not always careful.  Not sure whether that utensil wasn't made well enough or it's a 3 year old's play, but the rest of the set seems fine.  I would recommend this and the Miele oven</review_text>
I was happy to order this early so they wouldn't run out, but I later saw the same set at a local store. There was only one left on the shelf, so I'm glad I ordered them anyway. They are my youngest son's favorite cars to start off with every morning</review_text>
We got this when my kids turned 3, however could have gotten it when they turned 2. We play it every day. It tells you which player's turn it is, it also counts the number of spaces you are suppose to go with you and then it says "you're on the 'yellow' space" as a double check. There are 2 modes and we can play on the "difficult" mode (the difference being with the easier mode you only have to know colors, with the more difficult mode, you have to know the alphabet). The characters are REALLY cute to. Best of all, EVERYONE is a winner - yeah! A concept that is difficult to teach a 2 or 3 year old, but this games does a superb job. The computer chip knows what space you are on so it makes sure that everyone wins within 2 turns (that I've experienced), so those with little patience can "wait it out"</review_text>
I bought the bean bag toss as a Christmas gift for my 22 month old son. He had played the Bean Bag Toss the first time at the Halloween carnival at the church. It was all he wanted to play that night. I wanted something that would be easy to pick up at the end of the day. At just three pieces,it is simple to put together and take apart. Although it says it is for 5 and older, it would probably get old fast for a child that age</review_text>
This is a great game that is made very well.  It is nice and solid wood construction with great bright colors.  It will last us many years.  I bought it for a small carnival style fundraising event that we needed games for children to play.  It will surely be a hit!  My daughter (8 years old) tried it out and really enjoyed playing with it.  It has three bean bags of different weights making the game differing in difficulty.  I would recommend this game to any one looking for entertainment for children.  This game is best played on a table, so that a child can stand and throw the bean bags</review_text>
MY THREE YEAR OLD SON IS JUST DISCOVERING THOMAS AND FROM READING OTHER REVIEWS AND SPEAKING WITH VETERAN MOTHERS OF THOMAS FANS I REALIZED HOW IMPORTANT COLLECTING THE DIFFERENT CHARACTERS IS IN ORDER TO REENACT THE SCENES FROM THE VIDEOS. THIS SET MADE A NICE ADDITION TO HIS GROWING COLLECTION AND THE PRICE WAS NICE TOO. THE WOODEN TRAINS ARE A BIT EXSPENSIVE BUT ARE WELL WORTH IT IN THE LONG RUN DUE TO THE FACT THAT THEY WILL BE PLAYED WITH FOR YEARS TO COME UNLIKE MOST OTHER TOYS THAT CHILDREN OUTGROW OR BECOME BORED WITH ALMOST AS SOON AS THEY RECIEVE THEM</review_text>
me and my BF loves this plug n play game "wheel of fortune", we bought it at target store. thumb up for this one and plenty of words.</review_text>
Muffet vs Spider! This is one cool looking figure and since the accessory spider is as big as Muffet makes it a kick butt scene. Again the turn is to the S&M pink & black leather bondage look, similar to the spiked outfit of Red Riding Hood. This is certainly not the image your mind conjures up to the nursery rhyme but it's a great display piece. The downfall from five stars is that when setup, Muffet is almost obscured by the spider. Both pieces look great in detail but a slightly different pose may have improved the figures</review_text>
I hate spiders (yes I admitt that I make my wife kill them) and so does Miss Muffet...or is she.  As her outfit might suggest, looks like Miss Muffet as a bit of a fetish going on, need I say S&M, and with that said, being pinned (blindly I might add) by this monsterous spider may be more of a turn on then you might think.  You'd expect to see Miss Muffet in a frilly dress and bonnet maybe, blue dress to be exact but with her lether bondage in black and pink this 'Twisted' point of view proves to be anything but expected.  I say kudos to you McFarlane for truly reimagining the fairy tale (nursury rhyme, whatever) and giving us yet another piece of art</review_text>
the lego community workers set met our expectations and even more.  The set comes with lots of different pieces and has made our lego experience very fun. Albeit a little on the expensive side, this set is well worth it</review_text>
I have a 10 month old and a 3 1/2 yr old who both love this tunnel!!!!!</review_text>
After reading other reviews,I, too, purchased this to use to practice agility with our dog.  I wasn't sure it would be large enough.  She is an English Setter.  It works perfectly for this size of dog.  She is approx. 35 lbs, med. size dog.Cind</review_text>
My son is a huge fan of the Thomas & Friends diecast trains and building sets.  Despite the fact he had amassed a large portion of these toys, an important character was missing from his collection: Terrence the Tractor.  Of course, he was thrilled when this little vehicle showed up in his Easter basket.No, Terrence is not a train, but one of the tractors that plows the fields on the Island of Sodor.  Terrence is a wonderful character, with his bright orange coat of paint and happy face.  He has one magnet on his back end, perfect for pulling trains (or having trains pull him).  In all honesty, we have not had any problems with Terrence's treads coming off--they are designed to wrap tightly around the wheels when rolling, so no matter how hard my three-year-old tugs on them, they stay put.  Terrence is also a very durable toy--my son has dropped him, stepped on him, ran him into the other trains, and Terrence shows no signs of wear, tear, split wood, or chipped paint.  Finally, Terrence is small enough to fit easily in my son's hands during play, but can also be slipped into a coat pocket during a car trip.All in all, Terrence is a terrific vehicle, and a perfect addition to a child's Thomas & Friends collection</review_text>
This large version of Michael Myers is a lot beter than the McFarlane version released ever how many years ago. First the pose is better.Second NO BLOOD STAINS! Don't get me wrong, Michael Myers is a movie killer, but he never got bloody! That was my biggest complaint with the McFarlane version. He does have slight oily looking stains on his coveralls, but if you remember from the movie, he killed a mechanic to get those coveralls. Finally third, and pretty cool, the sound effect is diffrent. Instead of Laurie Strode's whiny help me , you get the Halloween theme playing along with Michael's breathing. Remeber the end of the first movie, after Loomis shot him, but the body was missing, the closing shots were shown with the theme music accompanied by Myers' breathing. If you got the NECA boxed set of Michael Myers and Loomis and liked it, get this! If you got the Mcfarlane version, get this! If you just like Halloween, get this! You won't be disappointed! Looks better in person than on the picture</review_text>
The fun surprises with all of the magical castle playsets were a hit with my child.  She had a great time using her "magic wands" to see what would happen.  With the bathroom playset, having the vanity doors pop open and a step stool (I assume so Dora could step up to the sink & brush her teeth) pops out was a very fun surprise.  My 7 year old has already spent MANY hours making up princess stories with the castle.  The whole set was a great buy</review_text>
We have several boxes of these Melissa And Doug bead sets b/c we just can't get enough of them!  My three children (twin boys - one girl) love to sit and make necklaces over and over again!  YES!  My boys love this too!!!  It's a great exercise for their fine motor skills!  The patience they have all developed to sit and string these small beads together is wonderful!  It's great practice for them as they create different patterns with each new necklace.  I suggest getting a few boxes - especially if you have more than one child playing with them at the same time.  Our favorite set includes letters so they can each spell out their own name or other words.**Not suggested for small children who will mistake them for pieces of candy.</review_text>
We bought this toy for our 1 year old son.  It is very sturdy and well made and the blocks inside are great.  I agree with the other reviews that the wagon moves to fast on wood floors and it does not turn well.My biggest compaint, however, is that when both lids are closed, the wagon looks just like a 2-step ladder.  Our son constantly tries to climb it, like stairs.  The other day, he finally stood up on top of the wagon and the wagon tipped straight over onto the handle.  My son fell over with it and crashed on his face.  There are two rubber stoppers on the back of the wagon, but they DO NOT prevent it from falling over.My son is fine, but this toy is very dangerous and I do not recommend it!</review_text>
This backpack has plenty of room for the extra LeapPad books and cartridges we have. I love having them all together with even little compartments for the cartridges to be secure in.</review_text>
My nephew loves this gift. In fact, he wouldn't allow his sister to play with it, so now she also has one</review_text>
I like the fact that we can make all different sounds for cydney and she just loves to listen to it.. Can't wait till she can play with it hersel</review_text>
I purchased this from Amazon, having only seen it in photographs.  Based on the online images I expected the top to be opaque pink, and the bottom part to be see-thru pink, so I could see what was inside.  When it arrived the top was indeed the exact color as on Amazon, but the bottom was a pearlized lighter opaque pink.  I don't have any problem with this, in fact I may even like it better, but it was just unexpected.Overall the case is great.  Just as advertised it will hold 15 dolls in a standing position, with plenty of space in the 2 compartments in the lid for all sorts of shoes and accessories.  The doors on top are difficult to open, and I know I will have to help my 4 year old with it at first, until they "soften" up a bit, but at least they won't be flying open, spewing mini plastic platform shoes everywhere.  As one previous reviewer noted, there is a larger open space in the main compartment that isn't great for holding a lot.  I plan on using either a Ziploc bag in that space to maximize it, or attaching a (pink!?!) piece of cardboard or thin plastic to extend the height of it.  We'll then be able to fit massive amounts of clothes in there!My cart does say "Barbie" on the lid, but the markings are discrete, and tastefully done.Overall, I like this cart.  It's probably the best storage device for Barbie that I've seen.  It's cute, fairly well-made and will hold a ton.  I didn't give it 5 stars because of the issue with the interior storage, the handle seems a bit flimsy, the wheels are not great for carpet, and it's a bit pricey</review_text>
I give this Leap Pad book 3 stars for fun because my children were not interested enough to even look at all the pages.They played with it a lot, but did not get even half way through, maybe that just means it is full of fun stuff to do, but since my kids have not gone back to it, I feel it does not hold their interest quite enough. Educational, 4 stars because some of it seemed a bit simple, like the space page. 5 stars for durability because it is no more and no less durable then regular Leap Pad books. Dont like the eraseable pen though. Must cover it each and every time, even between questions. If it's off more then 5 seconds, it dries out.I peronally did not find it very easy to keep picking up and putting down pens. I tried using a pen in each hand, and it dried out, so I had to keep putting down the regular "pen" to cover up the eraseable pen. Pretty annoying</review_text>
We love this game.  All members of the family can play it and we've enjoyed it as a family many time</review_text>
Easy, straightforward interface (for instance, a button for each number) and navigation through cells.  Easy to tell which numbers start with the puzzle and which ones you entered.  Provides time-penalized hints in any cell.  Pauseable and saves your game between (auto-off) power sessions.  Most importantly, this device lets you make "pencil marks"!  I have checked out at least a dozen products and I have yet to come across an electronic Sudoku that electronically lets me enter dots or Xs to indicate which numbers might (not) be in a cell.  It makes me wonder if the people ordered to design and implement these games actually play Sudoku themselves.  The closest I've seen let you enter multiple numbers in a cell and it blinks through them, which I find cumbersome and patience-trying.  Sadly, this thing doesn't do electronic marks either, but their lower-cost solution involves a dry-erase pen that lets you make the marks right on the screen, on top of little numbers printed in each cell's background.  Losing marks in travel is prevented by the recessed contours of the screen.  Why not 5 stars?  Just the fact that the marks aren't electronic, there's no backlight, and the shadows cast by the dry-erase marks can be a little disorienting.  Otherwise, a well-done, fun, and addictive product</review_text>
My three year old sports nut just got this for his birthday.  We have not had any problems, and he loves it.  I can see his hitting improving already</review_text>
Solid constructed dumptruck.  Only problem is the dumper is higher then the matching loader.  Wish the loader raised higher then the dumper for better play...for my son, not me :</review_text>
I've been an Amazon customer for years, but this is the first time a product stood out enough for me to write a review. I bought this for my 8 yr. old daughter and I figured my 6 yr. old son could use it later.I was very hesitant, because there aren't a lot of reviews and it's expensive.Well, we've had it a few days and my daughter has been playing more with "Secrets of the Master Magician: An Apprentice's Manual", which I also bought at the same time (another great gift). My daughter is interested in this and it's easy for her to put things together.My son is obsessed with it! It's similar (for him) to the Lego creatures he puts together. He needs a little help from time to time, but he can certainly follow the very well laid out diagrams. So far they've created an FM radio, a scifi noise maker, a sound detecting space noise maker thingy, a propeller that spins and flies into the air, a seven segment display, a volt meter connected to the solar cell. After connecting the solar cell, I realized my son thought the solar cell would come on like a computer screen or TV! After explaining it and putting my hand over it; now they both know what a solar cell does.- There are 5 books of experiments.- Each project has a nice simple color picture of how to connect all the components.- All components are clearly marked.- The diagrams are a top view. Since the connections are layered on top of one another 2 and 3 deep, it takes a little figuring as to what's on top and what's on bottom. It's easy for an adult. It's part of the "puzzle" for the kids. After we put a few together, they both got it.- The pieces seem sturdy enough and snap together easily- There is great assortment of parts to create lots and lots of very interesting projects.- My kids love the projects. I've been very impressed.- It has a cable that you can connect to the microphone port of a PC sound card. I haven't played with this. There is software, it looks like you can turn your PC into an oscilloscope. Looks interesting. There's a whole book for these projects. I just saw the cover, so it's likely that there's even more to it.My kids are learning a lot with this. While they are putting things together, I can explain how these different parts work. There are lots of opportunities to take the project and modify it by replacing parts, change a light out for the speaker, etc.For example, my son put the 7 segment LED together. I wasn't impressed. I was hoping to put together a counter, but it just connects each segment to ground to turn all the segments on. There are 750 projects, so maybe there is a counter project. Regardless, my son was fascinated. He changed all the connections manually to count from 0 to 9. He changed the main power resistor to see it go brighter with a smaller resistor and dimmer with a bigger resistor. Lots of implicit learning going on. I pointed to the microwave display and said, "See, that's how it works!</review_text>
I enjoy seeing my twin four year old son's play with the Read with Me DVD program and CD's. The children are learning as they play. I see them recalling information and reviewing parts of the story. This educational toy is very engaging.The only problem I have with this toy is sometimes if the child is not on level with the DVD player it takes several tries to get the DVD player to respond to the remote.</review_text>
If you're not sure if your little one will really be "into" these train sets, this one is a great one to try out.  It's more fun when you get all the extra buildings, but if it's an iffy situation, then I highly recommend this set.  We bought this set for our little one because he just wasn't too sure about these trains.  However, after he received it, he found out that he liked them and well, now we have a bunch of them! The $40 is not much to invest n a toy that they're not going to play with either!  I just wish this set had more things with it besides just the track and the train.  However, you can get a little better deal if you buy the track separately from Maxim, who makes Brio trains now, and the train separately as well.  This train will chew up the batteries pretty quickly unless you use Duracell.  Energizer only makes it two days in this train but Duracell makes it two-and-a-half weeks.  Other than that, highly recommend this toy</review_text>
My 3 year old son plays with them all the time. They are a little challenging and he loves to see the completed puzzle. The box is great and keeps the puzzles separate. Each puzzle peice is marked on the back for easy sorting. I am ordering all of the boxed sets ASAP</review_text>
It is a magnificient item! So simple and beautiful yet full of really small details and "hello, here is Johnny Cash!"Looks really great on foot with his guitar. Just like real. I strongly recommend it to all Cash fans</review_text>
I bought this because as a kid my grandparents had one that I would play with constantly everytime I visited, and at the age of 7 was certain I could solve it.  I never did, and eventually it broke, and it wasn't until I was sitting at my work waiting for my computer to do something, that I thought I needed something to do while I waited for my computer to unfreeze, or for the network to come back online.  So I bought a rubiks cube, figured that it was a good portable puzzle thats easy to store, and is only one piece.  It came with a display stand, so I keep it displayed next to my monitor, and have co-workers come by and scramble it hoping that I won't be able to put it back, but I always have.  Like I said its a puzzle, but not with alot of pieces, and its portable, so if your taking the bus home, you can kill time with it, then put it back in your briefcase, or backpack.  I love it and haven't gotten sick of it yet</review_text>
One day I realized that my baby is now a toddler and his toys are all...well baby toys!  I browsed the toy aisles for the perfect, age apporpriate replacements hating to spend more money on more plastic, yet desperate for anything that will engage him for at least 15 minutes and keep him STILL so I can put clothes away, vacuum, sometimes just SIT and play. This does it!Reliable duplo/lego quality.  Non frustrating because the pieces actually stay together.  Easy assembly.  Of course my little guy is 22 months so I still have to do the majority of the assembly.  I did get this for him at age 19 months and by now he has caught on as to how to put the track together.  He tries to put the cars together but still needs my help to lock the pieces in place.I am constantly amazed at how much toddlers pick up by watching grownups, so keep putting this back together while your little one is present.  Luca does love to disassemble the track and it is a challange keeping it together however, over the last month, persistence has paid off and he has figured out how to re-assenmble his little messes.  The assembly is easy enough for him to get it on his own!These chunky toys accomomodate busy little toddler hands  perfectly.This particular set comes with everything necessary for your toddler to "get to work".  This set has just enough to busy your toddler without being overwhelming!  This set has satisfied my little guy (although I did buy him the Toby (he is just so cute) set too.My older boys take Tae Kwan Do every night and this set is a staple in the karate bag.  It definately keeps the younger .0brothers and sisters busy and off the MATS.Other add-ons are available but right now, this set, and the Toby have been just enough!The price sems high for the seemingly few pieces.  I am the first to admit it is difficult to commit to a 25$ purchase, but as with Lego/Duplo products, the quality and play/learning value add greatly to the plastic parts making it an excellent purchase!GREAT GRANDPARENT GIFT! Even a perfect toy to keep at Grandparents house!</review_text>
Our daughter got the pull and spin caterpillar for christmas (she was 9months at the time). At the time she wasn't able to pull it but loved to chase the caterpillar as it was being pulled. Now at 12 months she is able to pull it herself and loves putting just about anything on the back of the caterpillar.The toy it self has a very cute face and when pulled the eyes and ears move up and down.The only problem with the caterpillar is the pull string. It is very small and thin allowing it to slip through little hands while trying to pull it.Overall a wonderful toy, not only for the balls that come with it but for anything else that your little puts on it</review_text>
This is a fun version of Battleship. And the nice part is being able to play against the game</review_text>
I bought this set for my three children 5,4,2 last Christmas at a fancy toy store.  This product is top of the line and my kids can not get enough of this.  The marble runs are easy to build, sturdy and so much for them to play with.  There are a variety to build with the more advanced sets also we bought a few more "fun" and cool looking marbles as they raced them down.  The kids can change out the different blocks to make the marbles react in different ways- which is a creative aspect.  I LOVE THIS TOY!!!!  My kids beg me to make them a new marble run all the time.  You do need a hard surface to build on, since we didn't have a "train table" we put it on a hard piece of cardboard so it laid flat on the carpet, that way you don't have to hear the clink-clink of the marbles as they hit the bottom..</review_text>
My daughter rec'd this game as a gift for her fourth birthday.  It was wonderful because my son, who was two could play it too (with my assistance of course).  Now they are 5 and 7 and still play it.  It is a simple game that requires no reading skills and reinforces counting.  I would recommend it to everyone</review_text>
Everyone in my family is enamored with this fantastic Darth Vader mask. We bought it initially for my son, who is Darth Vader obsessed, but it's quickly become the house favorite. (Even Grandpa can't resist putting this mask on and pretending to be Darth for a spell.)On another note: we keep this helmet on our bookshelf in the living room and it makes a great conversation piece. It is so realistic looking and it makes a menacing piece of art on display</review_text>
I got these for my 28 month old daughter for Valentines Day as she is fascinated by skating. They are a pain to put on, but she doesn't mind. They have "beginner" settings, which she used for the first hour and then it was on to the "expert" setting! What I like is all the safety gear come with them, so she knows that she has to wear it "all or nothing". These are great and seem to be safe and sturdy...with supervision, of course</review_text>
The kit was great I thought it was soo much fun to paint the puppies different colors! This toy is really cool because you can hang your puppies,put magginets on them or just play with them! This toy is pretty durable but if you slammed it really hard on a hard floor it would probally break.If you like craft kits you should deffinatly get this one</review_text>
I love this kit--the puppies are so cute and the project is really fun. I loved the finished craft and it gave my children the freedom to creat whatever they wanted.  Would like to buy more of these to make a whole kennel and to give as birthday and holiday gifts.  All we needed was in the box and the directions were so easy to follow</review_text>
All year long, my three and a half year old daughter asked for a digital camera for Christmas.  3-weeks before Christmas, she sat on Santa's lap at the mall and asked for a TRUMPET of all things.  I immediately came home and searched online.  Everyone had the colorful play trumpets that were electronic with diferent characters on them, but none of them looked real!  And I'm pretty sure that my daughter was expecting Santa to bring a real trumpet, so I found this, ordered it and it was here BEFORE the estimated delivery date!It is extremely lightweight (cannot be used as a weapon), each button has a different tone to it AND it looks real (besides the fact that it's not brass).  She loved it!  She plays it all the time and unbelievably, it's not the most annoying toy she has.  I would recommend it to anyone with young children interested in musical instruments</review_text>
My 6 yr old loves this game of War. The food chain comes to life in this game of who eats who. Besides the plankton, shrimp, little fish, big fish and Shark, there are also electric eel cards and ink out octopus cards for added excitement. The game is played like war, but the instructions add a slap Jack element. This is not my favorite part. We have limited the slap jack part to just the electric eel card, which still annoys me and makes it difficult for a younger child to play with older children. The ink out card prevents anyone from winning that set of cards and gives the person with less shark cards a chance to win shark cards from the other person. This game can go on and on, don't be afraid to adjust some rules to make this game more enjoyable for your little one and not so complicated.The cards are made well.</review_text>
My children (4 & 6)love this game.  It is great because no reading is necessary.  The game asks the questions and even repeats them when necessary.  While my kids don't know all the topics covered they enjoy the game.  The fact that the game makes sure they move the correct number of spaces is great too.  I definitely recommend this game and I will probably buy the next level of it.</review_text>
She's crazy about horses and loves this set. She's creating whole scenes with the pastures and horses. Great se</review_text>
I got one for my granddaughter.....and I got one for myself.  I don't know which of us will love it more.  ADORABLE!!</review_text>
truly wonderful!  My 4 year old son hasn't quit playing this game since Christmas</review_text>
I bought this for my son for Christmas after he saw it advertised in a magazine.  He has been playing with it almost non-stop since then.   It is loud and somewhat intricate but easily masterable by small kids. It also connects with other Matchbox sets and comes with a mat for layout.  Based on my boy's interest and use so far, this rates 5 out of 5</review_text>
My three kids have loved this tunnel since they were two(they are now 5,7 & 9) They still play with it alot. They do a variety of things with it including magic tricks where the child inside will "magically" disappear. It's great exercise too to be on your hands and knees. They also love to play "tornado" with it, where one child gets inside standing up while the others throw stuffed animals into it, meanwhile the child inside throws them back outlike a real tornado does</review_text>
This is a great toy for kids of any age. We bought it last year when my daughter was 2 1/2. She still plays with it. It folds up very nicely and no matter how many times her and my 6 year old son jump on the outside, it still looks like new. At my son's 6th birthday party (13 boys, 2 girls), the kids stood with it upright and pretended they were an alien worm, while the other kids beat them with blow up swords. Yes I was supervising, but the tunnel took the beating and is still in great shape. Even out cats crawl through it. There are not many toys that are this much fun and durable</review_text>
What more can you say?  It's durable, it's fun, it folds so nicely and be put away!  GOOD BUY</review_text>
I was skeptical about this one.. as I have learned that the cheaper the toy is.. the less my baby likes it. Though he absolutely adores this floor mat. I got it for him when he was 2 months old. He is only 4 months old now but can't get enough of it. The little octopus does make sound when it spins.. but he can't reach it yet. Though its hilarious to watch him try! He gets so frustrated and beats up the other toys, but then smiles in the end when I go spin it for him.I give this 5 stars because the floormat itself is. I would give it 4 stars but that is based on my baby and all babies are different. The only problems we have with it, which would make it 4 stars would be the fact that aside from the octopus there are no other sounds, and there are no lights. My baby loves sounds and lights. So if you have one of those, expect yours not to want to play as long on the mat in the beginning stages. Ours plays for about 20-30 minutes, then he wants to be moved to his swing so he can look in the mirror and hear the music. But you can get really good tummy time on this and it keeps them entertained and laying out straight (instead of scrunched up in a swing so often) so you can get a few things done around the house.Oh and we have noticed that our baby will play on it longer, if we go over and play with him every once in awhile. Helping him reach the toys, making the octopus spin, etc. Then we get another 20 minutes to do whatever. So all in all... its a great product...Just be warned that the little mirror on one of the fish.. isn't a mirror. Its one of those flashy material looking things and the baby can't see his reflection in it.. cause I cant even see mine in it.If the toys are hanging to low for your baby, you can flip them over the top bar once and they will hang higher, or move the baby on the mat a bit.</review_text>
I work at a daycare and have an 11 mo old and can promise this is a great toy!  My baby loves it and she usually gets bored with toys fast.  All of the babies like to open and close the door and crawl through.  It also has a doorbell that rings and a light that turns on.  It plays several different songs and really keeps the attention of older children as well as babies.  I highly recommend</review_text>
My children enjoy this playouse. In the summer I had it in the backyard. In the winter, it lives in the basement. I bough acrylic paints to color the interior.  This will be their surprise when I put it outside in the summer.  It will look like a new playhouse.  Buy this and enjoy playing with your children</review_text>
We just set up our playhouse and I'm very happy with it! It's large enough for a parent to sit inside, it was easy to set up and my 2.5 year old son is loving his new playhouse! He really likes the basketball hoop/game side of the unit. I wish there were more electronic noises and interactive components on the walls of the playhouse, but I still think it's a great value for the money</review_text>
Based on the other reviews, this grandmother decided to buy this particular playhouse for my grandson's first birthday present! I am not the least bit disappointed. Colorful, action packed activities everywhere, sturdy, easy to assemble, cold weather friendly and perfect for the little boys in your life! There are a lot of girlie playhouses, but this one is the answer for boys.My son put it together in about an hour, and was ready for the birthday party guests.Happy Grandmother</review_text>
This update of the old Big Wheel style "Green Machine" is made to handle the height, weight and wear and tear of big boys (and girls, up to the latter 30s have even been caught on it), yet the seat is easily adjusted so that the average 5-year-old can reach its pedals.  The main cool feature is the dual lever steering.  Just like with the original hollow model plastic version, pulling on the steering levers in opposite directions sends the machine into a wicked spin-out that kids just can't get enough of.  Yet under the usage of some pretty crazy 6, 9 and 12 year olds on a steep downhill driveway, the machine has almost always remained three wheels on the ground.So first, I am amazed at the staying play value of this toy.  For two years now, it has been the first toy out of the garage every time the door opens.  And second, I am amazed at its durability.  The 9 year old who uses it reguarly is an Evel Kneivel who is notorious for breaking my children's toys left and right, and so far, it has held up without a squeak.This was a million times better value for our hundred spot, than the darn motorized motorcycle we bought a couple years prior for twice that amount which only lasted a year before the gears stripped.  Definitely consider this for your 5-10 year old boy, even if he already has a two-wheeler.  It's a whole different kind of fun.***** all the way</review_text>
My 21 month old daughter received Baby Pooh for Christmas and plays with him EVERY day. She loves diapering pooh when her baby brother gets a diaper change, and bathes with him nightly. He comes with a duckie and bottle of his own. The high chair back does not stay attached to the chair, but Pooh still sits upright and has enjoyed many meals with my daughter. Pooh is made from hard plastic and, sadly, his arm broke off when dropped by my husband this weekend. My daugher is handling the trauma OK, but we are getting her an new Pooh for her birthday because she loves him so much. I recommend it</review_text>
This train table is a nice size, bigger than I expected. It went together easily and is sturdy enough for my grandson's Thomas stuff. It seems to be made as well as what I saw at Toys R Us for double the price.</review_text>
I bought this for our grandson age 13 soon to be 14 and he was very pleased with it.  He did say that it was a little more difficult to put together but he did it and was very pleased with himself and with the results.  Thank you for  making this possible.  The price was right</review_text>
My son received the smartville ice cream shop for his first bday. he played with it all the time. We bought him the rest of the set for christmas. This is definitely his favorite toy. He is 15 months now and he plays with this set almost all day long. This is one of the best things I could have bought for him. He understands how it works by placing the characters on the round spots. I feel it will be a great teaching tool for when he is ready to learn the alphabet and his numbers</review_text>
this is a great item. Theres alot going on in such a  tiny little space. The detail is great,from the kraken that can make a boat disappear,to the bone cage.There's a collapsing bridge,a collapsing building,a trap door,runaway mill,and a cool magnetic boat race and more.It comes with Jack,Will,Norrington,and the cannibal chief,but no Davy.That was a little disappointing.But anyway its a fun item for all ages.</review_text>
I bought this high chair for my daughter's second birthday because I love the look of it. The similar chair made by Badger Basket Toys gets terrible reviews for being poorly constructed so I went with this one despite it having no reviews. I couldn't be happier. This high chair is solidly built and was easy to assemble. I love the white finish because it will be relatively neutral as my daughter's room may go through decorative changes in the coming years. I don't forsee her outgrowing this toy for quite a few years and it is sturdy enough to last. She has several dolls, the largest being her 17" Corolle Lila, who fits beautifully in the chair.  I would guess that this chair could possibly handle up to a 20" doll. While it is solidly built, I am obviously discouraging my daughter from sitting in the chair herself (I've caught her trying to several times) because no doll chair should be expected to be that sturdy! The only real negative is the joke of a chair pad. I actually just tossed it because it doesn't really add to the toy's play value anyway and would probably just be a nuisance. I highly recommend this high chair for the child in your life who enjoys taking care of babies. It's made me look to KidKraft for more toys and doll furniture</review_text>
My son has really enjoyed the play center. It was easy to assemble and it seems to be holding up well with several children playing on it at the same time</review_text>
Tried this for the first time at family gathering and enjoyed it immensely. Requires concentration along with some speed and causes lots of laughter. A great family game.</review_text>
I just got my tamagotchi last week and my cousin couldnt stop holding it. He fed and played with it everytime.It got sick every minute because my cousin kept feeding him.One day my cousin had wet hands and touched my tamagotchi toy.It died for a week I had to get it fixed.I wish you made the tamagotchi V4 waterproof.</review_text>
My son is currently 4 months old, and this is currently his favorite toy. He loves to watch it, hold it, and chew on it with his gums</review_text>
I purchased this at my 10 year olds request for a birthday present.  I was skeptical, but since it was the only thing requested, I bought it.  We've had it 4 weeks.  What a great pool toy!  Kids love it!  We have a 22 foot above ground pool, and it works fine.  I have bought floats for upwards of $25 dollars, so for the cost of the Wave Cruiser you can't go wrong.  It seems to be well built and sturdy.  I wouldn't hesitate to get on it.  Takes 8 "D" batteries that are in a water tight case.  It will tip over as will any pool float when the rider gets rowdy, but that seems to be part of the fun for the kids.  Overall great gift idea</review_text>
I bought this for my niece's 5th Birthday, and she loved it! My nephew (8) wouldn't leave her alone, he wanted to ride it. My brother-in-law got on it, and it actually moved him around. It is very durable, thick plastic looks like it will last a while. For the price, if it lasts this summer only, it is worth it</review_text>
It was impossible to find baby sunglasses in the winter until I found these stunning red infant shades.  A plus was there is a soft strap to keep the sunglasses on.  Our granddaughter looks like a movie star</review_text>
My daughter recv'd this from her grandmother for her third b/d and i think its alot cuter than in the picture. It has worked fine for my daughter she has figured out how to work it by herself and even has shown mommy how to turn it on once in awhile. she likes playing the cds with her name in them that her grandpa got her for her b/d.  The only thing i did wrong was let my daughter keep it in her room w/o me checking up on her, she went and poured some kind of liquid in the storage compartments so i had to take it away as punishment. I have forgotten about it until i seen this ad which now i think i will get it back out and let her play with it again. I have even played my cds on this while cleaning the kitchen and they sounded fine. My daughter has alot of the princess furniture in her room and this really matched and is very cute, and we have had no problems with this item so far. (knock on wood).</review_text>
I bought this CD player for my daughter's 5th birthday not expecting it to last a month. To my surprise it's worked wonderfully. She figured out how to operate it pretty easily and she listens to it every night before bed. We've had it for 6 months now with no problems.My favorite feature is the compartment for the CD's. It keeps them from being left lying around and getting scratched.</review_text>
DOND is a fun game, and we've had some lively sessions playing it.  There is an additional (we forget...we got rid of it!)...complicated thing that the game had, and made it "less fun" to play.You also have to disregard the 'suggestion' regarding "how" to give an Banker's Offer...it doesn't work, so you have to use your own judgement, to "jiggle it"...actually, this makes it even More fun!All-in-all...from 6 to 60, of we whom have played (if you follow the 'disregard' suggestions)...it's a 4-star fun.</review_text>
As always a pleaser! My girls, ages 9, 8 and 2 have about 8 other sweet streets. They play for hours with them.  I also bought her the  Shopping District and Movie Theater. They got a big kick out of the music the movie theater played.  I would highly recommend Sweet Streets Village gift set and all the other sweet street products!!!!</review_text>
My 2.5 yr old son loves this puzzle.  I help him put it together and he just loves the challenge and the construction equipment.  I like how tough the pieces are- they have held up even when stepped on and chewed on by a baby.  Very nice</review_text>
Very cute product and well worth the money.  My three year old loves all the things he can do with it in the bath tub</review_text>
This is a simple pirate ship tub toy with two backyardigans characters. My pirate enthusiasts (ages 6, 4 and 2) love it. It doesn't move or make noise, but it floats well and is sturdy. The best part is that the characters fit in the bottom of the ship for easy storage</review_text>
This was strickly a replacement for an old solver that I have had.Would not want to be without one as I am an avid crossword puzzlesolver.Many thanks for the prompt service I was given by Amazon</review_text>
The developers of this game did a great job coming up with questions designed to appeal to kids, questions like:If you could star in a movie, which movie would you choose?If you could eat only one food for the rest of your life what would it be?The questions range from simple to a bit more complex, so that kids who like challenges as well as those who don't will enjoy the game.Another thing: Although you can follow the rules and play this strictly as a board game, we used it while we were just sitting around the table having a casual chat. Sometimes the kids asked the question, sometimes the adults did...but we all learned more about one another...a LOT more...and many of the questions got us talking about family history, memories, etc. Lots of fun! It'd be great to take the questions along on a trip or while eating at a restaurant since they are surefire conversation starters but not so personal that anyone's "personal boundaries" will be invaded. Plus, there are no right or wrong answers and any information provided is strictly voluntary, revealing as much or as little as the respondent wants.One caveat: You will eventually go through all the questions so this game won't last forever...unless you are able to find new people to participate. If so, it be used for years. In terms of fostering family closeness without any threatening or off-limits questions (in short, everyone has to play nicely together) this is great!</review_text>
It says some silly things which might not make us laugh. but overall a cute toy and kids will like i</review_text>
I got this as a gift for my neece, she loves it, her parents love it too. She is now three years old, She got it last yr. for Christmas,...I was over to see her yesterday, and it still is like new. The velcro is very strong.. and it's a very safe toy.. Her baby brother, now is playing with it too, he is one yr. I recommend to all! Great buy.</review_text>
my 3 yo loves this - got it with a beautiful kitchen and she goes to town.It's east to use and she retends to make sandwichs and cut the fruit andveggies - very cute</review_text>
I bought this for my daughter for Christmas, three days before her first birthday. She loves taking the pieces out, banging them together and recently, putting them in the correct spaces! The size of the pieces is perfect for a young toddler and the knobs are the right size for her hands. Will definately look at Melissa and Doug puzzles for her again</review_text>
Imaginext Dinosaurs' T-Rex is quite simply fun to play with. The dinosaur not only is a great toy, with a lever underneath that reacts with the dino biting and yelping out a loud roar. It comes with a catapult with its respective stones (2) that the caveman (also included, with accessories) can operate, to save himself from the deadly bite of the dino.My 3-year old picked it up since he got it, and he hasn't let go</review_text>
My little boy is a certified dino-phile, to the point where he's had to teach me to pronounce several dinosaur names (ever tried saying Edmontonsaurus three times fast?). But, like any kid, his favorite remains the T-Rex, tyrant lizard king.When it comes to his numerous dinosaur toys, this is the most durable by far. Although we've had the same problems getting this to stand at times, as mentioned by another reviewer, that hasn't diminished my son's enjoyment.To top it off, he's come up with fun new uses for the toy, too. That catapult is VERY good at aiming at our family cat, much to my son's delight</review_text>
this toy looks great it has the house which kids love and the climbing par</review_text>
My son has played with these from 6 months old, and still likes them occasionally (18 months now).  The small car is nice for babies to shake.  They don't do much, but they are cute</review_text>
This is a fun toy, just a bit difficult to stack because of the narrow wheels. You can ask which one is biggest, what color is this car, ask about the numbers on the cars, etc... that is why I think it is educational to that respect. My son still has this, and is three years old and will play with it every once in awhile with his matchbox cars stacking them or just rolling them along</review_text>
I got this for my 2 year old for Christmas. It was a nice present, he enjoys it. 2 things though, it only came with 75 smaller balls so i had to purchase another 100 from somewhere else and the picture is misleading as to how big the item actually is. It could fit 2 toddlers in the pit itself and that would be max, and that is two 2-3 year olds. It is comparable though to other ball pits in size and he seems to enjoy the hoop and putting the ball through the hole in Big Bird's ice cream cone so i feel it was worth the money, especially since i didn't pay for shipping</review_text>
I got this for the price, $4.99.  I put it together 2 days ago and my 4 year old daughter has spent almost every waking hour playing with it.  The first thing she asks me in the morning: "Will you play Mermadia with me mommy? Pretty Please?"  The parts come off easily but do not fall off.  My daughter is a little rough on her toys but since the pieces of this are easily taken apart and put back together it is great for her.  She loves it.</review_text>
My 4 year old child loves this car! He spend a lot of time playing with it, and it's incredible all the functions and programing it has, and what he loves more it's his talking realistic mouth! Totaly recomendable</review_text>
I received the order in record time and in excellet condition. Saved time from trying to find it in a store loacally, and arrived right at my door step.Really cool item, my son loves it</review_text>
Every family, every party, every gathering of kids and adults or combinations of both will love this game</review_text>
My [...] really likes this train puzzle. He knows his alphabet and is able to pick out which puzzle piece comes next in line and attach it. It goes straight across and is over 10 feet long. There is also a picture with each letter on the piece and this has helped him with words beginning with that letter. He will say "Q quail" or "N nut" when he is putting the piece on. The pieces are easy to attach, thick and very sturdy. The pieces comes apart with no worry of ripping the picture off. This would make a really nice gift for a 2-4 year old. The box is also very nice to keep the puzzle in.</review_text>
My 3 year old son LOVES this puzzle and has played with it for over a year.  He likes to put it together over and over again, making a "train" across the floor.  It has really helped him to learn his alphabet, and I highly recommend it!</review_text>
Deductive reasoning at its best.  Awesome and absolutely brilliant.  I got this for my 8 year old daughter and my hisband and I have taken turns to play with her, and we have been late for dinner many times--- not anting to get up till we finish the game. I recommend it highly for parents who want to spend some quality time with their kids</review_text>
Yasmin, one of the super-stylin' Bratz Rock Angelz, is in my possession! So, I'm sorry my reviews go in to EVERY LITTLE DETAIL(as one customer complained), but that's how I do it! So if you haven't bought a ticket to info-town, either get the heck outta here, or buy one by reading this review. HERE GOES!First off, Yasmin has blonde streaks flowing through her dark chestnut hair. Just like the other Rock Angelz(Cloe, Jade, Sasha), Yasmin's hair is awesome quality;smooth, great duraility, etc. That feature makes her great for younger kids because her hair can get messed up many times, then smoothen out. Yasmin has the liveliest color eyes of the Rock Angelz; emerald green. This works as both a strikingly gorgeous feature and hot highlight to the doll. Her lip color, pink, really stands out on the doll. And of course, as most other Yasmin's do, she has the warm cocoa skin color. She has dark blush and sparkles above her eyes.I absolutely adore her chocker. It is too cute! I'd definately say that her jacket has a 70's-80's rocker look to it. It's definately the best piece of clothing on this doll. Just beware that it's difficult to fasten the velcro in the back. The velcro on my Yasmin doll's jacket is practically coming off! Underneath her jacket, Yasmin sports an undershirt labled 'Rock Angelz', with the ever-so-famous red glitter included. Her jeans have no rips or anything. They're just jeans with white stitching, red glitter, a chain half-belt, and little frayed bits at the hem. Now don't get the wrong idea! Just because this doll has a chain, leather, frays, and a belly-jewel(so not a tatoo!), don't go thinking, "Oh no! This doll portrays an image of bad things for our 'little' girls!" She's just a cute rock star singing inspiring songs and wearing totally appropiate clothing. Now, of course, if you still think this doll is innappropiate, it's not my place to order you to buty this doll. I just wanted to epress my opinion;this doll is safe. Anyway, her black guitar is in the same mold as Cloe's red one and Oriana's purplish one. It's a little difficult to position her guitar correctly, but not thouroughly impossible. Her second outfit consists of sparkly mini and rockin concert tee. Yasmin's ankle boots match with both outfits. And I love the fact that both outfits are mix-n-matchable! It rocks! Literally! Her accessories include:glasses, 2 sets of earrings, cell-phone-necklace, bracelets, star brush, lipstick, microphone/microphone stand, and totally-collectible displaying stand!You've outta have a rockin' time with this rockin doll! She's 100% worth the price($19.99)! Fortunately, I got her for Christmas. In my opinion, she's appropiate and meets the standards of ALL ages(notice I stressed on the 'all'). You're lucky if you get her! GREAT JOB MGAE!Chelsea&Yasmin(50% My Scene, 50% Bratz)over, & OUT!!!!!P.S.-END THE WAR!!!-#1 Peacekeeper(Hannah)12 YEAR OLD FAN OF MY SCENE, BRATZ, BARBIE, AND POLLY</review_text>
This set was one of the most fun builds I've done with Lego in a long time. As an adult fan of Lego, I highly recommend this set for its minifigures and part selection. They are excellent additions to any castle or general builder. As a builder, the final construction is impressive in size (18+ inches long), functionality (the rotisserie chicken is quite amusing), and playability (the sea serpent's posability and the incredible catapult alone are stunning). The catapult was my favorite part. After seeing the necrotic firing action of the Lego Exo-force Mobile Defense Tank's disk launcher; the rapid-fire, long-range Viking catapult is astonishingly fun to play with. The lone drawback in this set is the fragility of the ship's hull. It should be assembled on a hard surface (I tried to build it on carpet) and slid about on the floor, not carried (it will fold in half in the air). A few extra plate elements to reinforce the hull joints would probably improve this set</review_text>
The children in our after school program love this puzzle.  The colors are beautiful and they are learning about different sea creatures at the same time</review_text>
Our daughter received this puzzle for her 3rd birthday.  She's a puzzle nut!  This became an instant favorite and had to be left together for all to see.  The picture sheet in it labels all the sea creatures and it becomes a great way to discuss the different levels of life in the ocean.  The coloring is beautiful - Mom and Dad enjoy it as well.  It is extrememly well built, sturdy and can really be wiped off with a damp cloth.The only negative, as another viewer pointed out, is the darker bottom pictures.  Harder for young ones to distinguish designs and not as visually appealing.</review_text>
I bought this set for my son prior to reading the other reviews online but before I tried to set it up. I will admit in reading the reviews about how difficult some people thought it was to put together that they must be exaggerating...we'll apparently they were not.  I tried for 10 minutes and was covered in soap and nearly hurt myself trying to get the first two pieces together...so at that point I gave up and waited for my husbands help. The two of us spent nearly an hour banging the thing together with every tool we had(after we washed off all the soap b/c that just made getting the pieces to stay together impossible)and once we had the center base up I pushed it and it fell completely apart.  We got it back together but there was no way I felt it was sturdy enought to let my child anywhere near it.  So in desperation I called the ToysRUs store where I got it and spoke w/ the store manager. She assured me that this was not how it was supposed to be and that I should bring it back.  I wasnt thrilled about that b/c it wasnt the easiest thing to get home in the first place...but what choice did I have. I asked her if they would set the next one up for me to make sure it worked b/c I wasn't about to go through this again.  When I arrived at the store it was all set up and completely sturdy...exactly what I had wanted it to be when I had purchased it. Unfortunatly due to its size we had to take it back apart to get it home but once we did my husband had it back together in about 10-15 minutes with just a little banging from a rubber mallett...just like some of the other reviewers had said.  So the morale of the story is...if its miserable to put together then its probably defective and should go back...but once its together properly its great....now if my son would just show some interest in the darn thing all would be good with the world!</review_text>
My 6 year old loves this book.  Wanting to be like her sister she is learning spanish too!  This is a very well laid out book.  enhances the ability for young children to learn a second language</review_text>
My 3 year old son received this as a Christmas gift last year and he loves it.  He explores outside and collects things from the yard and hauls them around in the truck.  Must say the truck is durable, it stays out on the deck and the weather doesn't effect it.  We hose it down to clean it, no issues there.  Highly recommend</review_text>
I bought this for my girls when they were six months old and at two years they still like the colorful birds!  This is a great toy, well made and interesting.  This would also be a wonderful gift</review_text>
Our family loves this game.  It brings out the creative side of people of all ages and is very fun to play.  There are 5 catigories.  Movies, weird laws, initials, word meaning, dealers choice.  Everyone takes a turn orchestrating the game while the rest of the players make up ficticious answers.   Then that same person reads everyones made up answers along with the correct answer and you have to guess which is made up and which is the correct.  We played many times over Christmas with teenagers and gramdma too!  Everyone was having such a great time we didn't want the game to be over.  Turn off the TV, make some popcorn and re-connect with your family with this fun, no pressure to win game</review_text>
Balderdash is a riot!  It keeps my family in stitches!  My entire family is so full of bull we play this easily.  Playing Balderdash is a family tradition after Thanksgiving & Christmas dinners and everything in-between.  Anytime there is a family gathering the Balderdash game comes out!  My grown sons and their wives are full of bull, the grandkids are now joining in, but, it's tough to out bull the mother of bulls!  Gotta Love It!  Jan</review_text>
Every human should have one of these. Ideally, every human should have one of these in every size and color available. It doesn't get any better than Etch-a-Sketch. I have several of them in my office, and they're wonderful  for long meetings and work sessions</review_text>
This lovely new set depicts one of America's best-loved and most popular breeds.The beautiful dun mare with her sparkling white blanket was created using the "Duchess" mold.  Her alert expression and slightly wind-tossed mane is sure to make her a favorite with your young horse-lover.The sweet dark dun foal has his mama's lovely blanket and sweet face.  Created from the classic arabian foal mold, his thin legs make him a bit more fragile than mother.All in all, these two would make a wonderful addition to any little equestrian's collection</review_text>
and still loves it 7 months later!  He even takes it camping and plays for hours outside with it.  We are getting him more - his Dad likes to get in on it, too</review_text>
Our entire family loved the hand held game, as a matter of fact we ended up buying 5 of them total eveyone wanted one. I would highly recommend this item to everyon</review_text>
This is the best value I've seen for a dinosaur set. My sons love it, and several of my friends have gotten it for their own children after they've seen the kids playing with ours. The volcanoes, rocks and mat are a real plus, and the dinosaurs are big enough to be fun for the kids. They play with this set A LOT</review_text>
My son has been using this table for the last 3 months and absolutely loves it.  He also has the LeapFrog table, but gets bored with just one.  This table is on the opposite side of our (toy-filled) living room, and he will go over to this for a change of pace.  He loves Elmo and likes to hang on to his head and also mouth it.  He likes to use the phone, which he also mouths - just assume he puts his mouth on everything :) - and also the little bowl under Cookie Monster.  So why four stars and not five?  I do wish the base had a bit more weight to it, but he can easily pull up on it without getting the whole toy over although we've had a couple of near tips.  Also, the toy is a little less educational than I feel it could be since he is always accidentally setting off buttons with his arm...so he could be pressing the triangle with his finger, but his arm could press the Pig...and off Elmo goes oinking and singing about pigs.  Still a great toy, with lots of entertainment value, and as he matures we have less accidental set-offs.  I bought it on sale and it was worth the money</review_text>
My son got this toy for his first birthday. He's now 18 months and still loves it! When he first got it, he immediately began to dance to the music. You can press certain body parts on Ernie and then he sings about them (i.e. eyes, mouth, ears).My son can now identify his ears, mouth and eyes on himself. Great toy</review_text>
If you don't have this i feel bad 4</review_text>
At first it was confusing but after you get it, it is sooo much fun. And it's great for keeping your brothers out of the room</review_text>
This is fun. Not easy for 5 and under, but great for the rest of us. (7 - 65). Gave us alot of laughs</review_text>
BOUGHT THIS ITEM FOR MT SON, AND HE JUST LOVES IT.HE PLAYS WITH IT ALL THE TIME, FROM THE TIME HE GETS HOMEFROM SCHOOL UNTIL DINNER TIME, AND FROM AFTER DINNER UNTIL BED TIME</review_text>
i love the loop to hang elmo up to dry, and my now 14 month old enjoys drawing with the soap crayons, and chewing on them unfortunately.  not her favorite toy but enjoyed</review_text>
My son is a college student in Boston and excitedly brought this board game home on one of his breaks. "You've GOT to play this game!" he said. It had been years since anyone could even so much as coax me over to a table where a board game was being played. But I wanted to spend time with my son so I consented to learn it. Turns out, it was amazing! My husband, 13-year-old son, the bringer-of-this-new-addiction and myself must have played it 20 times in the 3 weeks he was home. The "board" is different every time you play it so nothing is predictable, rolls of the die dictate one's success, trading and strategies can get intense and the more you play it, the more you definitely like it. Alas! I've "settled" into Catan mode and no longer need to beg him to bring it home from school.  I bought my own house copy plus the expansion so we can get visitors hooked on it, too. We play it all the time. Cross my heart, this is fun. As my son said, "You've GOT to play this game!"</review_text>
This is a great puzzle!  My son is 2 1/2 and wants to put it together almost every day!  It is amazing to watch him, because every time we sit down on the kitchen floor to do this together he can do it more and more on his own!  And when we are done he is so proud of himself, I love it!  I am online right now looking for more just like it</review_text>
My 3 year old daughter got this puzzle for Christmas and she simply adores it. This is her fourth Melissa & Doug puzzle and I have to say she loves them all. As soon as she is done with one she puts it away and runs for another one. Keep making wonderful puzzles Melissa & Doug!</review_text>
I read some of the reviews posted on this site before I bought this Doll, I saw it on Ebay but was afaird because of some the comments that was posted about the doll and thought I should buy it directly in case I needed to  return it, But I had no problems at all other then the UBC cord the direction said to turn the cord one way when actually it is the other way, other then that I had no problem downloading anything and I can't wait to give this to my daughter for Easter</review_text>
My almost 5 year old daughter loves this toy.  It is easy for her to control.  My 8 year old thinks it is boring.I don't think it has any educational value.The controller has a long pointed antenna with a plastic rounded end, so the kids have to be careful not to poke each other with it.</review_text>
I am very pleased with this play food.  It is very realistic looking and a great size - not too big and not too small like some of the cheaper sets.  Definitely recommended and well worth the money</review_text>
I bought these for my nephew as a birthday present and he absolutely loved it. He has a number of other sets bu was very excited with the content in this one. They were exactly what he wanted</review_text>
Well the space is limated but I learned how to deal with it. The set comes with four parts rainforestchamber, bug chamber, aquarium , and ant colony. The aquarium comes with triop eggs or you can put a goldfish in. then we have ant colony which the air holes are a bit to big. Finally we have rain and bug chamber which to me are the best of all the four. the rain forest chamber can hold a small lizard or frog but since I bought this during winter I will have to wait till spring to catch a lizard. And we all know what you put in a bug chamber. Over all I rate this four stars due to small space. P.s there a bug catcher in it as well</review_text>
This is a great house,got it at toysrus,has six ring tones at doorbell,dog,knock knock,jibberish,fog horn,etc.,it's so easy to assemble.all you need is a helper(to enjoy assembly)and a power or ratchet screwdriver(you need both)the stove is a little tricky to start but once you start the hole you can use a power drill!your child will love it.Swinging door/window,spongebob chair fits inside(you can probably get a big screen TV in there!)Great for the price $129.0</review_text>
I purchased this house for my in home day care. So we have lots of toddlers playing with it! They love it! The only complaint I have is that the door falls off easily if the child pushes it instead of pulls it. But the kids all fit in there and even bring chairs. Even the one year old loves it! He likes to play peek a boo with the shutters. Lots of fun and well worth the money</review_text>
This playset is great - my son loves it.  You do have to be careful with the open sides - it is very easy to fall off.  My only complaint was puting it together.  The instructions are horrible and have no words - only pictures.  The parts are hard to tell apart (the color-coded bolt caps all look the same in the instructions) and the pieces are hard to handle.  Give yourself extra time to work through the instructions and get a couple of friends to help.  Also, a power screwdriver should be a required tool to get the screws into the plastic</review_text>
This is a single player game.  Set up the cars according to the diagram and try to get the ice cream truck out of traffic.  The puzzles start easy and progress slowly so that kids learn the maneuvering tricks without getting frustrated.  By the end, the puzzles are a challenging even for adults who have not played before.  Both kids love it- ages 4 and 9.  We helped the four-year-old learn the tricks by just asking "Whoes in that cars way?" Then "whoes in the trucks way?" until she reached the car that could be moved and work her way backwards</review_text>
I bought this game based on the reviews on Amazon and I am not disappointed.  Even my three year old enjoys this game and is capable of understanding the concept.  The beginner puzzles are right up his alley and the expert puzzles are challenging enough for me.</review_text>
When I got this house I was very impressed.Easy to put together.Bigger than I thought it would be and it is very realistic looking.My daughter enjoys this doll house</review_text>
I've bought this toy for my daugther ( she's 6 ) and she loves it, it's a good toy to use alone, to share with friends or even with her parents ( myself ). It's a good option to the computer, she also carries this toy with her stuff when she goes outside</review_text>
Not only is the 90's Game fun and enjoyable to play, but the questions and answers bring back lasting memories of movies, sports, TV shows and meaningful events from the decade.  Correctly answering questions by relating them to personal memories and experiences allows all players to relive their experiences from the 90's.  Whether you were a student, young adult or parent during the 90's, this game is sure to invoke sentimental feelings.  I highly recommend it for groups of friends and families</review_text>
I thought this product was very unique. It's not as advanced as Ipods which, is great for younger kids. Although, the only thing I didn't like was that it was a bit too small</review_text>
My 15 month old has been playing with this for a few months and really likes it.  He plays with it just about everyday.  Everytime we have kids come over to visit it seems to be a big hit too.  They all love trying to make baskets.The flaws are that it is loud and I wish the baseball and football did more or made noise.  They don't get played with as much as the basketball part since it sings and makes crowd noises.Overall it's great as long as it keeps the kids entertained!</review_text>
My son loves this toy.  It is the perfect height for my 14 month old (he got it when he was 12 months, and it was great then, too).  He can play with it sitting or standing.  He loves to make baskets, and I can teach him numbers as the scoreboard keeps his score.  He loves to spin the football, and he is starting to gain enough coordination to hit the ball with the bat.  He uses the bat it came with to hit other balls around the house.  This toy is a family favorite</review_text>
Amazon[.com] recommended this game for me, based on the fact that I love the game Set.  Unfortunately Xactika bears a strong resemblance to "10 to 1," a game played with a normal deck of cards.  If you already know how to play "10 to 1," Xactika may seem derivative.  After trying Xactika once or twice, we threw it in the drawer and just played "10 to 1" instead</review_text>
Bought this for my boy who just turned 11. Let's just say that he totally loved it and it was the first present he played with. Two blinking lights on weapon. One light on helmet which makes the eyes glow. A little pricier than other Bionicles but worth it. Not too hard to put together, just make sure you put all of the tiny pieces in a bowl or some such thing so you don't lose them while assembling the guy. The folks at LEGO are geniuses, sure it's a franchise, but they're doing a great job keeping it interesting</review_text>
I can't put it any better than the others before me have.  I did a lot of research before purchasing this train and am so glad I decided to spend a little bit more money for a TON more quality.  This is truly an heirloom train set that will be around longer than I will be (and I'm only 35).The other reviewers are also correct in advising that you shop around before purchasing this train set.  The prices vary wildly.Yes, it hurts a little to spend this kind of money on a train set when you know there are others out there.  However, the others are cheaper for a reason... they're junk.  You simply can't do better than this set</review_text>
I bought this game for my mom for christmas and we played it...right now it is in my game closet because I introduced this game to my poker friends and now we have "PIT" night instead of poker night. We can not stop laughing when we play this game. We bring this to all get-togethers and everyone loves it.I had to buy my mom a new PIT game because I take it all the time. This game is soooo much fun, the more people you play with the more fun it is!!! GET THIS GAME!!</review_text>
Very complete with a lot of things to play for hours. My daughter still plays with it, and she is now four years old. Definitely it was worth it. Highly recommended</review_text>
My 2 year old and 4 year old love this playdoh set.  I recommend it highly</review_text>
This is such a great toy for kids and parents. We play play doh for hours. The barrel is a great toy. All the item inside are really well made and they have a lot of cute shapes. This really is somethig fun for kids and parents to enjoy together.</review_text>
My girls love the sandbox!  The only thing my husband and I don't like is that you cannot move it once the sand is in it.  We thought we'd be able to, but the walls are just flimsy enough that you can't.  Otherwise, a great purchase</review_text>
I bought this sand box for my son's 1st birthday. He has had the sand box for a month and loves it. It looks really nice in our yard and the top has kept out rain and bugs. I was going to go with a cheaper sand box, but now i'm glad i spent the money. This is a very good product!</review_text>
This game is so much fun!!! I do think that maybe it could use a few more games or maybe make different difficulty levels. In other words... If you are a huge Star Wars fan like me, then you will love this game!!! It will keep you occupied for at least an hour a day if you are determined to beat a certain level. Another thing I think it could use is maybe a game-save function or something... Anyway, GREAT GAMING EXPERIENCE!!! One and a half thumbs up!!!</review_text>
This is an excellent gaming system containing five acrade classics, Ms. Pac Man, which plays as close to the arcade as you can get, Pole Position, which the Joystick turns as a stearing wheel, again close to acrade action, Mappy, where you are a mouse trying to get a cat on the loose in a museum (much like original mario brothers), Galaga-an updated space invaders type game with more difficult ships to hit, and finally Xevious, where you are commander of a ship blowing up attaching enemies over land and see (plays like Tiger Heli for nintendo, or other games like this).  I use this on my old call room tv with mono av jacks available, works great, passes the time with family friendly games. These games are much better than some of the new expensive games.  check this out, you will be pleasently surprised, and for around 6-12 dollars, good deal. Runs on 4 AA batteries, then plug and play</review_text>
My son got this for christma when he was 10 months old. From day one he loves to push it around the house. He's 13 months old now and he can  get on to ride it. His friends love it also.</review_text>
Someone gave these to us when my son was 9 months old. He loved holding them and it has been fun watching him learn to "color" and develop his hand-eye coordination. He is now 22 months old and we've just used them up and I had to buy the Crayola tub crayons because I couldn't find these at Toys R Us. The Crayola crayons are thinner (which doesn't hold up as well to toddler abuse) and have more colors, but I like these better because they come with the ducky sponge to wash the crayon off the walls (my son loves that part, too). These crayons are a surefire way to get my son into the bathtub</review_text>
The nephews loved it.  We sent it to them along with other gifts for Christmas.  Turns out the twin 8 year olds found this to be their favorite gift.  The light up part was pretty cool but they did have some trouble bouncing the ball.  When the lights went out the fun really happened.  Everything went well even when it turned into tackle-basketball.  Not their mom's favorite sport but no harm... no foul.</review_text>
This hoop is tight, but wene you shoot it makes a ton of noise. If your planing on buying this be aware of a lot noise. Also the hoop, and the net sometimes come off</review_text>
This Eeyore is so much fun.  I gave it a 4 because the little butterfly is too easy to lose, but if Mom and Dad are diligent to keep the part with the toy and teach Baby to keep them together, I think there is also something to be learned with this, plus the fact that he is so DARN cute and the little voice is sweet and soothing. "GOOD NIGHT BABY."  Just precious.  Baby quickly learns that Eeyore only works with the butterfly rattle.  I thought the ears would be easy to break, but they have taken a lickin' from my grandson and still work.    Nana Ka</review_text>
My 2 year old daughter (and our 4 & 6 year old neighbors) LOVE this toy!  I had it up during my daughter's second birthday party and all the kids loved it!  It holds up very well and I have only had to refill it once (and that was only because one of the kids managed to pull out the plug).  Some of the balls are not 100% inflated but they still roll just fine and my daughter has the best time with this.  It is up in the living room and not outside so that keeps it from getting any other holes.  I would recommend this for any kids around 4 or under.  The one thing to keep in mind; the kids may be afraid of it at first; my daughter was terrified of it the first day but by the second she loved it and now she spends a lot of time in there</review_text>
Sooo cute.  Santa gave my 7 y.o. daughter the dog and cat versions of this game.  She and I have already spent several hours playing with her "pets".  Unlike the earlier pets, there is more to do than just care for your pet.  There are games, activities and interactions with pet friends.  There is a whole village of homes and places to visit.You collect stickers throughout your adventures.  For instance there are 29 stickers available for making friends.  It is represented by a heart sticker.  Everytime you collect a sticker, you are taken to your sticker book and it indicates how many stickers are available and how many you have obtained.There are three exterior buttons for use to play with, groom and feed your pet.  When your pet ignores you, it means it is time for grooming, playing or eating.Sometimes your pet will suddenly disappear and then reappear at their potty mat having left a little undesirable.  My daughter thinks that is hilarious.  Kids!The only drawback is that the screen does not light up for play while travelling after dark.  Maybe they'll improve upon that in the next versions</review_text>
The game pieces are very good quality. I found the cards to be challenging. The game was well worth the money.</review_text>
My 2yr old got this one and another Imaginext Dinosaur for Christmas and this one is by far his favorite. He loves attaching the cart to the Mammoth and moving them around.The reason why I give 4 stars instead of 5 is because the button to push down on to make the noise is not real easy. When you think it's pushed down all the way, you have to push a little harder to get it to make noise. Also, like the last reviewer I think the wooly hair is going to attract dirt and not stay very clean. But overall the toy is fun and very durable</review_text>
These coins are nice and heavy... they have a good feeling when you hold them or keep them in the pouch.  My son uses them like Jack Sparrow does in the movie so he doesn't die in our play battles.  However, they seemed rather expensive after buying them and having them shipped.  It would be cheaper to use silver dollars or other real US currency that is large and heavy</review_text>
My 6 & 8 year olds sons received this toy for Christmas. They are HUGE Pokemon fans so just the fact that it has Pokemon pictures on it made the toy worth it. Fortunately, it also happens to be fun to play. 2 to 4 players try to allow the fewest balls possible past their own paddles. The fewest points wins. Each player has their own scorekeeper for up to 5 games. Setting up the game after every round gets a little tedious, however it's not so bad if everyone helps. The 2 best things for me are that I don't mind playing (unlike the actual Pokemon cards which are a boring nightmare for me!) and it doesn't require batteries!! My 3 year old daughter likes to play too although she loses every time. We just don't tell her.If your kids like Pokemon, this is a good toy</review_text>
My 4 year old son loves all things Rescue Hero!  His grandparents got the MACC for him almost a year ago now.  I run an in home day care,so I watch not only my son but 2 other 5 year old boys and my youngest son, 13 mo and a 10 mo old boy!  They all love it!  This thing has stood up to all of their adventures! One of the kids I watch was thrilled when he got the same MACC for his birthday from his parents!  He had just went on and on about it, and they couldn't resist.  It is very large, but we already had the firetruck, police car, helecoptor and about 30 rescue heroes, so,in the words of my son, we just HAD to get this too!  I highly recommend this toy for all ages!  Great imaginary play</review_text>
This toy was an instant success with my son, who is six. He figured out how to put together the track in minutes. Unlike other construction toys, Skyrail is not limited to one or two designs. My son can create endless configurations, including loop-the-loops that really work. This toy is also easy to disassemble. The track and connectors seem a little flimsy, but so far -- after many, many uses -- none of the pieces has broken</review_text>
When I was a little girl I stood along beside the table and watched the adults play. This was how I learned how to play the game. I have now been playing rook for about eight years and loved the style of cards shown above (90's style). Unfortunately, they have changed the style of the cards on us and I would like to purchase the 90's style. If any come availible to purchase please be sure to email me and inform me of this so that I can buy some. I really dislike the new style of cards and all of my friends and family agree with me</review_text>
Just as promised.  Our son loves the Wiggles plate, bowl and cup!  Perfect</review_text>
As usual, this is another quality product from Power Wheels. The fit and finish is perfect and the overall quality is excellent. The only upgrade I can advise is to buy the Power Wheels 12V quick charger for the battery</review_text>
We bought our youngest son the pirate ship seven years ago when he was four. He is now eleven, and is asking for this new updated ship. He has played with the old one for years, outside in the pool, inside, along with the big king castle, and countless other sets that we have. Yes, Playmobil. is delicate, and young children can be taught how to play with it, there are alot of small pieces, but like Lego, it will and does encourage a child's imagination, rather than stifle it.  We have Castles, western forts, city sets, boats, all of it! It does take time to put together, but some of the best memories are of me and my boys putting together some of these intricate playmobil sets the day after Christmas! When you buy toys for your kids, don't look at a toy and say "what does it do", rather look at a toy and ask "what can my child do with this toy"? Playmobil has been one of the toys that my three boys have stayed with along with legos well past Christmas, much more, than anything else. I am keeping all of our collections for our grandchildren.</review_text>
I purchased this pirate ship for my son's fourth birthday. This is by far the most popular toy in our house! My 8 year old son and 6 year old daughter also love this toy. There are so many items that come with the ship - from canon balls, swords, treasure chest full of goodies, food, animals and even jewelery for the pirates - they are never bored. My four year old plays on his own, or with his friends, and when all three are home they all play together. Definitely worth the investment for the amount of joy this toy has brought to our home!</review_text>
My 6-year-old got this for Christmas and he and his 4-year-old brother love it!  They enjoy doing the battles and coming up with different monster combinations.  It teaches strategy since they have to figure out which combinations work best.  My kids also like to just play with the figures by themselves like action figures.  A piece of advice though:  This game only comes with 2 figures so you really must buy additional figures or it won't be much fun since the point is to create varying combinations.  Therein lies the problem - or at least MY problem!  I can't find the extra figures for this thing!  Luckily, they were available around Christmas so I got some then, but now I can't find them in stock anywhere.  Also, I have not had any durability problems although I had some sound quality problems on the 2nd day.  Fortunately, it turned out that all I needed was new batteries. You really need alkalines for this game.  Overall, it's what my boys think though and they ADORE this!!!</review_text>
Not only will this be a fun gift for our 5 year old grandson, it will be a fun gift for our 65 year old brother-in-law!  Quite realistic looking!    It works great on smooth surfaces, but doesn't do well on carpet. Our dogs got a big kick out of it</review_text>
There are always problems with an any type of bed, even an inflatable one. I am actually 21, but I don't have a credit card so I had to use the kid review instead.This bed is great. Of course there are problems, but they don't outweigh the good that the bed has. It is great to sleep on, you can carry it on trips, you can have it on another bed that is in one place, or on the floor. I do admit, it is somewhat hard to set up, but it is worth the effort, for the sleep is unparralleled. I sleep on it every night and I have had no problems with it at all. I recomend this bed to be for ages 5 to adult because of the gap it has between the side and the mattress. What is the most important thing of all is this: Is the person you bought it for happy with it</review_text>
we love the accessories this item comes with but the doll itself is... we have mixed feelings about her.  my daughter, 4, loves her hair because it's so different from all her other barbies, but she hates her feet.  her feet are way too big, even bigger than ken's (my daughter tried making her wear ken's shoes but it didn't work).  another thing we love and hate about her is that her hands can move like pregnant midge (good), and she has a bigger body than most barbie dolls (bad because she can't use the other doll's clothes)</review_text>
I originally bought this monkey on vacation.  I showed it to my son and he grabbed it and hugged it.  How could I not buy it for him doing that?  It was so soft and cuddly and the feet are like beany babies.  I eventually ordered a 2nd one from Amazon for my parents house.  So now I don't have to drag it from house to house.  As he gets older, he is liking it more and more</review_text>
My 5 year old daughter got this monkey when she was little and has slept with it every night since.  My 1 year old daughter loved her big sister's monkey so we had to get her one of her own.  She loves it and sleeps with her monkey every night now</review_text>
I got this for my 15 month son. HE REALLY LOVES IT! He doesn't use it as a ride-on yet (more fun will await!), but he pushes the car from the back handle everywhere inside & out. there are alot of buttons which make sounds and some have the car talk back. The "oil change" sounds are his fav. HE also enjoys the toy phone(when you put it in the slot it rings and the car answers!) There is also a small storage section under the seat.. The only thing I wish it did have was a horn sound instead of one of the many car's sayings. For the price it is a great interactive toy!! And for a boy who usually is not big on his toys for very long, this still captures his attention months afterward!.oh, and this toy can take a beating! No complaints whatsoever! A great find</review_text>
I run an afterschool program.  This game is a big hit with the 3rd through 5th graders.  They play it so much I bought an extra game in the tin.  They can't get enough of it</review_text>
This is a quality product.  Good detail. Holds air well, ready to blow up and hang from attached loop. An excellent buy</review_text>
I bought this for my children's room which has an outer space theme.  The planets are nicely done and look great.  No, they don't glow in the dark all night long... but who wants their kids room lit up all night anyways?!?!  They certainly glow long enough for both of my boys to fall asleep!  We have a round ceiling light which I put triangular "rays" around which is now our SUN.I'm giving this 4 stars ONLY because I agree about the sticker stars... yeah... they kinda stink.  BUT, the plastic glow-in-the-dark stars are easy to find (I've even seen them in pharmacy's) and inexpensive.  We put up 2 packages of the plastic ones and added the sticker stars from the package.  It gives the effect of stars which are closer and farther away!!</review_text>
The 3-D Solar System is great.  I rated it 5 stars because I knew there was no sun, so this product was exactly what I expected.  Easy to hang up, glows well, my 6 year old son is very happy with it!  A sun would be nice, but still well worth the money</review_text>
This is the ultimate in home laser tag fun.  It has great range and accuracy for hours of exciting but harmless fun.  Get your kids away from the TV games and into the real (figuratively speaking) thing.If you have, two kids make sure you but at least 4 guns.  Once you receive them, you'll experience the need for the two extra guns.  Everyone who sees them will want to play.Great toy, thanks Amazon.</review_text>
I just got the Laser Tag Master Blaster a few days ago and I love it.I've had my eye on it ever since I got the Deluxe for my B-day back in September. I was looking on Amazon so frequently for the price to drop that I got tired of watching so I stopped for a few months.Then spring came and I got into playing laser tag again with my little brother. I was suddenly filled with an urge to buy the LTMB. I looked back on Amazon and...BOOM! 60 percent off! 20 BUCKS!I told my mom and dad about it and they said that I could get one. So the next day we began the ordering process on Amazon, through Toys R Us. We checked the shipping charges and...BAM! 15 greens!So we just figured on our next trip into town we could just go to Toys R Us and see if it would be the same price. It was (minus the 15 bones for s&h). So we picked up a few and went home.After reading the instructions a million times and doing a few tests I finally figured out how they work. I also found out that they are very much like the Deluxe, except for the shoulder stock, the sights, the fully automatic feature, the 3 shot burst, the shot range, the text messages, and who could ever forget the rocket.Let me explain the Laser Tag Master Blaster to you: This large tagger is much better for a very large playing field. The Deluxe and the IRT-2X models are better for smaller areas.The LTMB's laser has a shot range of up to one thousand feet. The laser has three different shot types: the single (fire one shot), the 3-burst (fire a burst of 3 shots, no overheatage), and the fully automatic (fire non-stop).You can also send text messages (up to 10 characters long) to your teammates and opponents. Retreat...Behind You...Gotcha...Ouch!The rocket is awesome. Just load, pump, and launch, simple as that. With just twenty pumps the rocket can sail over forty feet, blasting everyone in a 15 to 20 foot radius.There is a lot more to the LTMB but it would take to long to type, so you'll just have to figure it out for yourself.</review_text>
This product was highly recommended by a school teacher in the UK as a great teaching tool.  It was well received as a gift by the children and their parents. An excellent math teaching tool that the children love.  It is portable, user friendly and has something for those on many different levels, so much so that one father, an engineer, loves to play the game by himself when travelling and is equally enjoyable to his 7 year old son, as well as a game that they can play together.  Math Whiz is a tool that creates a friendly math experience which can be used for many years as the upgrading levels will remain a challenge</review_text>
I bought this for my nephew's first birthday and my sister told me that he loves it.  When he gets up from a sleep it is the first thing he wants to play with and with him being at the stage where he is trying to stand up; it is a great motivator to encourage him to stand.  Your kids will love this toy and the sounds and lights will keep your child amused for hours</review_text>
...and they are working out great with our Thomas Layouts.  Melissa & Doug products continue to impress me with their high quality and typically provide great educational value.  These are educational and your children will learn things like Police Station, Fire Station, Hospital, School, Town Hall, Grocery Store, and Post Office.  There are several different shapes too, including squares, rectangles, triangle, and the various signs.  The buildings and most of the roof pieces only have the building design on one side.  The trees, ambulance, fire truck, and mail truck are large and double sided.  The various street signs, and passenger cars are a little small, and as the box states ages 3+ and up, I would consider these smaller pieces a choking hazard.  The larger pieces are enjoyed by both my 1 yr old and my 3 yr old.  The rectangles are the largest piece in the set and measure 4 3/4 by 2 1/4" approx.  Squares are roughly 2 1/4 x 2 1/4".  These blocks are not as heavy as I expected, but still nicely made, and bright colorful additions to playsets like Thomas/Brio train sets.  If your children don't insist on the real thing, this is a great way to save some money and still buy a quality product.The only drawback is the wooden storage box doesn't come with a sliding plexi cover like the Melissa & Doug pizza set or beading set does.  That would be really nice for storage and secure those little pieces that we don't use</review_text>
This game is very easy to learn.  Each of the 16 playing pieces has 4 attributes, height (tall & short), color (white and brown), shape (circle & square), and hollow/solid.The goal is to get 4 of the same attributes in a row (for example, you could have 1 tall white circle, 1 short white circle, 1 tall brown circle, and 1 short brown circle in a row, and that would be a winning set because they are all circles, even though they vary with respect to the other attributes).The catch is that your opponent picks the piece you have to place on the game board.This game is similar to SET, in that you are trying to make winning patterns across several attributes.  It is different because you are also trying to block your opponent from making winning patterns.I do wish this game were less expensive so that more people can enjoy it.  Not everyone can drop $30 for a game.  It is a beautifully made wooden game, but it would be just as much fun if it were made of something inexpensive and priced under $10.Nevertheless it is a game worth owning. And, for trivia buffs, this game was futuristic enough to appear in an episode of Star Trek Voyager :)</review_text>
This game is very exciting for my son, he is five, I am teaching him to read his blends and this is a great reinforcer. I enjoy watching him do the math (one with the coins) as well as watching him make words.</review_text>
It is fun!  And most importantly educational. It has a game where you have to put the exact amount of money in the game slot.  My kids like that part. They are 6 and 7 and ask me all the time if they can play their spongebob game, we are a two leapster family but they have to share their cartridges.  Next year my youngest will want one too, I am sure, as she wants to play theirs,but she is just too little yet, another year she will be 4 so will check into getting her one of her own then..</review_text>
I don't know why poor Scrat got so many bad reviews. My kids absolutely LOVE this toy. They laugh hysterically every time and they're 4 1/2 and 7. He does have a tendency to fall down and doesn't scoot very well. But the laugh factor alone makes this well worth the money.</review_text>
Ok, this toy does not deserve 5 stars but the other reviews were far too harsh.  The first 30 minutes of my chihuahua terrified by this thing were worth the price.  As a stuffed animal it's very cute but not too cuddly because it's hard plastic under the fur.  I love scrat in the movie and the sounds this thing makes are quite funny at first but the do get boring soon unless you have a family pet to terrorize like I do.Here's another trick.  Put Scrat on a pillow with your hadn behind him so you can make him move and wiggle his tail without being seen, then have someone bring in the family pet.  When I lunged at the dog's feet he screamed as being run through a meet grinder.  This may sound cruel but I assure you the dog was not hurt and now enjoys showing Scrat who's the boss whenever we turn him on</review_text>
My nephew Cooper put on his superman suit right away.He especially liked the suit is inflatible.  Good choiceand excellent price</review_text>
Makuta is Sooooooo cool! I love his giant staff/pitchfork.I think he is one of the best Bionicles there is! Probably the only thing that stands in his way is the exo- body special Bionicle</review_text>
My three girls ages 3 to 7 liked this toy when added to their pretend food collection. We didn't use it as a game. You can place the different frosting and sprinkle combination pieces onto the different colors of donuts to make different varieties. Each would take a turn 'ordering' types of donuts and the others would 'make' them. Yes, the frosting won't stay on if the donut turns over but fits in easily and works great on a plate for pretend play! Box is flimsy but we just keep all the pieces in our general play food bin so not an issue. Would buy this again. Great for kids with imaginations</review_text>
Puchased for my grandoughter who is 5 years old. She liked very much playing the puzzle. Only thing we didnot like the quality of side parts gone bad very quickly.</review_text>
I was very pleased with the light sabers, I gave them to my two grandsons for Christmas and they loved them, they were made very well, my grandsons are 7 and 5 years old and they played pretty rough with them, they had lots of fun with them</review_text>
I have been in love with this game ever since I first played. It was a favorite at choir parties over the holidays in Chicago. Since I have moved, I keep one copy at my permanent address and another at my vacation home. It is great for all ages. We are very loose with the rules and find teams the most fun. It doesn't matter who wins. As long as we play, play, play...we laugh, laugh, laugh!</review_text>
I was recently in the play Alladin, and whenever there was a break, the whole cast would gather to play "Encore."  We used songs from the musical we were in-and talk about a boatload of laughs! It's a blast!  Everyone loves it, because everyone gets involved, and has a great time.  This is a fabulous party game!  Buy it now</review_text>
i wrote some reviews of lila doll saying she is my favorite but this one is extremly pretty. her face is so pretty and all her clothes and cute. i say diffrent, i say that lila is better than polly! lila also comes with a cute horse and carrige. wow how can you think spending 25 dollars on polly will be better when you can spent less than 10 dollars on lila and get a real cute and worth-the-money doll</review_text>
Most Old Skool fans are angry he's not a VW Beetle anymore. I kinda never liked beetles anyway, so Im happy with the new unlicenced thing. It looks like a mix of a MINI and a Peugeot. He transforms better than most, the picture does'nt do him justice, it makes him look stiff. Actually, for how bulky he is, he's amazingly bendable, I particularly like that his "door/shields" are'nt attached to his arm, their on a cuffling that rotates so they wont be too awkward like many of the others with "door/shields". The Jetski Jetpack adds an unneeded extra flair to an already awesome robo mode. And as an extra retro touch It has a tempurture sensitive decal on his chest/top of the car that must be held for a minute before it will reveal the autobot logo [just like his original 80s version]. I DO wish he had come with some sort of weapon, but I have a few other transformers from this same generation that don't really need BOTH that THEY came with. What's even MORE awesome for me is that I bought this at the grocery store, as one of the very few toys they had in thier christmas section, for $10 if your looking for just any ONE good transformer, bumblebee is a good choice. If you have Optimus, this one looks great standing beside him. Transformer fans Don't Delay, pick this one up! I can't wait to see movie's camaro bumblebee in july</review_text>
I was very pleased with this product, it covered the back seat and has a handy little pocket to put bottles,wipes,dipers in. I have brought another two for the other car</review_text>
My daughter purchased this with Christmas money and it did not work at all. We reported this to Amazon and they took care of immediately. I was very impressed! Now we have a new toy that she loves that works great. It is fun to play with and a storage container when she's finished.</review_text>
My 8yo dd received this for her bday. She loves it. It has lots of storage space insde for all her Polly Pocket goodies. It's also quite sturdy. One of the levels got bent the wrong way and I was able to put it back and it still works</review_text>
A "Jewelry Box" for your little girls polly pocket accessories. My daughter received this as a gift for Christmas and loved it!  Would be perfect if it was just a little bigger but is definitely worth the money</review_text>
It's amazing how much a child learns by having access.  We are an American family living in Germany and felt my 5 year old would have a greater understanding of where we live and where our extended family lives</review_text>
Even though I'm convinced that all monitors work differently in different locations, this model has treated us well.  We got this monitor (with dual receivers) for my first daughter 3 1/2 years ago and it was always clear & crisp.  Reception was perfect in the basement, in the frontyard, in the backyard...even at the neighbor's house.  One of the receivers konked out after about 2 years but we survived with only one.  The second receiver finally stopped working last week & after doing waaaaayyyy too much internet research, I decided to go with the same, trusty, inexpensive monitor and it works great!  I've never slept with a monitor in our room (because our babies stay with us for a long time) so I don't know about nighttime quirks.  I keep the monitor in our kitchen area to listen for the little one waking up from naps....and to spy on the girls when they play upstairs without me. :)  Baby #3 is on the way & I'm sure this monitor will last another 3 years until we don't need it anymore.  So, $40 over the course of 3 children isn't bad!</review_text>
My husband and I travel a lot and someone told us about this on one of our last cruises.. We actually watched 2 people playing it as well. So my husband actually remembered the name of this game and got this for me for a Christmas gift. Surprised me!!We plan on taking it with us on all our trips. We will be able to use iton cruises, on planes, wherever we may have to play the waiting game. We know its good for 2 people on up!!! It seemed like a fun game</review_text>
I received this promptly and in time for vacation.  Was great for the kids in the car.  They loved the stencils that came with the board.  Many hours of fun.  They like that they can make skid marks with the Lightning McQueen car</review_text>
I bought this for my 5-year old daughter. She really enjoyed using it and actually enjoyed the challenge of having to figure out the answers in the shortest time possible. The different levels of difficulty are useful so she can keep using it over the years</review_text>
My son absolutely adores all his Thomas the Tank Engine stuff. What can I say? Edward the Blue Engine is a fine addition to any child's collection</review_text>
I BOUGHT THIS DOLL FOR MY 5 YEAR OLD GRANDDAUGHTER. SHE LOVE'S THIS DOLL AND TAKE'S IT WITH HER EVERY WHERE SHE GOES.PEOPLE ALWAY'S MAKE A REMARK HOW MUCH FUN THE DOLL IS EVEN GROWN UP'S WANT TO PLAY WITH IT.JUST MAKE SURE THE CHILD YOU GIVE IT TO IS THERE WHEN YOU SET HER UP, BECAUSE THE CHILD WILL HAVE TO ANSWER THE QUESTION'S THAT ALLYSEN ASK'S.SETTING HER UP WAS VERY EASY.SHE TRUELY IS A INTERACTING PLAYMATE.I WOULD HIGHLY RECOMEND THIS DOLL</review_text>
Bought this one recently for my eight year old (and myself) to enjoy and it truly took only a few minutes to explain it to him and we were off and loving it.  More challenging than checkers and less complicated than chess makes it a very accessible game for an eight year old yet not too easy or complex such as can be the case for those two aforementioned games.  I highly recommend it as it can help your child in a number of ways in terms of concentrating and focusing, thinking spatially, understanding the consequences of a move or moves, and introducing the concept of strategy</review_text>
My six month old grandson loves these toys!  They are perfect for the teether and he loves the colors and noise.  They hold his attention for much longer than some of his other toys.  They are easy for him to hold and shake.  I would buy them again in a minute.</review_text>
My son and I thoroughly enjoyed assembling and learning about how robots work. This kit may be frustrating for one adult or child to assemble. The screws require more 'adult strength' (he would start them and I would finish) and some of the instructions might need at least 3 hands to hold and assemble. But hey, that is why it was so enjoyable - we did it together! It is fun now to watch him play with it and tell everyone 'my Dad and I built this'</review_text>
Samantha is 13 months and walking. She enjoys pushing the baby around in the stroller.  She thinks she is a big girl.  She pushes her baby, her elmo, and any animal we ask her to take for a walk.</review_text>
I love the upstairs.  It is so fun.  Because it has an upstairs, you can move up a level twice as fast.  It is more fun to play when you also have the Love 2 Shop Malls.  (quoted from my 10 year old daughter</review_text>
Breyer makes such authentic lifelike replicas of the worlds most beautiful horses.  My daughter is in horse heaven.  The detail is so accurate that my daughter noticed even the footpad of the horses were unique to each one</review_text>
This is a very handy product to have around for our 3-year old if the batteries happen to die while traveling.  The AC adapter is a life-saver for long car trips.Just as an aside note, the adapter does NOT look like the one in the picture.  It is gray-and-orange, like the adapters you seen in the store</review_text>
This is my daughters first "real" baby doll. She is almost 2, and I have never seen her love another toy like this one. She loves to give the baby kisses and feed her with the bottle it comes with, and I bought an extra outfit so she can change the baby for bed. This doll is really pretty compared to other baby dolls I have seen lately. The skin is a very soft, nice feeling plastic with a cloth torso, and smells like sweet baby powder! I was pleased when I was able to wipe off dirt that was on the dolls hand really easily. I love all the accessories that you can get for the Little Mommy dolls too. I highly recommend this one</review_text>
We recieved this bed as a hand-me-down from a friend's child who used it until he was eight (would not give it up sooner). My son recieved the bed at two-years-old and is now four. This bed is durable! The bed we have is twelve years old and looks brand new. It is so easy to wipe clean. My son feels that his bed is special and just adores it. He sees "regular" beds other places and feels so proud that his bed is a blue race car. I have a feeling he'll want to stay in this bed until his feet are hanging off the end. Five stars</review_text>
I brought this toy to aid my two-year old in learning how dress</review_text>
I think I missed the boat on this one; I bought it for xmas for my 13 month old and the only real play it gets is when my daughter and her 3 year old brother take off the "play top" and sit inside it!  They think thats fun but thats about it</review_text>
I purchased this as a Christmas Gift for my 1 year old nephew.  Very pleased with the online price through Toys-R-Us and Amazon.com, it was $50.00 less than in a retail store!  Very prompt shipping, had to be put together but not difficult with common household tools.  Very nice quality wagon, top of the line and well worth the money.  Rubber tires give a more comfortable ride for small children.  I also purchased the pad set.  Fits perfectly, looks great nad comfy ride, but be sure to purchase the pad set for the Model #29 All-Terrain Cargo Wagon (BP-29), as other pad sets will not fit!  Very nice onverall. Don't hesitate to buy!</review_text>
you can purchase this item at most any Walmart or K-mart ETC...for $4.99 or cheaper..toywiz is ripping people off!!!</review_text>
These books have all been wonderful tools that my son has not only enjoyed very much, but they've helped him make needed improvements with many academic skills. This on encourages reading and it's another great example of a fantastic and useful interactive product</review_text>
I had to buy my 4 year old a new Leap Pad after his old one wore out.  He is currently obsessed with Spiderman so I grabbed this one.  I didn't realize it came with the Spiderman book I was going to buy him soon anyway (saved me $15)!   So far the new Leap Pad and Spiderman book have been a huge hit!</review_text>
this elmo item is pretty cool. if ur child is an elmo fan then im sure you know how annoying these elmo doll/ toys can be.. oh jeez the voice is so loud and it echoes.!!! however this one is far less annoying than the rest because he hums when you plug his mouth -- im srry i meant ta say when you give him his pacifier (lol)-- you just hear an adorable hum sound. Overall this is a cool gift. Theres is an off button I only wish there was a lower volume button for early morning play</review_text>
we have hardwood floors so i bought this together with Playzone.  i'm pleased with these mats --these made it safe for the frequent falls my baby went through when he was learning to crawl and pull himself up.   now i put these mats beside his bed, softening his occasional 'dreamy falling off' his bed</review_text>
This wagon was easy to put together.  We use it frequently when picnicking outdoors and going to the park.  It is big enough for my 2 year old to lie down and take a nap.  It was also large enough to hold our lunch cooler and my daughter.  It is very easy to pull around and is very durable</review_text>
We absolutely love this wagon! My 2yr old will ride as long as I want to walk, stop, detour, whatever...she's glued! It is huge & on the heavy side. But also huge(you can carry so much/many children)w/ great quality & durability. I can easily see us w/ this wagon for years to come & would suggest it to anyone comparing.</review_text>
The game is fun to play even if you're not a NASCAR fan!  Love it</review_text>
I purchased the Parents Magazine version first and my one year old son didn't play with it much but after watching him go crazy at a friends house with this Hasbro toy I purchased it and he has been playing with it ever since.  The buttons are placed in such a way that he can hold it with both hands and press buttons at the same time.  He also enjoys teething on the keys.  I highly recommend this product for mothers who want to hold on to their own keys</review_text>
X4 Metal Detector RoverNational Geographic & Uncle Milton; 6 and up;The yellow-and-black vehicle and its 5-foot remote cable crawls over sand, dirt or grass. Lights and sounds alert the user when treasures (coins, old spoons, jewelry, etc.) are found. It teaches kids about magnetic fields and also can be used as an ordinary play vehicle.</review_text>
This McQueen is different than the regular McQueen - slightly darker maroon with a white swoosh on both sides - it is supposed to be the McQueen that appears after the Radiator Springs team fixes him up...my son was slightly disappointed though because the wheels were not white.  I found out there was yet another McQueen with the whitewall tires.  Go figure</review_text>
I say that because the paint on these cars chips VERY easily.  The Hamm car was already chipped sealed in the package.  My son's Matchbox cars, which get tossed into their basket quite regularly, don't seem to chip near as easy as the Cars ones do.  Never-the-less, kids don't care.  Though, my son (who is only 3-1/2) is wondering why they didn't make a red Ramone or the announcer Cars (Bob and Darryl)??Also, FOR COLLECTORS, the Sarge and Fillmore are shown on the back of the card as being sold as individual items, but on the back of the Hamm card, they are not shown.  I have as of yet see them sold individually on the Supercharged card</review_text>
My 2 year old son loves this puzzle.  The large pieces are easy to handle, and the colorful pictures keep him entertained.  It keeps him engaged and he's very proud once he's completed it</review_text>
I like the set up. It looks like a daycare really appears. It is great to spur on your childs creativity and role playing skills.</review_text>
i love this thing i have a verzion 2 and there best freinds and you can go onto tama town and get passwords that unlock items we looked every where for one of these we went target no we went wal mart no until we went to my freinds house and he wanted trade tamas but first i keep it for a ltille while for other tamas get here but i think i will trade cuz THIS THING ROCKS</review_text>
I enjoy playing with this toy and it trains me to be a good Mom.  Your tamagotchi's appearance depends on how you care for it.  Mine turned into Mametchi. Mametchi is a really good character to have.  I have enjoyed this toy so much.YOU SHOULD DEFINATELY BUY IT!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
The v4, the newest american tamagotchi, is much like its previous japanese counterparts, the entama and uratama. This tamagotchi goes to school, interviews for jobs, and then has a career. Each career has its own game, so there are many more games on this tama than the v3. There is also a mail icon that flashes when your tama gets mail. [...</review_text>
I read the reviews before buying this product, and I do agree that it is messy with the markers, suitable for children that are a little older.  It is fun, and very cute, but a little messy to wash off.  I just buy a pack of baby wipes at the dollar store, and let the kids clean off the screen with them, and then throw them out.  It works wonderfully, and the problem is solved, since the included sponge is not very helpful.  I would purchase this again, especially for the price</review_text>
Anything Leappad is great . Its one of the best things to come from the computer toy area for kids yet. My son is ahead of his class in reading with the help of Leappad. At 6 he reads at a midrange grade 1 student and is progressing quickly. I highly recommend This and any other Leap pad book and toy . Most schools have dropped Phonics from the classrooms and Leappad has brought it back in a fun form your little one will love..</review_text>
We bought this and the Sing Along Favorites and my 5 year old loves them both.  She wouldn't have know many songs on the other ROM packs.  This is definitely a hit for the younger ones!</review_text>
I purchased the Miss Weather Dress-Up Set for my cousin's two year old daughter. At her birthday party, all the other gifts were forgotten as she sat and played with the Colorforms. The adults were waiting in line to play with them also! This set has larger pieces which are perfect for younger children. This is the perfect gift...inexpensive, fun, promotes fine motor and speech/language skills, and has educational value</review_text>
I would recommend this game to any and everyone completely.  I would have to say if there are choppy portions on your dvd player then it might be time to buy a newer dvd player.  Ours was flawless ran so smoothly and it's sooo much fun.  Most fun with multiple people but still fun with a few.I would only hope that in the future they put a few more games and also maybe full motion video instead of pictures of products.Never got tired of the game and like I said I recommend it to everyone.Thanks,B. WolfWest Chester, P</review_text>
The game itself is actully pretty good.  You can go through the entire Price is right game or you can just go to each section.  Like if you just wanted to do the pricing games, there's that option or you can do the showcase showdown etc...There are times that the graphics of the game lag, which is kind of odd since to me since I wasn't playing it on a computer, but on my DVD player.The pricing games are 'random' but you do tend to get some of the same games more than other games.You can technically play this game by yourself, but it's obviously going to be more fun the more people you have</review_text>
My daughter got this for her 6th birthday.  She absolutely loves it, as does her 3 year old sister.  One of them is using it all the time.  The 3 different tops on the wand are a little frustrating for my 3 year old, as she can't switch them out herself and comes running to have someone else switch the tops for her.  My 6 year old has caught onto all of the dance moves and is able to do them along with the DVD.  My 3 year old can't do them all, but she has a great time just doing what she can.  Both of my girls love Cinderella, so they put on their dress up Cinderella dresses whenever they do the DVD.  I wish there was a way to order just an extra mat, though, so they could do the DVD together instead of fighting over who gets to stand on the mat</review_text>
This is a toy that my son always wants to play with and we've had this dinosaur for quite a while now.  Usually, we buy our son a toy that he pleads for (he likes it soooooo much) and it looks like fun but then it ends up in the back of his closet after a few days of playing with it.  This brontosaurus makes a booming sound with his feet when you pull a trigger underneath which both my sons love (4 & 2) and the included figures are great.  This toy stands up to the brutual tug of war that accompanies our two small boys and it is quite the bargain at the price.  I highly recommend all of the dinosaurs and cavemen in this series.  Not only does it keep my sons busy (oh yeah)  but it also helps built their imagination as I hear them tell each other all these stories about their dinosaurs.  Imaginext has even come out with "NEW" dinosaurs in this line which can be found at Target or other stores (I have found that TRU has a limited selection).</review_text>
It was the most popular gift on his first birthday.  He loved pushing it, sitting on it and moving the small animal figures.  Lots of different kinds of fun for him</review_text>
This is a nice toy for kids to ride on.  My daughter loves the little horn.  There are some little figurines that go inside the seat which activate the music.  That does not work well at all.  There are also little toy holders for the figuerines but those never get used either.  It's a cute riding toy but a lot of the features don't work well.  Worth the buy if a family is really into the John Deere theme</review_text>
This is a great doll--we gave it to our 2-year-old daughter last week and she now carries her everywhere, feeds her, reads to her, puts her to bed, covers her with a blanket, and obsessively pats her on the back and tush.  She's quite cuddly and soft; you'll want to hold her yourself.  You might expect from the pictures that the arms and legs would be hard plastic like the head, but in fact they are very soft and pliable, and the trunk of the body is all cloth, like a pillow, with a bean-bag tushie.  The headband is removable but actually stays on there pretty well.  The eyes don't have those stupid eyelids you usually see on baby dolls, the ones that open and shut when you lift the doll, and that always seem to stop working properly after a couple of weeks.  We'll see how "Maria" holds up to the kind of punishment our daughter can mete out, but she seems pretty durable.  What a great purchase!</review_text>
I agree that the Denver reviwer is totally out to lunch. This doll greatly resembles my daughter's friend Jenny Liu. Jeeny  was born in Taiwan. Chinese people don't look any one way and to expect them to is racist, like saying they all look alike.The hair ornaments are plastic but they do look good . The dress looks redder when you display her out of the box.Fabric quality is better than average for Mattel. Her hair is also much nicer and has more style than Mattel had been giving us. I think this doll bodes well for  better things to come  in this doll series.</review_text>
I've heard no complaints from either one, it's a hit</review_text>
i purchased this for my son @ babies r us only because i had a gift card... but i dont regret it at all... this is one of kristobals' favorite toys from the peek a block collection! my oldest son enjoys it also! not bad for 20bu</review_text>
The Big Bubbler is the greatest bubble wand----we have had consistently huge bubbles with the top-of-the-line/expensive bubble solution, as well as, the cheapest $1.99 jugs.  The only thing that didn't work at all for us was straight dish detergent (hey, we were desperate).  My youngest toddler will chase the bubbles endlessly, and even a neighbor's preteen son couldn't resist chasing the large bubbles across our yard.  I also like that I am playing WITH the kids when I make the bubbles for them vs. simply turning on a battery-operated machine and then standing back.If I had to gripe, it would only be to say that I wish the top of the wand (the end that holds the bubble solution) could be stood on end.  It is hard for the little ones to keep the top from spilling while waving the wand; it is also tough for them to get the wand back into the top to get more bubble solution.We also go through a LOT of solution---I plan to buy a few large jugs of it to have it on hand.  But, this seems like a minor inconvenience given how much fun we have all had watching the bubbles dance all over our yard</review_text>
I am confused by the poor reviews of this product. My daughter received this toy from the Easter bunny this year and the whole family plus Grandparents/Aunts/Uncles etc. have had a ball with it. It creates huge bubbles round or long, that float in the air for quite a bit of time. I do agree that the solution runs out very quickly and it is too hard for a three year old to work...but for the price I have to say this toy is WELL WORTH IT! We also made our own solution (Granny's recipe) and it worked...very messy and sudsy though. I would recommend this product to anyone who loves bubbles</review_text>
My 8 yr old grandson wanted this for Christmas but the price was over $100 so when I saw it for under $15 on Amazon, I got it for his birhtday in February.  He and his 9 yr old brother LOVE it!  I also purchased one booster pack at the same time.  Then I found another game and booster pack at Target for a very reasonable price. So he got the game system, two games and two booster pack of cards all for under $50.00!  Both he and I were happy!  (The only reason I give this a "4" is because the games are a bit hard to come by</review_text>
I bought this game for my 7 year old last winter - because he loved the book so much.  He quickly mastered the game, which requires you to earn state cards by recognizing certain items about each state, such as the color of the card, whether the capital starts with a certain letter or if the state nickname has a person's name embedded in it.  All his friends liked the game when they came over, so I ended up buying and giving at least 6 more as birthday presents for his friends and for a niece and nephew.  But, more than that, this game has spawned a further interest in geography in my son.  He began playing with a wooden puzzle of the USA as a result of the information on the game cards. In doing so, he taught himself most of the capitals (which are also on the game cards) and the shapes of the various states.  He continues to want to learn more about US geography.  I highly recommend the book and game for ages 5 and up.</review_text>
My granddaughter loves the buckets.  They are large and easy for little hands to pick up.  They make great hats and are great for putting things in as well as for the coordination of putting them on top of each other.  The colors are bright and the plastic is sturdy. A great gift for little ones and older ones as well.</review_text>
We were very pleased with the service we received.  Our purchases were shipped in a timely fashion and came in good condition</review_text>
This is a great,simple, fast game that is fun for all ages</review_text>
I don't care if it stops working tomorrow... my daughter has gotten so much enjoyment out of this in just one day that it was totally worth the money.   (you can get them cheaper at Target though)  She was always stealing the portable phones around the house or walking off with my cell phone... and now she has "her" phone she is just delighted.... she loves when it rings and she opens it up and pretends to talk.... so far this phone works great, but like I said... it is such a cool toy I'd go out and buy a new one right away.</review_text>
My infant just likes the crinkly fishy that comes with the buckets.  I'm sure she will grow into this toy.  I do wonder how I'm going to keep the felty material clean especially when she starts putting these things to her mouth.</review_text>
Took my daughter roller skating and I like how they have 3 levels to choose from this really helped her</review_text>
This toy is great for little boys or girls who love equipment. I got this item for my son 2 nd birthday gift and he just loves it. It is a tiny tractor and it is just like his grandpa's tractor so which makes him a very happy little boy. THIS IS A GREAT ITEM</review_text>
While nothing beats wood blocks (in my opinon) we had these first, and they are fun! We like that they are flexible and easy for little hands to manipulate, and not painful if they fall on you!  The only downside is that they are large, and storing them in the bag is like putting together a puzzle-they JUST fit.  Storing them in a toy box fills the box with wasted space; so we stack them in 4 rows beside the toy box. It's worth the hassle if you have space for them and don't mind stacking them up and teaching your little one to</review_text>
After assembling a Dora's Talking Cash Register that scans the wrong items, a Dora's talking backpack that is just plain dumb- this is the toy that scored this Christmas!  This toy is easy for my 3 year old to maneuver the pony in and out of the walker and actually works like you would expect.  Plus the pony is fun to play with out of the walker.  My daughter doesn't even question why it only talks in the walker. So what if it doesn't!  It will be fun to sleep with because it is soft and has pajamas on.  I would recommend this toy- very cute and fun!</review_text>
We LoVe this game. We were first introduced to it at our children's preschool where it fast became a favorite at "free choice time". The children engaged in it delightfully and playfully. Everyone has fun. The game board is durable and can be constructed differently over and over again -- this works out so great because with all the repeated play ours gets the kids are not memorizing the spot the item was. I worried a little that it might be too competitive and those that were "better" at it might leave those not as quick at hunting feeling discouraged, BUT have not ever found that to be the case when we have the game out at home or at the school. The board is brightly colored the items are fascinatingly fun to search for. It is a challenge even for us BIG kids. I would recommend it highly for a fun family activity game</review_text>
Transaction went well.  Grandkids are having a blast at using the product...innovatively with lots of fun and excitement</review_text>
My son absolutely loves his "animals". He can sit and play with the book for awhile. He's 20 months old and knows where each picture belongs. It was a great gift and I recommend it! I do agree with the other reviews regarding the dinosaurs.</review_text>
This is a good toy for a toddler, not a baby. I've used this toy in two different setting (first as a nanny and then as a mom) and both times, the babies were terrified of it. It's just too much stimulation for a 9 month old. The balls fly everywhere and you've got to run about after them to keep it going; unless of course, you've got a toddler, then they can run about after the balls (which seems to be half the fun for them). Good toy, but not until maybe 14 months.</review_text>
My son cannot wait to get a bigger set.  Compared to other magnetic building sets Geomags is, by far, better quality although it is also more expensive</review_text>
I purchased both of the Mega Bloks Pyrates Ships and have built two other Mega Bloks vessals before, namely the Man-o-War models from the Dragons line and they wer both more difficult to construct than this one so if you want a challege try finding them instead. The first thing I noticed when I opened it up was the lack of pieces in the set, almost the entire ship simply snaps together, a ten-year-old could do it. There isn't a lot of rigging like in the Playmobil series that will keep coming undone either. All in all it can be assembled in 30 min to an hour. The finished products are full of detail and Mega Bloks has gotten better at it each time, anyone who follows their Dragons line will know what I mean. I'll post a review of the Phantom next and I caint wait to get the Privateer ship Blue Beard's Avenger it looked massive at Toy Fair. With the Pirates of the Caribbean 2 and 3 films coming out this line is sure to be a hit</review_text>
My 14 mo old son just got his go kart today.  He loves it.  He loves pushing the button and making it go.  He hasn't figured out the steering yet but we have a long straight entry way to our home so no need to steer yet.  My 4 yr old daughter also loves it and fits into it just fine (about 40 in tall and 35 lbs).  She received the razor go kart herself and loves it but that one is outside only.  They have had the best time today playing with the PW go kart.  I agree with other reviewers that holding down the button is hard for little ones but they figure out ways to get around it.  (The razor go-kart also has a thumb throttle control)  We got the Lil Quad 4 wheeler for my daughter when she was one and would still ride it if she didn't have the big 4-wheeler.  Now both kids can ride their 4-wheelers together or their go karts.  Thanks Santa for 2 great gifts</review_text>
This is a great pack for a day trip to grandmas.  It only holds about 4 cassettes, so if you have a lot of books you should go with the zipper case.  Other than that, my daughter loves it</review_text>
This is a great and unique product to encourage creativity as well as physical fitness.</review_text>
I think that the soccer ball is great but not that educational only because all you do is paint</review_text>
I bought this for my 5 year old grandson, he is VERY active and I thought it would be a good way to burn up some of that extra energy!  Not only does he love it, but so does his 2 year old sister.  My daughter tells me that they both dance and dance, until they fall down laughing.  This was certainly a good buy</review_text>
Being a preschool teacher I use these all of the time. I have found that taking the sheets out individually clipping them to the easels clip to be the best way to work with them. Even if you don't have an easel these are wonderful for children of all ages. Large, unlined sheets of paper encourage children to be creative and to express themselves in a completely original way. For infants, toddlers, and preschoolers I will often tape the sheets to the table and let them color/paint/glue to their hearts delight</review_text>
yesterday we where buying the christmass presents, when i saw there was the big air towel at 40 bucks, so i said to my mother if i could buy so she said yes, when i got home i began building it, after 6 hours i finished it.And when i tried everything was going all right, so it wasn't that difficult</review_text>
Although my granddaughter is in love with the Webkinz, I was upset at the fact...after just receiving it, the glitter string around the Unicorn's neck came apart from the Unicorn.  Still my granddaughter loves it</review_text>
Very cute and soft. Little girl loves it and goes on line to the web site to play with her virtual pet.  Lots of fun</review_text>
Everyone in the Children's Room at the Avon Library loves the Gazillion Bubble Machine.  It is used frequently during story hours and captures all the chidren's attention.  It's not necessarily educational but is alot of fun</review_text>
Comment given by my four year old son Bilal, "I like this game because the buzzing things are so close to each other. This is good because it's fun. Also it'a hard to get the things out and this makes it fun. I play this came with my dad. I got the game because it has shrek on it. I win this game sometimes. The cards have funny things on them and it makes me laugh.</review_text>
I bought this for Christmas for my three children ages 4 (twins) and 18 mos. Although the younger child doesn't really get the games we play with it, the older ones do and we all have a great time. My goal was to get them to be active during the winter (less TV time), and this works for about 30 minutes. I only wish we had a bigger house so I could have gotten the bigger parachute. I can't wait to play with it outside when it gets warm</review_text>
My family loves this game because there are several different games you can play with it and it goes along with the book, so the kids like to compare it.This product is very durable and will last</review_text>
I love this  doll house and all its furniture. It was very average no fake looking dolls and I loved the office furniture for the doll house. We have had a lot of fun playing with it including me. It is good for my daughter and I to spend time playing together.</review_text>
this was ordered for our 4 year old,she just loves it!very realistic features,size of set,& quality is why fisher price is still the very best for imaginations of all ages!!</review_text>
Its a really good present, for anniversaries, birthdays, etc. Also its fun to do with a team or a club</review_text>
people say that the iquest stinks because it doesn't have all their text books. but i honestly think that even though it may be a little different, there's no harm in learning new things.</review_text>
These are really cute and a great alternative to the standard "Numbers and Letters" version of these foam tub toys. My 2 and 3-year old sons enjoy playing with them. No complaints here</review_text>
I bought this set for my 3.5 year old.  We have had a great time putting it together on several occasions in the last couple of weeks. Once put together, my son imagines adventures on it with the included soldiers.  I am not very mechanically inclined but the instructions are excellent, well-illustrated and clear, and I had no problem with them.  (My only quibble is that the orange sticks in the manual are a different shade of color from the ones in our set, and took a moment to identify.)  At first my son just wanted to put together the foam walls, but the second time around he wanted to help constructing the walls of the castle.  By imitating me, he was able to make duplicate versions of some simple structures rather well.  He also figured out how to make the soldiers all by himself, with their arms, legs, helmets, swords and shields.  Through doing the set I also was able to explain that you have to build the foundation first before you can put in the walls and floors, and the third time we made the castle, he was repeating this point to me!  The drawbridge is really fun and well-done.  It raises and lowers very smoothly.  This particular set is really only designed to make the castle, so it's not really meant for making many different things like the other Superstruct sets.  But this was our first one and I have no regrets.  Assembly time was about 30 minutes the first time, but after you do it once it seems closer to 15 minutes.  The pieces are high-quality, fit very well, and are generally a joy to handle and see.  The castle looks great once assembled, and will impress any adults or kids who see it</review_text>
I bought this wireless weather station as a gift.  The recipient loves it.  For the price, he is really enjoying it.  The only things he would change are:-interface to computer so that data could be tracked-display of actual barometric pressure valueThese two features are available on more expensive models so I imagine in the future we will be upgrading</review_text>
My 3 year old just loves it.. This truck has been great and very durable.. I have a 9 year old boy and he and his friends have just as much fun as my little one.. We love the fact that we are the only one in the neighborhood that has the black escalade.. We have certainly got our moneys worth.</review_text>
My 7-year-old daughter loves this tub of K'nex, and has now foresworn her LEGOs.  400 pieces does not go as far as you might expect, however; you may find yourself shopping for an expansion set soon.LEGO:* you can build houses* simple stacking approach* upgrade to Technics for 3D building* those adorable little LEGO people* wider variety of pieces and setsK'Nex:* 3-dimensional construction* more complicated trigonometric approach* you can build bridges* everything can rotateAnd I saw a K'Nex set that lets you join LEGO and K'Nex ..</review_text>
This toy is so cool! I use it all the time with my friend Erica.You could text message each other and it even takes pictures .My parents bought it for me at christmas . They were happy because they did not have to pay a phone bill or for minutes! This toy is so cool ! Now i do not have to beg my parents for a real cell phone!!! I highly recomend for any one who is reading this to get this toy!</review_text>
Both my 3-year old daughter and my 5-year old son (to his father's chagrin) love playing with and endlessly dressing Dora. Her outfits are darling and my children enjoy mixing and matching (or not-so-matching in some cases) the clothes, too. We are looking forward to adding new outfits as well as the armoire and bed - Dora needs a place to sleep!Dora is well made and sturdy, and her clothing has even been through the wash and no harm done.And I have to admit ... I've been known to dress Dora a time or two myself. We have the same problem with the shoes not staying on well, but it doesn't seem to bother my little ones at all</review_text>
This product was exactly what I was looking for. I recieved it in a timely manner and the merchant communicated kindly and proactively with me about the shipment. THANKS</review_text>
Bought this for our girls, 2 and 4. Huge hit, even before the batteries were put in the blow dryer. This set is great for several reasons, and I'll try to list the top few. First, the dryer actually has a little fan in it that whirrs loudly enough to seem real, but not so loud as to disturb the cat when she is getting her fur done. (uncommon for a kid's toy) Also, the nail polish and eyeshadow are both made to open and "use", but no mess. And once you have removed the inner packing materials, the bag is large enough for headband and tiara storage. A must for today's Princess. The one thing I will caution you about is the curling iron. If your child has longer hair like my girls do, it can get tangled when hair is being "curled". Fortunately, the curler has no moving parts, so tangles are discovered long before any permanent damage is done. All in all, a pretty sturdy little set for $15. Great for practice make-overs and such, but probably not for experienced princesses, as there is no actual make-up involved, just imagination. Perfect for my house! No glittery door handles or perfumed pets!</review_text>
Why do some people call Bratz dolls 'sluts/slutz'? Are you guys mad? They are just dolls. They are made of plastics. So what they wear SHORT mini skirt? They just DOLLS. If you hated mini skirt soooo much, well don't wear them.I saw many teenage celebs wear mini skirts.THEY ARE JUST DOLLS, okay? No need to argue if they wear short mini skirts.Anyway, about this doll I am totally adore her. She is very pretty and very ROCKSTAR material (I don't know how 2 spell.I don't care about her having tatoos. Lot of celeb got tatoos and she's a rockstar material.</review_text>
Great fun for the family or a group setting.  We've had hours of fun</review_text>
A lot of fun! The kids really enjoy this updated version of their favorite game. Product was shipped promptly!</review_text>
I purchased the game to play at a christmas party.  It was a lot of fun.Thank yo</review_text>
I bought these for my 5 year old son who is a huge Car's fan. He was using matchbox cars and pretending that they were Lightening McQueen and friends, but when he recieved the set of these he was so excited. These cars are larger than matchbox cars, and are heavy for their size, good quality!! Great for the Car's fan in your life</review_text>
My girls, twin 4 year olds, received this when they were 3 and have played with them over and over again in a variety of ways. Great for pretend play as well educational- matching of shapes. Super durable and not easy to lose. I highly reccomend these cute cupcakes for your little cupcakes</review_text>
My daughter really wanted this for Christmas.  She really has played and played with it ever since.  I wish that it came with some dry erase markers for the board in it but other than that we have been very pleased with the product</review_text>
I got this for my 5 year old, who started kindergarten this fall, and she is in love with the whole school concept.  She loves to pretend to be the teacher with this playset.  Her friend came over one day and played with it, too, and they took turns being the student and teacher.   I ended up buying another set for her friend's birthday.</review_text>
Fly Through Spanish is some of the best software for the Fly pen available.  You can write a word in English and hear the Spanish translation, or write a Spanish word and hear the English translation.  The translator will also spell out translations for you (my only complaint is that the translations are spelled a bit too quickly, especially if you're trying to write them down).  The cartridge even comes with some games to help you learn Spanish words.  Fly Through Spanish also comes with a booklet that has verb conjugation charts and ideas for games you can play.  I was very impressed with the verb charts.  They actually includes all the tenses and a chart of irregular verbs.  Fly Through Spanish is a great tool for learning and practicing Spanish words.  Please keep in mind that this software will not teach you Spanish but it is a wondeful and downright fun addition to a class or self-study program.I hope that Leapfrog releases more languages, especially French</review_text>
Any game that gets my husband dressed up in a tiara and earrings while playing a board game with his girls, is a GREAT game! It's simple to play for anyone over age 3 (unless the child is orally fixated- there are smaller pieces, so use YOUR better judgment!), is fast enough to hold a child's (and adult's!) interest, and let's everyone relax and not worry about rules- we really enjoy it and are wearing it out pretty quickly. It has been a great gift for other friends as well as it's not too well-known.</review_text>
Santa Claus brought this game for my daughter for Christmas and she LOVES it! It doesn't take terribly long to play, so it's a great game to hold the attention of a nearly 5-year-old. We've even talked Dad and big brother into playing, and there's a (playful) fight over who has the crown. The perfect gift for little girls. Thank you, Santa</review_text>
My daughter is almost 3 and she LOVES her trampoline. She is very curious about how Santa got it down the chimney, though! Not easy to put together, but could be if directions were clearer. Great product, great price</review_text>
This is a well engineered product; I cannot call it a toy because it is much much more than that. After building just one of the sample setups I was able to put down the manual and start creatively designing and building my own. My daughter (3.5 years old) loves it. She really likes placing a marble on the run when I tell her its time to "test it", and I let her identify the error. The only marbles that have fallen off the track are due to construction errors by myself. After 1 day (and several of our own setups) we already find ourselves wanting more pieces. I suggest buying the largest set from the get go if you have an engineering type mind or just enjoy puzzles. Nice feature to note : the coloring of the blocks is logical; each color has its own unique function(s).</review_text>
The quality and workmanship of this item was very good. I gave it to my grandson for X-mas. It was almost identical to the one his father had at his age. Thanks for a quality product</review_text>
My toddler (22 months) LOVES this doll.  There's something about his wide open mouth and little round nose that enchants her.  She actually threw over Elmo for Ernie.  I never thought I'd see the day.  Ernie is carried all around with her, and the nose gets lots of kisses.  Great toy for girl or boy fan of Sesame Street</review_text>
I played this when I was young so I thought my 2 1/2 year old would enjoy it too.  She got to pick which color she wanted to be, and we counted how many ants to get into the pants.  It took a little practice, but she got plenty of ants in and had soooo much fun.  We really had a great time</review_text>
After I read the reviews on this toy, I wanted to cancel my order. Thankfully I didn't because my kids love it. I have two boys 5 & 9 and they love bowling with this toy. My kids have played with it since we got it in Feburary. In the reviews, people said the toy broke soon after playing with it. My kids play with it all the time and we have not had any problems. Everything still works great; the pins, the sound, and the ball return.</review_text>
I am quite fond of this character.  Sure, he is a horribly evil dictator who wouldn't give a second thought to breaking you in half if you looked at him wrong, but you have to understand where he's coming from.  As the Hulk, Bruce Banner focused his rage against evil to help humanity.  Then there is a world-wide nuclear holocaust, the world is a wasteland, and, as the Hulk, Bruce sucks up a lot of the radiation.  Fusing his mind to the Hulk's, I think he has a right to be a little screwed up and angry.  This highly possible figure comes with a spiky crown thing and the appropriate comic book.  He may not make a great center piece, but the figure is good looking, none-the-less</review_text>
This is the only figure in the Apocalypse series that dose not have a variant figure. Kinda makes you wish it were the Sentinel series, and if you can find them, most of them are variants that you might actually want. I was fortunate enough to hit Wal-Mart at a time when the shelves must have been just stocked, because the racks were full, and all five variants were right there in front. Needless to say I bought all 5. But Maestro, as far as I know has had one appearance in the entire Marvel Universe, so what variant is even possible.Despite some protests that this is "another Hulk figure" this is not some namby pamby rehashed Hulk with screaming action, fist pounding, and slightly purplier pants that we've seen a dozen times before, but an almost entirely all new figure. One reviewer said the body was based on the Smart Hulk figure, but I wasn't lucky enough to snag one, so I don't have a basis of comparrison.However, he is well muscled, warty, and weathered alot like he looks in the included issue of Captain Marvel. And if your wondering just what exactly to do with him, fear not, Captain Marvel is to be released in Series XV near the end of this year. Then he can go a few rounds with your Maestro. Now ML, where's our Legends 2099 Spidey? (He was also in that CM comic.)He is a good figure, could be a little bigger, like more on scale with Juggernaut from Series VI, but he does come with the Apocalypse piece whcich is a great figure in and of itself</review_text>
The Maestro, the evil future intelligent world conquering version of the Hulk, comes with one arm and arm tube of the mighty Apocalypse.  Apocalypse being the kick butt 14" giant figure you can build if you buy the six figures in this series.Maestro Hulk has great paint and body sculpt with tons of detail and his muscles are so huge it looks like his skin may burst.  His beard is scuplted and painted well and he comes with his crazy pointy hat that fits well on his bald head.  He is a touch shorter than I'd like and this plus the swelled size of his arms and hands and his funny clothes do make him look dwarf like but once you get used to it it grows on you.  Overall a really cool figure and someone to take on the first appearance grey Hulk from the Galactus series.  Talk about alpha and omega</review_text>
We looked everywhere for this float after borrowing one while swimming at the lake with our 11 month old.  The nice thing about it is that it provides a safe and comfortable ride while allowing the child to be right in the water and splash around.  We can swim right alongside and spin him around or swim underneath to come and suprise him from the other side.  We don't have to worry much about the water being too deep because the float is so stable.  I would say the only drawback is that while it inflates fairly easily, squeezing all the air out and collapsing the float can take a few tries.  I would recommend this product to anyone with an older baby who wants to take their child for a float in calm water</review_text>
My one-year-old son had a great time playing with these blocks ...  He loved the colors and shapes.  He really enjoyed knocking down my block creations.  We had such a good time playing with the blocks that I decided to go on-line to buy him some.  I was shocked at the price.  I cannot believe [what] these blocks cost ...  For thirty-two foam blocks?!?!?!?!  Forget it.  It's too bad that these blocks are cost restrictive; they're great fun, but not worth the price</review_text>
Great slide!!  No assembly required, just unfold and your ready for fun..perfect size for young toddlers.  Bright colors and cute, happy carrot face.  Great fun for indoors or out</review_text>
After we saw the Monster's Inc. Movie, my daughter bedded for a book!  It was wonderful when we found out that Leapfrog had developed a book for the leappad.  My daughter has spend hours playing with this book, and playing the games in the book.  It is her favorite leapfrog book</review_text>
This is one of the most fun games I've every played.  There are tons of belly laughs as people try to bluff their way through an answer to a question.  I find the questions (and answers) are quite educational too, I've learned a lot from these questions.  A group of family members played at Christmas (6 of us) and it was hilarious to watch some people try to come up with an answer to the question (a bluff).   We even let our 5 year old nephew "play" and he was pretty good with coming up with some bluffs.  Try it, it is loads of fun.  I recommend a group of at least 4 though</review_text>
I was so glad when my little sister got this game for her birthday! Unfortunaty our version wasn't like the version I had when I was young. For some reason the people stand didn't open or close very well. So while for some you could smack down, others you had to jiggle and wiggle to get to lay flat. Not only that but when we would start a new game, you're soppose to be able to just flip the board over and all the stands would flip out. Well for the red board they didn't flip so well, in fact only a few would flip up with out help. That could have been my fault when I put the pieces together.The game was still fun, althought it was hard teaching my six year old sister not to exclaim out loud that she's glad of who she got because she likes her hat. Although I didn't have a problem with her picking her person instead of doing it randomly,(like you're soppose too) I still love this game and forever will.</review_text>
Cute Barbie, good for $5 with free shipping. Very trendy clothes, would make a good collectable because that will go out of style quickly I would think</review_text>
I recently bought these 4 little Dora dolls for my 4 yr old's birthday.  She really loves them.  She plays with them all the time.  It is a nice collection to her Dora stash!</review_text>
This was my 3rd bionicle and my 1st Rahkshi.  So far all i need for the green bionicles is Lewa the Toa Nuva of air, it is sold out every where. Well any way each Rahkshi has a staff with speacial powers, Rahkshi Lerahk's staff can poison anything at touch</review_text>
I've been consistently impressed by the Bionicle toys from Lego, and the Rahkshi are no exception.  Wish I was young enough to actually play with this stuff.  Sigh.  Anyway, Rahkshi take the Bionicle can-sold figures to new a new level of articulation.  In total, joints are found at the neck, shoulder, wrist, hip, knee, and ankle, and the crank on the back swivels the entire arm assembly from side to side so you can whack things with the staff-like weapon each of the Rahkshi weilds.  Then there's  the opening case on the back so you can flip spooky little rubber leech/slug things through the air.  Each one of these things appears to come with a miniature CD full of Quicktime promotional stuff for the toys, game, web site, etc.  The voice is a bit melodramatic, but it's still kind of neat.  I like the 360-degree rotating model of the toy you just bought...sort of redundant, since you can look at the one in real life, but nifty all the same.  One thing that mildly disappointed me is that the Rahkshi's weapon isn't really an independanly existing object - which is to say that the bar held between the "hands" is only attached to the hands, not the heads of the weapon.  This isn't a really big deal, except that it means you can't have the figure hold the weapon in only one hand.  This could be rectified with 2 small technic pieces, of course, but it does mean you'd have to add extra bits to the set from somewhere else.  Overall, a very cool build-it-yourself action figure that could either be set to stand looming on your monitor at work, or actually played with.  Educational value is limited to following instructions and demonstration of structural principles, as in any Lego set.  Durability seems good so far - Lego is pretty sturdy stuff</review_text>
Two grandsons (4 years and 6 years)have truly enjoyed this cartridge. Recommend it highly!</review_text>
My niece is about to be two and she loves school buses, so I THOUGHT THIS WOULD BE WORTH A TRY.  She loved it... hours of fun and if you are patient you could fold it back up and put it back in the box</review_text>
Bought for 2 year old twins... it held up with about 5 kids in it and even an adult at the birthday party.  The only thing that doesn't appear to be the greatest is the detachable steering wheel because with my kids it would end up missing in no time.   Definitely a great gift.</review_text>
This is the greatest thing, I was worried because some of the reviews said it was not made good and it was easily torn.  Not only has it lived up to my 3 year old, but we set it up outside and all the kids come and play, it has not torn.  It sparks great imagination.  All her friends go to school now, this allows her to pretend with them that she is going also.  And best of all, we can store it anywhere when we are done, she has even learned to close it up and put it away.  I highly recommend this bus to all!!</review_text>
I got this game for my then nearly 4-year-old daughter and a year later she still enjoys playing it.  The game is VERY simple and does not require reading. All the parts and pieces are high quality. It's a good opportunity to work with numbers and measuring, plus the game goes fast so you can play it quickly if needed or multiple rounds if you have the time/inclination.The object is to create the tallest character by mixing/matching 5 parts (feet, legs, body, head, and hat).  The character pieces are brightly colored and fun and include: ballerina, doctor, fireman/woman, policeman/woman, cowboy/cowgirl, and a clown.  A roll of the die determines which part you select.  The die has both pictures and words--except for the WILD side which is printed in red.After the characters are assembled each player measures with the included ruler (you can choose centimeters or inches) to see whose character is the tallest. It's a sliding ruler with a base so the kids can actually fit their character inside and line up the top with the corresponding number on the ruler.I wouldn't recommend this game for kids beyond 5--it may be a little too simple.  But for 3/4/5's it's a great game</review_text>
I first became aware of "Eat It" through an article in the Washington Post. My family enjoyed playing the game so much that we invited the creators of "Eat It" to appear at an event in our local community. It is a game that truly the whole family can have fun playing together. My seven year old daughter, Emma, was thrilled to learn that one of the questions asked in the game was about a candy bar that was called "Fat Emma", and was hoping that it was still being sold,(it isn't). GREAT GAME</review_text>
it's a nice pool..a pain in the ass to blow up without a pump but oh well. lol  it's a good tuy over all to have and holds a lot  of water. it's just hard to dump it all out once you're finished..that drain hole should be on the side and NOT on the bottom of the pool</review_text>
I think that this was a great item - something unique from what I can usually find around here.  My daughter loved it.  Like any other Polly items, lots of little pieces but overall very nice.  I was a bit miffed when I found out that the photo booth really doesn't take photos.  I guess I should have thought about that a bit more.  Overall, it's just fine</review_text>
I love the Luke Fx lightsaber more than any other one because it is made nicely, it is light, and it has a good glow in the dark that makes it look real. I would not even dream of fighting with it, I would think it would break in a few days of fighting. There is not much to say except it is the best Fx next to the Darth Vader and it looks cool in the dark. It is so bright it lights up a whole room when the lights are off</review_text>
I love this chimp and I am an adult.  All the kids in the neighborhood come to play with it.  It is so realistic</review_text>
Excellent I love chimps and watch all documentaries,so I had to have this one for my birthday and I am thirty seven years old.I would buy from you again</review_text>
Santa brought this for my 5 year old daughter for Christmas and she loves it.  She takes it in the car with her with her baby doll and belts it in with the seat belt.  One of the things I love about it is it isn't too heavy for her to carry.  She can carry it with her baby doll in it without any trouble.  It is also very sturdy.  She has even sat in it herself and it didn't break.  I would recommend this doll carrier.  It is great for little people who enjoy pretending to be mommy and daddy</review_text>
You know the family games that you regret buying, especially when you see your child coming at you with it on a rainy day, saying, "Will you play this with me?" Well, Rat-a-Tat-Cat is not one of these.It's simple enough to learn, but there is enough challenge in it to keep even an adult guessing. Rat-a-Tat-Cat was a gift to our family, but when my youngest daughter (age 4 or 5 at the time) got the hang of it, it became her favourite and here's why: 1)Though she was just learning numbers, she could understand the game, 2)The guessing part of the game put her on equal par with adults, to her delight. 3)Even for a busy adult, it's easy enough to sit down and play this game and actually can be relaxing. 4) If a guest came over, my daughter was able to explain the game rules to the guest and soon she'd have even teenage guys sitting cross-legged on the floor trying to get rid of the rats. Good ice-breaker.Simply put, rats are bad, cats are good. High points ~ you don't want them.  The higher the number on the card, the more rat-power in the drawing. Zero is the best, with rats gone and a cat installed as a happy Statue of Liberty. The drawings are whimsical & clever.The reason it's a success as a game for all ages is because though it appears simple, there is the element of not knowing what your cards are and even if you peek (with permission), opponents can take your best away from you. So, if you don't mind losing to a kid and making that kid's day, as well as having a laugh, go ahead and get this game. My daughter is older now and we still play it.  She's also learned to be a good loser :-</review_text>
My son received this as a christmas gift and loves it. Took a little bit for him to understand how to work it. Only down fall is that it won't run on carpet. Requires hard floor or table to sit on.Goes really fast</review_text>
I read about this RC racer in  Family Fun magazine and it got best toy for 10-12 age group and they were Right!  It is alot of fun to put together..not too hard, but a good challenge...It can also be made into a different model,we went online to lego and got the directions.It is  also sturdy, maneuvers, speeds up to 13 miles in hours and can take all kinds of terrain including snow jumps. The battery has given us about an hour of hard driving.The remote is alot of fun to use. I loves it...its spendy, but I've already had hours of fun</review_text>
My 2 year old loves it... though one set of grandparents can't stand the noise so if you don't like noisy toys - obviously this isn't one for you. Otherwise its great! Runs out of battery very quickly though.</review_text>
i bought it for my grandson who is 4,but my granddaughter liked it better then he did and she is only a year old,she kept hugging it and trying to dance with it</review_text>
My 9 month old received this for Christmas and loves it!  He is not quite crawling yet, he sort of scoots around and loves to grab and wrestle this toy.  So far it has been very sturdy but yet soft enough for the baby to roll on and squeeze.  The voice and phrases it says are so very cute too, we love the little giggle and when it says "Hello Baby"!! This is an adorable toy</review_text>
My son turned 4 on Tuesday and I had bought this and was saving it as a birthday gift! He ABSOLUTELY LOVES IT! He has spent hours and hours of time already sitting and playing with this playset and his turtles. Even my husband thinks it's cool! It wasn't too difficult to put together and it stays together quite nicely! Great toy for a 4 year old that loves TNMT</review_text>
i don't know but mine has stayed together for the whole year nothing broke i had to fix the couch a little but i forgot to snap in the little thing into the front. but nothing broke and i'm not rough on it and i pick it up by the handle nothing's wrong with it though</review_text>
An inexpensive way to have fun, and they have brought smiles to every person who uses them</review_text>
This was the best stocking stuffer ever. And we got 4. One for each of us. Mine is know at my office, and my boss loves it</review_text>
We (my husband and I) brought this toy for our 2 year old last Christmas because then she was an Elmo fanatic. She still plays with this toy even though her intrests have shifted to Dora! At first I wasn't quite sure what this thing did except make noise but as I watched her play with it, I realized it taught her to follow directios.It's a mode where elmo asks you to follow the light and the keys light up one by one as you press them and I was truly amazed at my baby actually following the directions.This toy also teaches numbers. Overall, this toy is great for toddlers and tends to stay a favorite unlike those toys that end up at the bottom of the toybo</review_text>
I just found this car at ToysRUs for $3.49; plus others in this series. I came online to Amazon to see if I could find characters not available at the store and I was blown away by these prices--$29.99???? You've got to be kidding me! I bought the TOY cars for my five year old son to PLAY with--the only reason I can see TOYS being priced this high is they must be trying to catch collectors. I'm glad I could find what I did at a local store; I definitely would not pay these high prices...I would have been very happy to buy others in the series from Amazon, but at these prices I am definitely NOT going to!</review_text>
My daughter received this loom as a gift for her 6th birthday. Even though the box says for ages 7 and up, and even though she's not the most nimble-fingered kid, she has no trouble using this loom with just a little help. The materials seem to be high quality and it comes with a good amount of thick, colorful yarn. The loom has been keeping my daughter happily occupied for long periods of time. She enjoys watching me knit, but doesn't have the dexterity yet to knit herself, so she's thrilled to be able to weave herself scarves and the like</review_text>
When it first came out almost 20 years ago, I saw this game at a bookstore and bought it to take on a Christmas skiing vacation with my family.  Unfortunately, my mother ended up having emergency gallbladder surgery instead.  We didn't have gifts that year, but we did made it to Colorado and spent hours by the fire laughing until our ribs ached playing this crazy game.  It doesn't matter if you can draw, it's how fast you can put something down that halfway suggests the word they give you, and how ridiculous everyone's scribblings usually look.  I've played it with an artist. He couldn't even draw a nose and chin in the 20 seconds he had, so his artistic standards took a dramatic tumble. If my spirits need a boost, I play this game. Buy it.  You'll love it</review_text>
This game was given to our 3 year old as a gift and he loves it.  His little sister, who is two, also loves this game.  This game really helps to develop a childs ability to concentrate on visual cues.  It is basically a matching game combined with a puzzle concept.  There are no complex rules to learn, so within minutes of opening the box any child can begin to play and enjoy this game.  As each match is made the child receives immediate reward and motivation to find a new match.  Best of all is that this is a simple game with no buzzers or bells and is best played with the TV turned off</review_text>
This is the best game for the beach and the car. The little letters clip right into the board. It has a zipper case also. It's great and we enjoy it very much</review_text>
For scrabble aficionados with children who often travel long distances by plane this game is a MUST travel accessory</review_text>
We recently played BONKERS at our game club. As we read the instructions we were hoping going BONKERS would be fun and it was. BONKERS is a game based on asking players questions.  The questions are not trivia and knowledge-based questions, but instead word-based questions.  For instance, a question might ask you to "Come up with words that end in BELL".  During your turn you have 30 seconds to "Go Bonkers" trying to blurt out answers like: BARBELL; DUMBBELL; DOORBELL, COWBELL etc.  Your goal would be to find as many answers as possible in order to hit any or all of the four answers provided on the game card.   For every answer you hit, you win scoring chips. That was just one category of questions called ADD ONS - where you find words that begin or end with a certain word.  The other categories are:  WHAT THE BLANK - where you find words to complete the blank;  RHYME TIME - where you find as many rhymes as possible in order to match those provided on the game card; and LETTER PERFECT - where you would find words which begin or end with certain letters.  The game play is interesting because there is some strategy thrown in.  At the beginning of the round, one player (the Card Reader) peeks at the Question and Answers on Game Card and decides how many scoring chips each answer is worth.  So, in the example above, the card reader might allocate 5 scoring chips to the answer COWBELL, four chips to BARBELL, three chips to DUMBELL and two chips to DOORBELL.  This is done by placing the chips on the gameboard under target answer "A"; "B", "C" or "D".  The object is for the card reader to decide on which answers are hardest and place the most scoring chips on the hardest answer.  This is because if the players do not hit some or any of the answers provided on the game card, the Card Reader will win the scoring chips leftover and advance on the Board.   However, if the players hit all or any of the answers on the game card, they win the scoring chips for the correct answers provided.  I really like the strategy part of the game, it adds a good deal of spice.  BONKERS provided for an entertaining evening.  We will play again!</review_text>
I love this playpen!! Durable plastic, can be extended to larger size (or shortened if going someplace that is not as large). Only problem is that my baby loves to "wander." She is not thrilled when Mommy "cages" her up in order to protect her while I make dinner and cannot watch her as closely as necessary. Crib toys can be safely attached on the sides (did that with her Aquarium toy, which she loves and it soothes her). Occasionally plays with music buttons and phone but nothing else seems to interest her. I just put her other toys in for her to play with</review_text>
I bought this mostly for the container.  I had individual play-doh products, like the barber set that came in it's own box.  I'm able to put ALL play-doh things into this container and everything is in one spot.  No more boxes and sorting.  I even still have space for more things like different colors and everything.  My daughter loves the variety of the toys and I love the convenience.  I'm going to buy it for presents for other families I know!</review_text>
These dominos are great for the hello kitty lover.  My six year old loves them.  Don't be fooled by the picture though, the tin is not full.  If you ask me, there are not enough of them in there.  The tin is filled about three quarters with plastic to hold the dominoes up in the window and make it look full.  I would have rated it five stars if it had been full</review_text>
We use this travel turtle on the airplane and in the car for my 1- and 2-year old children. It's intended for children a little older, and I can see why, as they are not able to easily balance the turtle on their laps. However, my 2-year-old can use it by herself, and it helped her to have a flat place to color and play with her magnetic board toys. I had to hold it in place for my 1-year-old, but when doing so, it also allowed him to color. I would recommend it, especially for children 3 and up.</review_text>
I'm not one for guns in my household, but my potty-training son really wanted this blaster gun. He's a total Star Wars fan (like his father) and I told him that he could have it if he said good-bye to diapers. He did. So we ordered it and waited for the UPS man to come. He was so excited when it was delivered. He thought the UPS man was so cool for giving that to him! Anyways, there is so much detail on this blaster gun. The sounds are pretty cool and it lights up red. My son loves the sight scope too! Big hit in our household!!!</review_text>
this is a great table/chairs set.. my 22 month old is enjoying it but may be a little to young.. the chairs tip very easily. other than that its a great set.</review_text>
i really love this table set.i bought this for my 3 year old ...i dont have to worry if she s running around the table b/c its safe and made of plastic ...its light so easy to move around...easy to claen... reasonable price...i thnk i love it but i just wish that table size wa  a little larger</review_text>
I have read other reviews here that this table is too high for 2 and 3 year olds. Maybe so but, it is wonderful for 4-5 year olds! Those "in between stages" kids who want to have a small table of their own but, need something a bit taller and more sturdy than those made for toddlers. My son (almost 5) and his big sister (7) can both sit together and eat a snack at this table. It is very sturdy! The small drawer is great for crayons or stickers to be put out of the way at snack time. The surface of the table is just the right size for imaginative play with puzzles or action figures. The unique oval shape of the table takes up less room while still providing a good sized table top surface space. My son had outgrown 2 "child size" table and chair sets by age 4- most are actually buit for toddlers- this table is actually for "Kids" and it has been a big hit at our home. Guess who's getting the matching Lifestyle kitchen for Christmas</review_text>
The only draw back of this toy as others have said is the arms are stiff and make it hard to hug..Other than that, this toy is simply adorable , the motorized sound of movements are hardly noticable.. and the sounds it makes are truly neat. My daughter got this over a year ago, (she is 7 now) and she still loves this bear and we have not had any problems with any broken limbs.</review_text>
The doll is wonderful and my granddaughter thinks it is her best birthday gift. I also want to especially compliment and thank Amazon for their excellent handling of this purchase. I made a mistake when ordering and they very promptly helped me to correct it. I look forward to doing business with Amazon in the future</review_text>
Ever since my son was 10 months old he just HAD to check out the vacuum whenever it was out. So we decided to get him a toy vacuum for his birthday. Since we use a canister vacuum I wanted to get him a canister vacuum as well, and this was pretty much the only one out there.He just LOVES it, and since he is under 3, (the recommended age), I took the long gray pole out of the vacuum so its just his size. (the head fits fine straight onto the hose.) He knows how to turn it on & off, but mostly likes dragging it around. He also likes taking the two attachments out. And I love how this vacuum has no real suction because then it would not be safe for my little one.The only reason I gave it 4 stars instead of 5 is because he loves this toy so much that he wants to drag it EVERYWHERE. And that can be a pain- (to the car, in the highchair, on the changing table, etc.) so I've had to hide it sometimes. :) But I am very happy with this vacuum</review_text>
My two daughters (two and four) got this for Christmas from "Santa", after seeing this, they no longer had any interest in any other gift.  They love it and spend hours on in fixing each others hair</review_text>
This was a great addition to our Read with Me dvd collection.  My son loves it - there are so many games and options available that it keeps him occupied for hours!</review_text>
I love this motorcycle and it is a "no-duh" that it doesn't run on fuel.  Really...think...what fuel are you going to use.  Plus, fuel is hazardous to children and a company wouldn't threaten the lives of innocent children!  That's my OPINION</review_text>
My 9 year old son loves Dragon Mountain.  He wasn't able to assemble it alone; eventhough he's typically very good at assembling most other toys.  It took about an hour for him and his dad to assemble it...but he felt it was more than worth the time it took to put it together</review_text>
We are loving this set!  Very cool dragons, a fun environment for characters to explore and fight in.  Extra fun from several moving features - rasing/lowering cauldron, tramcar on sloped tracks, erupting mountain top, opening dragon mouth, flapping dragon wings, firing cannon.A little challenging to build, but the instructions are fairly clear.  Assembly took an adult about 3 relaxed hours.A few sections come apart after some play but they are pretty easy to put back together.  So far no pieces have broken.Most important, this is a lot of fun to play with.  Over the past two days, our set has been getting non-stop play from a 9 year old boy and 6 year old girl.  A great toy for two kids to play with together, and the boy says a single child could also spend hours happily playing by himself.We wouldn't have paid the full retail price for this, but at $35 (Amazon discounted price), I think this is appropriate value.</review_text>
This costume kit was a great deal for the price.  My son loves it</review_text>
Saw this on Jay Leno and it was a Hilarious Gift!  Tried it out and it dances to the chicken dance song and when you grab its neck it yelpsand pretends to choke then when you let go it continues its dance.  I Can't wait to give it as a Christmas Present.</review_text>
These 'Cars' characters are all quality die-cast replicas that kids young and not so young can enjoy. The kids love playing with them and so far, our 'cast members' are still intact.But they do look so good you might want to put one on your desk...The details: painless shopping and quick shipping, as usual on Amazon</review_text>
The Tonka truck was for my grandson for his birthday.  His first Tonka Truck.  He loved it.  Couldn't even wait to get it out of the box.  He turned one yrs. old and he started trying to sit on the top and he did and it held up.  Good going Tonka</review_text>
My daughters(4year old, 2year old and 9 mos) love this toy. The keys are a little hard to hit but they seem to really enjoy it. The baby enjoys trying to play it but likes watching her sisters play it more</review_text>
I first purchased the Winnie the Pooh Soft 'n Silly Tigger for my son when he was 4 months old.  He is now 14 months and LOVES his Tigger.  We now have 2 Tiggers, one as a back up, and he carries them everywhere he goes.  It's a great toy for young children to sleep with, being soft and cuddly.  Tigger has been a great comfort for my son and I don't know what I would have done with out them!</review_text>
My 3 year old received this puzzle as a gift for his 3rd yr birthday. I wasn't so sure if he was ready for the puzzle at the age of 3, but four months after his birthday together with his cousins he started putting the pieces together. He is now 3.5 yrs. and knows how to complete it all by himself within less than 10min. I give ten stars</review_text>
This is a great toy that lets childrens' minds grow.  Both ,my 7 and 5 year old love to play with this toy.  The magnetic base is so strong that you can build the metal peices ontop of each other to make a big sculpture.  I would highly recommend this</review_text>
Previous reviews listed the lack of volume control as a negative point. In a panic I ran to check the three I have purchased for Christmas gifts 2002. ALL three have volume controls now! Don't let reviews on a previous model keep you from purchasing these products. Friends have these and my girls begged for their own. As a home-schooling mom I prefer to buy toys that are both fun and educational - Leap Frog is my best source</review_text>
The game of memory is a great equalizer because little children are just as apt to remember where they saw the hidden images as older children or adults.  This makes it great game for the whole family to play together.   The images from the &quot;I Spy&quot; book illustrations are bright and  creative.  They don't match exactly- for instance, there might be two  images of cats, but borrowed from different photographs in the I Spy books.   So there is a bit more visual variety to spice things up.  This is a much  more attractive memory game than most, and would make an ideal gift for a  child or family</review_text>
I just purchased this redesigned AT-ST from a local retail store. For the basic price of $20 for 244 pieces, this set is well worth the price.I purchased the original AT-ST years ago and this model far surpasses that one in all ways. It's larger, much more stable, and has a unique pivoting mechanism which rotates the cab. It was very difficult to get the original AT-ST to stand upright without falling over; the 7657 is extremely stable.The original AT-ST had Chewbacca at the controls which was pretty cool. However, not as cool as the AT-ST driver that has a new helmet and blaster. The only drawback is that his minifig head is flesh colored instead of traditional LEGO yellow.It took about 20 minutes to put the model together. It wasn't very challenging but interesting to see how the rotating mechanism was put together.I would highly recommend purchasing this set. For the low price of $20 for such a detailed and complete set, it's well worth the price. You won't be disappointed</review_text>
I bought this toy because Amamzon's price was a great bargin compared to other stores.  I would have given this product 5 stars but gave it only 4 because the can is so large and the lincoln logs only fill is maybe half way.  There is a lot more room for more logs.  115 sounds like a lot but you are only able to make the one cabin seen on the front.  I ended up buying additional logs (not lincoln logs) so that me and the kids could build additional buildings and a fence</review_text>
I was very happy with the Lincoln Logs I ordered for my three year old grandson. He has been enjoying them. They seem to be more complicated than they were when my son was his age which was about 35 years ago or close to it. Then it was only one small log cabin but this set is a western building. My grandson has still been able to build something that he likes. Thank you for making it available</review_text>
I recently bought this Read With Me DVD System after much hesitation from other reviews. It was on sale at Toy r' Us for $18 so I decided that I would go ahead and try it. I took the advice of one of the reviewers and waited until my daughter went to bed to program it.  To be honest, it took me longer to get it out of the package than to program it. The system was programmed in less than 5 minutes and I have a Pioneer DVD player that is over 5 years old. The only thing I would suggest besides waiting until you child is asleep is not to lay the DVD control perfectly flat or it will be lower than the eye on the Read with Me DVD system.  My daughter absolutely loved it! The reason I gave it 4 out of 5 is because wish they had a few more DVD available in stores.</review_text>
Ok so my son got it for christmas and here it is june and i just hooked it up. it took me all of 5 mintutes not even that to program it. the first try #4 wouldnt take so what i did is i put the toy remote on one thigh and the remote on the other so that there were almost touching and so that the "eyes" were right on top of each other. and it took straight away.Its really fun for my 4 year old my 10 year old got bored. my only suggestion is that there needs to be a bigger choice of games. they are so similar that my 4 year old changes games quite a bit.i am actually having trouble finding games for it now.its great and if they are going to be in front of the TV might as well be learning. he also hase VSMILE which is a little bit better if you can afford the 60$ for the game unit and 20$ for the games. (grandma and grandpa got ours for us with games) so it wasnt bad for us.read with me DVD is good though, i really enjoy playing it and listening to the stories</review_text>
My children are 7, 5 and 20 months, and they all love it.  The baby is especially fascinated by it and was able to make the top spin by herself after her brothers coached her a bit.  The humming sound is much less annoying the many of their battery operated toys with voices and electronic noises</review_text>
my 19 month old loves the toy for its colors, I like it because it allows me to get more chores finished in the kitchen! It has a nice suction base to keep the top steady on tile. It was a little difficult at first, for my son to handle, since a good bit of strength is needed to push the bar down especially if you want to hear it hum and spin fast. The colors are pretty cool, The faster it spins the more colors come out (primary + yellow/orange colors). I like that it holds his interest. A [...] could defentley get this down better but at least there is room to grow!</review_text>
This is a perfect game that you can enjoy with the whole family! It is very fun and great for little ones too! I own this game, and my family enjoys it very much. This is a great mystery game where you spy to find out each pearson's idenity. I love this game and I think you would too</review_text>
If you love the unpredictable, then Catch 22 is for you.  This game has plenty of social interaction and combines skill with luck in the pursuit of 22 gold tokens.  Just when I thought I was about to win the game, my boyfriend landed on my game piece and stole all of my tokens.  Boy, that did not make me happy at all.  The key to this game is to use your blocker cubes wisely.  The cubes are used to either block an opponents way or safeguard your path to the money.  Once you use the cubes, you can only retrieve them by landing on a 'collect blocker' square.  You can collect any blocker cube placed on the board, including your opponent's cubes.  I made lots of money selling blocker cubes back to my opponents. We were so addicted to this game that we played it all night long.  I highly recommend it, but be prepared to either win big or lose your shirt!</review_text>
I especially like this product for traveling and sitting in waiting rooms. My only complaint is that you have to hold it just right to see the puzzle clearly on the screen.  It has a contrast adjustment, but it not very helpful.  It also has a lighted screen option which is not very good either. A great improvement would be a screen with greater contrast.</review_text>
I purchased this item for my 4 years old neice. She is Dora crazy as my 6 year old was at 2 and 3 years old. My daughter has the older version and she still plays with it. It's her house for her and her dolls. My neice is also enjoying her Dora house. Great gift. It does not  take up too much space. You can slide it under a bed, behind a couch etc. Dora house is great!</review_text>
This set of crayons is very durable & colorful!  It comes in a cute organized pouch which has 4 zippered compartments that fold togehter and velcro shut.  The crayons are EXCELLENT quality, comparable to Crayola.  Young kids and adults will enjoy hours of fun with crayons.  Create things to your hearts desire.  HIGHLY RECOMMENDED PRODUCT and Great for Travel Too!</review_text>
7yr old son has had many many hours of fun rebuilding this into many different tracked and wheeled vehicles. Quickly lost interest in snow monster part but the vehicle part is easily changed around for new setup each time.  Highly recommended</review_text>
My 4 year old son got some early christmas money from his grandparents. So we went and bought this toy at Target (and paid 30.09 for it) He loves it... his favorite part was that you can take the whole thing apart and put it together different each time. My only concern was that the snow monster needs camera batteries or cell phone batteries??? What are those??</review_text>
Many people are not time oriented.  I have used this both in the classroom and at home.  It allows the children a visual clue to how much time has gone past.  I tell them they have 30 minutes to complete something.  I set green for 20, yellow for 7, and red for 3.  I don't have to say anything else.  This eliminates waiting time once they realize that at red they need to be picking up and getting ready for the next lesson</review_text>
My three year old takes a "rest" instead of a nap, which means he stays in his room for a quiet time so mommy has some sanity.  He can't tell time, so he would come out every 5 minutes to see if rest time was over.  In order to keep him in there for an hour I purchased this clock so he can see and hear when his time was up.  It works perfectly and he isn't anxious about when his time is up.  He understood the concept of the clock changing from green to yellow to red quickly and knows when the clock is red that his time is almost up. I set the clock to announce when his time is up and then he comes on out. No more "is it time yet?".  I get my full hour of sanity uninterupted!</review_text>
We wanted this little doll for our own "Little Ariel". She is perfect for the bath tub! She comes with her own float, wand with bath tints, and swim coverup!! Her bright red hair is put in little pig tails with bows and she has a baby powder fresh scent (which we were not expecting- my husband is not to found of that). We are very pleased and hope that this company continues to make baby princess items!!!</review_text>
Our son is 2 y.o. and had a great time with this puzzle. Enjoy all the animals</review_text>
This game is great to get to know your friends and family in a new light.  It encourages deep converasations but can also be a fun and energetic game.  You'll find yourselves wrapped up in topics that you'd never discuss otherwise.</review_text>
Great game for all ages.  Lots of fun if played with many people.  Very intertaining</review_text>
I love it! it's really light weight and portble.  The batteries do go dead without the charger and the PVDs should have more then 30 minutes-60minutes.  I like this video now alot.  Calling it a toy is a little far fetched but it's wonderful.  I hope you buy it!</review_text>
This item showed up on time and without incident... I'm not sure what else I can expect from a pair of novelty glasses.</review_text>
We all LOVE this toy.  What I like about it, is that it's easy to use, even for my almost three yr old, it has realistic sounds yet not obnoxious, it's sturdy, (Will only tip when it knocks into something pretty hard) it LOOKS good, not cheap, and it's pretty wallet friendly as far as price goes.This has been THE big hit this Christmas.  Even more so than Tekno Puppy</review_text>
My 11 yr old son got these Moon Shoes at Christmas and he plays with them a lot.  He has ADHD and Sensory Integrative Dysfunction, and the bouncing really soothes him and gets him refocused.  I don't think he ever expected to bounce very high; he seems to be happy enough with the bounce he gets.  When he wants to play with them in the house, I send him downstairs to jump around on the concrete floor to save wear and tear on my hardwoods.The downside for us has been that the bands have started snapping very frequently.  At the rate he's going, he'll run out of bands long before he outgrows wanting to play with the toy.  So if anyone hears of a way to get more bands, please speak up</review_text>
My 8-year old wanted a pirate ship for Christmas, which was a dilemma because all I could find were ships for toddlers or LEGO-related ships.  This one is fully assembled (PHEW!) and when he opened the box, he jumped for joy.  The 4 action figures have the sinister look an 8-yr old could appreciate.  The cannon really shoots and the hoist loads and unloads treasures.  My son found enough small removable parts on the ship (a parrot, tools, anchor, lamps) to keep him occupied for hours.  The whole ship is hard or molded plastic, including the sails.  I'm fairly confident it will hold up in many future battles.  I'm VERY happy with this ship, but I wouldn't recommend it to a toddler or a child who looses small objects</review_text>
My son wanted this piece and we have enough of the other pieces to incorpate it into the track system we have started and my son loves it and plays with it so I have to say it has exceeded my expectation for the value it added to our GEO Trax railroad</review_text>
This review is not about the toy, but about the service you can expect to receive from Amazon.com.  If you are buying this as a gift, only do so if you have months to wait, even if the item is listed as available.  Amazon.com will allow you to pay your money under the guise of sending your items, and then days later, inform you of a delay in shipping, and then a week later inform you the item has just shipped and can take up to an additional 10 days for delivery.  Despite the site's claims that the item would ship in 24hrs and be delivered in 3-5 days.  Mind you, they're sending it via UPS or American Home....Honestly, there are other retailers out there who are more reliable than Amazon.com and I strongly recommend using them - unless you're okay disappointing the little girl in your life.  I know I hate having to tell my neice that the gift I promised her still won't be there - even though her birthday has passed, by almost a week at this poin</review_text>
My daughter is 2 1/2 years old and I often find myself surrounded by some loud toys that jingle or sing.  After dinner I find that this book is a wonderful transition into our bedtime routine.  She has learned how to button, use a zipper and problem solve by using this book.  Also, I find that this is a great toy to keep in the car when rush hour traffic becomes horrible.  I have bought this book for many of my friends children and would recommend this to anyone who has a toddler since the it holds up extremelly well no matter how hard your child plays with it</review_text>
Our whole family loves this game.  I like this version because it includes the history and rules of the game on the inside cover.  I also like that you can close the cover and not lose the dice.  The construction is a little flimsy and there is not enough felt on the board which makes the dice rolling a little noisy.  We added a piece of felt on top of the board and it is much better</review_text>
These days, classic game shows aren't really as popular as reality shows like Survivor and American Idol. However, with the surprise Summer show, Game Show Marathon in CBS, many clssics had the opportunity to breathe a glimpse of new life, like Press Your Luck, Match Game, and Card Sharks. Another classic which was revised, Let's Make A Deal. With Monty Hall's benchmark into pop culture revisted, many have wondered whether the classic game of trading will ever come back onto television again. Thankfully, those who easily own DVD actually don't have to wait for the show to return. They can just trade in the comforts of their own living room.The Let's Make A Deal DVD game, recaptures the classic trading that Monty Hall made popular from the 70's and 80's into a great fun game. In this game, Monty Hall puts traders to the test where you can trade your chances for big nostalgic prizes like classic cars from Datsun, and Cadillac, to trips and fur coats from Dicker & Dicker of Beverly Hills. On top of that, there are classic quick deals to play for extra cash. For example, if you have a pair of scissors, Monty will give you $700. Also, there are the classic booby prizes, Zonks!!! Although they are fun to receive, you get absolutely nothing to show for it. There is also the anticipation of getting the Big Deal for big bucks. Unlike DVD editions of shows like Family Feud and The Price Is Right, the game really delivers a great job from Monty, and each of the great concepts from the classic game show. The mastering really thrives with classic clips of Carol Merill and Deal's announcer Jay Stewart on each of the prizes.Although I just wish there could've been more games to play, I am absolutely impressed with the way Let's Make A Deal was put into a DVD game. If you haven't seen this classic game show, Monty Hall hosted, you have to buy this great game. I absolutely recommend this, and that is definitely not a zonk!Price: B 1/2-DVD Mastering: A-Fun & Enjoyment: B 1/2+Overall: B</review_text>
We gave our nine yr. old grandson this train for Christmas.  He had a such a good time putting it together, then running it on the track.  The train absolutely glides on the track, so quietly and smoothly.  It is a great product</review_text>
I bought my seven and ten year old daughters moon shoes for christmas.  I had read all the reviews, so I immediately instructed the girls to always wear their bicycle helmets when playing with their moon shoes.Yes, they can be dangerous, but with a few precautions, I think the kids will have more fun, be safer, and the parents will have peace of mind.1. Don't let the kids start jumping right away, hold their hand or have them put their hand on your shoulder as they practice walking in them.2.  Once they've achieved the ability to balance, have them practice bouncing in place just a little bit.  This will help them learn to balance as they move and learn how the moon shoes respond to the way they move.3. Set ground rules, no bouncing when there is a lot of debris around, no bouncing while holding objects, always wear helmet, no bouncing near each other, and if you feel or hear any of the rubber bands break while bouncing sit down immediately and take off the shoes.My kids spent the first half hour/45 minutes getting use to their moon shoes.  They now can bounce around with stability and confidence</review_text>
Great little wagon!!  The canopy is nice and the fold down seats are very useful</review_text>
The gizmo doll is very realistic. It looks just like the one in the movie. The doll's ears are about 11 inches across and the doll is about 8 inches tall. I bet your going to really like this Plush Gizmo Doll, my son treats him like a member of the family. Thank you for reading</review_text>
This is great! No more lost cartridges or torn books. Very easy for my four year old to store all her leap pad items</review_text>
both of my kids have a LeapPad and several books ... this is a great way to keep them all together.  It's durable and kid friendly--so they can keep track of their cartridges and books ... and it's great b/c they can just grab it and go which makes it nice for travel too</review_text>
We bought the LeapPad Plus for our 4 year old for Christmas and 4 books to go along with it.  Then I realized we had no where to put it, we also bought the Littletouch leadpad for our 1 year old and a bunch of books.  Yesterday we went and bought this and the carry case for our little one's littletouch.  Great space saver.  It is made very well too.  Our daughter calls it her briefcase.  It fits everything perfectly</review_text>
This movie teaches the basic ballet steps with the use of a mat.  Although it is a little slow in the beginning, once the dancing starts my daughter is hooked.  We started with with a VHS and had to buy a dvd because we played the video so much.</review_text>
My grandparents bought me this for Christmas and I really love it! The doll is absolutely breathtaking, and she has honey blond hair with golden highlights. Her eyes are a deep blue green color, and she is very pretty overall. The closet she comes with is very cute, and I can put Barbie shirts and skirts on the little hangers! There is a lot of room for shoes and purses and hair accessories, I love this toy</review_text>
I was really excited when I saw this Doll, because I'm Navajo.  It's something I can let my daughters take into school to share during native American Month.  We all like it a lot</review_text>
This was a hit for both of our kids.  They had so much fun making their very own unique soccer ball.  We have already used it for our indoor soccer league and it was a hit!!   For all you soccer moms and dads, this is a wonderful gift for your child.</review_text>
I thought this would be a great gift for my child since she is an avid soccer player and very creative.  The markers provided were not any different than ones that we use for crafts.  I hope that her design will stay on the ball after playing with it</review_text>
GREAT!!! It is the Perfect place to store all those wooden puzzles we all have for our toddlers! The puzzles slide right in on the small metal rods...Very easy to remove puzzles! I also like the fact that is made of a lovely natural wood! We have this in our living room, and it is quite attractive</review_text>
My son got this game as a gift.  I brought it into my junior high classroom to use on a game day.  The kids love this game and request it over and over.  Many other teachers have asked to borrow it for their classes.  It is a great vocabulary builder.  I also made my own cards with letters of the alphabet on them.  I use these when we are studying parts of speech --  they have to come up with a noun (adjective, verb, etc) that begins with that letter.  This is a great game and a good way to make a rather dull subject more interesting</review_text>
My 3 3/4 yr old got these for Christmas and he loves them.  Plays with them almost every day.  We bought both dinosaur kits and they are fun to combine together.  My son loves to not only put together the "proper" dinosaurs, but make up his own creatures as well.  A fun way for dinosaur loving kids to engage in some creative "think outside the box" play</review_text>
WE PLAYED THIS GAME WITH 3 COUPLES AND ALL OF US ENJOYED IN VERY MUCH WE LAUGHED THE WHOLE TIME IT WAS A VERY ENJOYED GAME FOR ALL</review_text>
The little mermaid pop-up castle was sold out everywhere this past holiday season selling at $34.99.  I found it on Amazon for $26.47 and free shipping!My daugher, 3 yrs old, just loves it.  The accessories are very tiny, like the tea pot and tea cups.  Tiny like your pinky fingernail.We all love it! Easy to put together, but I think it folds up, I don't know how though</review_text>
Pefect addition to any little mermaid collection. Very durable plastic, not too many little pieces. Clothes for dolls could be easier to take on/off</review_text>
Apparently she has loaded this stroller down with dolls, purses etc and has not let it out of her sight since it was delivered (on time incidentially!)</review_text>
We bought this pool toy for our daughter, and she was thrilled!!! But after being on this toy one time we now call him the bucking bull. Good luck staying on the silly thing. Now my child sits and hangs on to the handles and we pull her around the pool on it. My husband and I cannot stay on this thing either. Every now and then we bail on with sheer determination, only to be off in a matter of seconds</review_text>
I have been having such a good time with this marshmellow shooter! I recommend it to anyone. Plus you can aim at someone and they can eat what the ammo! Thinking of giving these to me employees as Christmas gifts!</review_text>
This item is sooooo cute! Garfield is dressed in his jammies and is clutching Pookie in his left arm. We highly recommend TY Goodnight Garfield, especially if you are a Garfield fan</review_text>
The remote on this car has nice big buttons that are easy for my two year old to use.  One button makes the car go forward and one turns it around.  The third just makes reving engine & squealing tire sounds. Not very realistic but convincing enough for a toddler.  This car has been tossed around and dropped yet still looks and works great.  It is a very durable toy that is simple to use.  It is a great first remote control car.</review_text>
This doll is absolutely breathtaking.  I bought her for my "gift closet", but I think I'll keep her for myself!The price was only $5.29 during the special Toys R Us sale, plus free shipping.  Couldn't ask for a better deal or a prettier collectible doll</review_text>
Excellent!  My 2 yrs. old grandson is loving it.  I purchased a storage case for his Melissa & Doug puzzles, and it helps keep them organized and neat.  Much appreciated by Mom & Dad</review_text>
We learned about these blocks years ago when my now 13 year old was in pre-school.  I was amazed at how these seemingly simple pieces of wood, so totally enraptured these little kids!Kapla, are 'blocks' that are all exactly the same size.  At first glance, they seem boring.  But once you start playing with them, they are so much more.  They can be made into all kinds of structures, and can even be raised higher than one can reach, without falling!!When our 'surprise blessing' turned 2, I pulled them out for him.  He enjoyed them (though at 3 he likes them much more), but what surprised me is that my older two (15 and 13) love playing with them as well!!  In fact, we ALL do!!I know it seems like a lot of money to spend on these, but they are MORE than worth it!</review_text>
My daughter thinks these are the most adorable Fairies.  They adorn every possible accessory she and her friends can attach them to.  You never know who will have which charms as they are always swapping them.  I would say that you get an amazing bang for your buck with these.  They are the "in" thing right now with her 4th grade friends</review_text>
This thing is great. Anything you can put on top of it to hold it down will stage it up to go off. It will blow up and not hurt anyone but scare them...funny funny funny!!!! You can use fairly light objects, you can use trip cords, and you can use trip cord like devices too, and probably much more that I have never thought of... Good luck, good fun, and good hunting!Sam Kochel...p.s. hope this was a helpful review</review_text>
I bought this for my grandson for Christmas, he was 8 months old. This has been the best learning toy for him, along with entertainment. He has learned how the shapes work and took this on soon. It has also helped him in walking. It is entertaining for me to watch him play with this toy, he has to push the button and play the music before he pushes it. I would actually buy one more for him to have at home with Mom and Dad. This is well worth the money</review_text>
AWESOME music and interaction... fun storage compartment under seat and blocks that fit into the sides and play wonderful songs. Gets the kiddo very involved. Transitions well from indoor toy to riding outside</review_text>
We love this game. It seems to be the most fun with 5 or 6 people, although my husband and I also enjoyed the 2-person version.We do not usually use the board. We just use a scorepad to keep track of points.Once you catch on to the game, it's not too hard to come up with answers.Highly recommended</review_text>
Legos, Duplos, Ello.. they don't hold a candle to the Kid Knex in the series. Unbelieveable how much our 6 year old daughter plays with these and our 3 YO son too. These have a good feel for kids too. Bright. Easy to use. We have all in set now. BRING ON SOME MORE</review_text>
I received this for my 3 yr old daughter and she absolutely loves it.  The price is great right now, especially with free shipping.She loves to dress the doll and use all the accessories.  More than worth the low price...I'm going to stock up on a few more for misc. gifts.  The package is large and comes with a lot of accessories</review_text>
My son is a very active 2 yr old and very hard on toys, and these are great. Thick plastic construction. Easy enough for him to hook them up himself. We have 2 different kinds and they are both super</review_text>
Unavailable for some time, the Sky High Suspension Bridge is back.  Once you have the ramps to get the track up there, it really stands out as a part of the railroad.Assembly was required but routine; the directions were quite adequate.  There are no stickers to wiggle into place</review_text>
My niece couldn't put this down after she opened it. She had lots of fundoing tricks for her relatives at Christmas. The components of the setare very good quality. I patted myself on the back for discovering this"winner" gift</review_text>
I've had this high chair for a year now, and I love it.  My daughter plays with it every day, and it's worn great.  It still looks as good as the day we put it together.  I love that it's wood, rather than cheap plastic, and it's a pretty white with pink gingham, which I think is adorable.  The material has held up great and still looks perfect.  The wood is sturdy, with no cracks.  It fits all my daughter's dolls, including her large Cabbage Patch doll.  If I were going to change anything, I'd like a little bar in the front of the seat that would prevent the babies from slipping through (like real high chairs).  For the most part, her babies stay put, but sometimes they slip down and out.  It's not a big problem, though.  Our friends bought the same one a year ago for their daughter, and feel the same way about it.  We love the Badger Basket product line!  I highly recommend this product</review_text>
Another nice product from PlayDough.Worth the ten bucks or so..  We just bought this fromAmazon.  This would make a cute birthday present for a young child, say 2 to 8?  Hard to give an age as I myself like to sit with my son and play!Enough play dough for the price and the bucket is really handy for storage.  I would buy this again as a gift</review_text>
I bought my Harvey toy a while ago, and I was quite pleased. It's actually very durable, like everyone else has said. The crane doesn't break off, no matter how often you play with it or how hard you may accidentaly step on it. I think the only way to break it off is via steam roller.Anyway, highly recommended for any Thomas collector</review_text>
This is an attractive toy for infants and toddlers. The music and lights are nice.</review_text>
This is the best of the LeapPad books I have seen.  My four-year old has spent hours on it.  It's very interactive and covers a lot of ground for that age. Highly recommended</review_text>
Fun for kids age 4 -40.  Bought it as a gag for my college age son... he loved it for pranks, but also let young nieces and nephews play with it.  Kept them laughing for a long time.</review_text>
Being the first Ravensburger puzzle I have ever owned, it is without a doubt the best quality and the best detailed puzzle I have ever worked with.The quality of the product is shown throughout, from the sturdy container, practically sediment free packaging, the exact cuttings of the each puzzle piece (not a single one was still attached to another puzzle piece and there were only one or two frayed cut spots in the whole set), and the high quality graphic printing.The puzzle itself is made difficult primarily by the use of similar colors throughout.  The puzzle pieces are otherwise the standard cut type.The resulting artwork is something that we've decided to actually frame and hang in my office, which we have never done over the years (puzzles can be very calming to work on after a long week of long and stressful work hours - especially when working on them with others).  The puzzle cuts are so well done that it is not entirely easy for someone to tell that it is a puzzle from general glancing unless they get up close (within 2 feet) and look at the detail.I will definitely buy more Ravensburger puzzles and hope that they come out with even more puzzles of this type (old world maps) and same quality</review_text>
An excellent project for your child's school report.  We purchased the Velociraptor kit for our 8 year old daughter not knowing what to expect. After opening the package my wife came up with the clever idea of pouring melted chocolate chips into the dinosaur molds, instead of using the plaster mix that comes with the kit. We experimented with white chocolate chips and created realistic looking dinosaur bones! We buried these edible bones in ground up Oreo Cookies.  What a thrill to see our daughter's 2nd grade class excavate these delectible prehistoric fossils!  We can't wait to purchase other kits in the Eyewitness series</review_text>
When the Toa and all the first Bionicles came out, it was very simple and straigthforward. Bad guys were different from the Toa and everyone knew they were bad. Now, with the Pirahka, we have villians claiming to be Toa! And the matoran believe them!One of the things I really love about Zaktan is his weapon. It looks really cool and can change. Also, the little ball launcher (I forget what it's called) is a lot of fun (I shot my brother with it X3) and the glowing eyes are just plain awesome! Though the rubber part is sligthy annoying, it doesn't really get in the way</review_text>
As a brilliant, but ruthless leader of the Piraka, Zaktan thinks that working together is the way to find the ultimate treasure, the mask of life! All the Piraka have two tools. Yes, 2. Each one has a Zamor spheres which are small marbles that each one can shoot, but in real life they would be the size of basketballs. Zaktan's three-pronged blade is capable of cutting through metal. Nothing will get in his way, or it will be severely punished................</review_text>
I bought the Little Tikes Adjust and Jam Basketball Set for my grandson's 4th birthday. It is perfect for his age group. The height can be raised or lowered and comes with 2 small size basketballs. He loves it</review_text>
I think this toy is just too cute.  It is a bit pricey though.  I would not suggest you purchase this toy for a young toddler...maybe a 2 1/2 to 3 year old.  My daughter likes throwing it on the ground and screaming with delight (she is one and a half).  She really likes it and carries it around the house.  She is a little too young to respect it properly and I fear it may not last long.  It is really cute if you have real stainless steal appliances in your home.  I bought this because my daughter has taken a keen interest in my microwave and I have trouble keeping her away from it.  This toy has solved that problem.  One minus is that it came with no instructions on how to get the table to rotate.  You have to play with the buttons a little and then you will see how it operates.  My daughter can not systematically make the turn table rotate...for her it happens randomly.  She enjoys opening the doors, pushing the buttons, seeing the light come on and hiding her real dinner in there (so parents beware!).  Someone suggested it is a tiny unit...and so it is, but all the other toy microwaves I looked at were very similar in size</review_text>
I bought this doll w/ brunette hair for my 4 year old.  It's so soft and realistic looking, floppy like a real newborn, perfect weight for little ones to cradle.  I'd been looking for a 'baby' doll w/ long hair - some of the other co's make them too heavy, not conducive for real play.  This doll is also washable, a big plus.  The hair is soft and very brushable, the face is sweet and the eyes open and close properly.  A little pricier than your average doll but you can see the difference in the skin texture and facial features. Overall a very nice doll, high quality, hopefully will be played w/ for many years.</review_text>
This toy is FANTASTIC. Although I have the English speaking toy, it still has a similar sounding Italian accent to the toy. If you enjoyed the films, I highly recommend these toys!!! Is it possible to buy an Italian speaking Luigi</review_text>
I bought this Item for my husband for xmas and he loved it but once they were all put together they would fall apart fairly easy but other then that they are great I highly recomend this especialy for a husband or son</review_text>
I bought this for a present for my 2 yr old daughter and she likes it and can turn the handle</review_text>
My 3 yr old grandson loves this. He can manage it ok. Good Gift</review_text>
Satisfied with the overall quality of the product. Also with the purchase process</review_text>
My son loves this instrument, but I think he likes another saxophone that plays tunes when you press buttons better. This one relies on the child to blow and press the keys, like a real instrument, but doesn't sound like a saxophone</review_text>
we saw this online and really wanted it, but decided to wait because of the reviews. well today we went to an outlet store that sells new stuff at huge discount prices, and it was only 10.00 my son has already ridden the heck out of it with no problems, and he loves it. we havent had to replace a fuse and it just the right size for my 1 and a half year old. its a really great little bike, but for the workmanship of it, i definitly wouldnt pay 50 dollars for it, maybe 30-35 most. we just got blessed with a really great deal:) so if ya want this for your kids, its great for the smaller rider, and just the right speed for him to control. hope this helps someone:</review_text>
My family of seven kids, four daughters/sons-in-law have owned this game for 2 years.  We love playing it and it is one of the few games that everyone enjoys.  It is one of our favorite games and that is saying a lot since we own dozens of games.  Our youngest was 12 when we bought the game and she often wins</review_text>
I've been thrilled with the car so far.  Super fast, and super cheap at this price.  It could be a little more responsive when turning, but otherwise great.  Lasted about 25mins with long fast runs using a generic 9.6v pack by newbright.  As other person said, works better on packed surfaces vs loose dirt and grass.  I bought it to bring back memories of my old Tyco turbo hopper from childhood...and it did a great job at that.</review_text>
My son likes this item.  The cars also fit his train set from imaginarium.  The only thing I didn't like about putting this together was the elevator.  Very tight fit and doesn't like to go up or down easily.  But everyone likes playing with it, from the 18 mo old to the 10 year olds</review_text>
We purchased a starter piece set for my girl when she was 3 years old. She absolutely loved it because it was easy to use and build. She had a hard time with the legos type blocks because it was more frustrating for her to pull them apart. We then expanded to this 35 piece and she is able to be even more creative. It is an excellent lerning toy. not as simple as it seems</review_text>
This doll rocks! I love her hair, it's a dark reddish color and it's curled into seperate locks. And her dress is gorgeous! It's a powder pink color with long sleeves, and at the hands it has a big ball of white feathers. The necklece she has is very pretty, and so is her crown. Shes quite durable, and would make a great addition to any collection or toy chest</review_text>
My daughter is one and a half, and she's had these blocks for about a year now, but only now is she really playing with them and identifying the little pictures.  Some pictures are a little obscure, but all the basic animals and objects seem to be covered.  I'm very pleased with how smooth the blocks are, and how well they are holding up.  I feel they will really help my daughter to learn her letters, both in upper and lower case.  My only problem is with the tray.  It only holds the blocks if you keep it completely flat (as if a toddler can transport anything while keeping it level).  I also don't like its sharp edges.  My daughter went through a phase where she liked dumping the blocks out and then waving the tray around.  Now the tray is stored out of reach and the blocks are stored in a small plastic bin</review_text>
My 6 year-old daughter got this for Christmas and spent more than an hour coloring the pieces.  The ink dries quickly and seems to stick pretty well. We have rinsed the tea set a couple of times and never noticed ink washing away.</review_text>
The wooden corral is so simple it encourages hours of imaginative play.  It is just the right size for my child's horses to play in and can be easily set up anywhere.  Yet it is very compact when folded for storage.</review_text>
I give puppytunes as a gift to all my friends that have a new baby.  Puppytunes is always their (the baby's) favorite toy! :</review_text>
Murdoch is a mighty engine with ten drive wheels. He was brought to the Island to help with the heavy workload and pull freight on the main line. As shy as he is strong, Murdoch can often be found seeking peace and quiet.This wooden train is a 2 piece set, joined with magnets. My son loves playing with this mustard-yellow engine on his wooden tracks. Very sturdy construction, and a great addition to the Thomas line</review_text>
This is like a real fish the the tub. Our little one loves it</review_text>
I got this puppy first on accident, trying to get a love and licks puppy. This puppy far outshines love and licks. It actually works without much effort. Nose gets magically cold and it wags its tail without much effort. Great first puppy toy for a child</review_text>
This action figure is sitting on my desk at home. He's my little computer buddy. It's really not bad at all, although the plastic hair doesn't allow his head to move very much. When I'm writing, and I get to a point where I need to back off a bit, I pick him up and change the pose, or threaten my daughter with the masamune, or she and I set him up for a couple of humourous pics. It's great.All hail Sephi!!  (and you can just hear it, Why the heck are you calling me that?   Well, why not?  It's weird and it's not right!  But, Sephi....)Hahahaha. Can't wait to get Cloud too. Then things in my house will be interesting</review_text>
The "Shout About" line of DVD games are a great way of getting people together.We play teams (at least 3-5 people on each) and it is always a noisy and fun crowd.</review_text>
This is a fabulous little Brio bridge.  My kids (6, 3 & 2 yrs) all love this as part of their train track.  It is a sturdy piece which gets used daily.  My kids love that they can drive the train onto the bridge and then push the button that collapses the bridge and have the train (mostly this is Diesel 10) fall down.  It's a reenactment of the viaduct scene from Thomas and the Magic Railroad movie</review_text>
STRAWBERRY SHORTCAKE IS A PRINCESS!!!!! AND SHE IS BEING PULLED IN A CARRIAGE BY HER PRINCE WHO IS ON A HORSE. THEY ARE BOTH SOOOOO CUTE!!!!!!! THIS IS ONE OF THE CUTEST SS DOLLS I HAVE EVER SEEN! THIS IS A DEFINITE MUST-HAVE FOR ME AND FOR ALL SS DOLL LOVERS! BUY HER NOW!!!!!!! 5 VERY BIG VERY BRIGHT & BOLD STARS!!!!!! THIS IS THE BEST!!!!!!!!</review_text>
Completely satisified with the product received.  It was received very quickly after placining order.  Well satisfied with product and service</review_text>
I probably play over a hundred games of Solitaire a night.  I have a hard time sleeping but this game, after playing as many as I do, makes me go to sleep.  I haven't read a book in over two months which to me is remarkable because I have read at night ever since Junior High.  I am now 62 and playing Solitaire.  Thank goodness for it</review_text>
This is a great puppet theater, sound stage, restaurant, play house, etc...  My daughter was 4 when she received this from Santa.  He only wished he had found it sooner!  My daughter continues to love it, and will now be sharing it with her younger sister.  Many hours of pretend have been spent inside and outside this theater.  We especially love it because it is large enough inside for two or more children.  All the others we researched were too small for our needs.  The colors are so vibrant and fun, we get tons of compliments from all our company.  All the kids gravitate towards it</review_text>
I love this puzzle! It is fun and challenging. I believe that it is a good puzle for anyone who wants a challenge. However I find that there is one problem with it. THERE ARE NO DIMENSIONS TO TELL YOU HOW BIG THE PUZZLE IS AFTER YOU PUT IT TOGRTHER!!! I would appreciate it if dimensions were added to the box. I am sure that anyone else who purchases this puzzle would appreciate it to so that they know if they are going to have to purchase a puzzle mat as well if they order this puzzle. If you like puzzles that are not your everyday puzzle I would recommend that you purchase this puzzle because it would make a worthy addition to any puzzle collection</review_text>
I love this doll i only saw her in the store and when i did i fell in love with her i cant wait to get her! but i do think its a bit pricey but its worth the money</review_text>
I understand the people who install car seats who feel this item isn't needed and distrust its lack of crash testing, but my infant car seats are hand-me-downs without LATCH.  My car has LATCH, but does not seem to have the kind of seat belts that stay tight.  My car seat doesn't just get a little loose... you can move it 4 or 5 inches side to side if you try.  It may be that a car seat tech could train me to do a better job with the locking clip, but I can't get it to stop this.  And one of the seats was given to me without a locking clip at all.  I have no problem tightening the seat belt enough - it just won't stay that way.This product allows me to tighten the car seat enough to meet the "one inch" spec.  Nothing else has.  So it definitely adds to my baby's safety.Finally- to the car seat techs- with the number of these that have been sold, it doesn't appear that anyone has come forward to say that it failed in a crash.  Just because it hasn't been crash-tested does not mean it is unsafe.  And there is absolutely nothing wrong with aftermarket goods as a rule, tho manufacturers will ALWAYS tell you otherwise</review_text>
i love bratz, especially ice champions! i want vinessa, and the big ice rink with maribel,the new girl. i'm searching for the new bratz so if anyone knows any other ones except for rodeo sorya,diamondz sharidian, this doll, and maribel, please comment this. i want this girl, she's so pretty! i like how her hair is done and the outfit</review_text>
I purchased this item when my daughter was one year old, and it was amazing!  My daughter was always a good sleeper, but when she began teething at around 9-10 months old, she began refusing to stay in her crib each night.  I was out of ideas, and my husband and I had tried just about every method we read about without success. Finally, I found the Tomy Star Bright Light, and it was like a miracle worker!  The first night I used it, my daughter put herself to sleep in her crib by staring at the ceiling.  Each night, her sleeping became better and better.  Now, we only run it once for 10 minutes and she falls asleep.  It is a much better approach then allowing your child to "cry it out".  She actually enjoys going to sleep now and looks forward to watching the light show before she falls asleep.</review_text>
Grandchildren just about wore it out putting it together so many times...</review_text>
We bought this puzzle for my then 2 year old as he had mastered the barn puzzle (which is also amazing).  There are monkeys, tigers, butterflies, and numerous other jungle animals.  I had to look up several of the animals as I was not sure of what they were.  This was a good educational experience for both me and my son.  This puzzle is durable as are all of the M&D floor puzzles.  It has been stepped on and thrown across the room by a highly rambunctions child.  I have had this puzzle for over a year, and it looks great.  I rotate this puzzle with the other Melissa and Doug floor puzzzles that we have.  I recommend any of their floor puzzles as they are great quality and have easy to handle pieces for kids.  They are a great opportunity to teach about different subjects and teach new words to children</review_text>
I bought this for my 4 1/2 yr old daughter for xmas and she was extremely impressed along with myself.  It's exactly like the "real thing" just smaller! Very durable, colorful, and fun! It's great to use with the Zapf Creation dolls that tend to weigh more than a smaller baby doll b/c the car seat is so sturdy. Unlike most car seats this doesn't collapse and fold up whenever you actually try to carry it by the handle! It is definately worth the price</review_text>
You might be disappointed if you were expecting the exact same thing as the original 1984 Optimus Prime toy (or wanted a trailer for the truck), but this is an updated version of the original character, as opposed to a remake, and is superior in many ways. It is durable, detailed, well-articulated, and fun, especially with the truck parts forming weapons for the robot. I'd recommend it for kids and nostalgic adults alike</review_text>
This product is not the best ever created, as the Roxxi doll that comes with it is not the prettiest of Bratz dolls. She has huge black and red streaks in her hair, as well as an oddly-shaped head. However, one gets used to her and can even find her pretty. The stage itself is a great product, but plugging it in to your stereo is more confusing than you might think. This playset comes with a microphone that is different from the regular Rock Angelz microphone, as it is gray and of a different style. Also included is a faux-snakeskin chair, Roxxi, a guitar, and a few accessories, like bottled water and make up compacts. The stage itself is rather nice, and I strongly suggest the Instrumentz if you buy this. However, be warned that it is not the BEST of Bratz products, despite its appeal. It's rather nice, though. :</review_text>
I love this nativity even though it I think it is pricey.  There are no other ones like it.  They are Fisher Price Little People so you know they will hold up forever!  There aren't any other plastic nativity sets out there. Get the set that plays the song when you place the angel on top of the stable. It is so worth the price when you know they will play with it every year. I even take this to church when I teach my 3and4yr old class about Jesus birth.  They LOVE it</review_text>
My niece was learning about the birth of Christ at school when I got her this Nativity Set.  She was so happy and it was so easy for me to continue teaching her about the birth of Christ and Christmas.  Thanks - I was very satisfied with this item and so was my niece</review_text>
My 5 and 7 year olds have gotten a lot of use out of this toy. It is a strong microphone and seems to be made very well. They love to pretend to be rock stars! My only complaint about the toy is there is no volume control.... so you only get one level...LOUD. I would recommend it for any child that likes to sing</review_text>
I don't understand why they are so offensive to people. I am Christian, and I lvoe all three Midnight Dance dolls. I think they are more 'Phantom of the Opera' than 'Sadistic Satinist'.Meygan is my favorite, but Yasmin is still beautiful. These dolls are gourgeous</review_text>
I bought this Brio train set for my 2 1/2 year old niece over Christmas, and she absolutely loves it!  It's a great starter set and can be expanded with other Brio track sets.  Very easy to put together and the pieces are durable.  Makes a great gift</review_text>
I bought this play tent for my 15-month old daughter for Christmas.  She loves going through the curtain entrances and plays peek a boo through the little window.  She's a little rough on the door, not realizing the door opens outward.  But she's a little young still to understand the full extent of the play tent.  All in all, worth the money</review_text>
Nuparu is SWEET! But, sadly, his skull does not glow in the dark. Nuparu has black/gray armor, a light up sword with a strobe effect, two claws, and a Zamor sphere launcher attached to his back. You must be careful with the zamor spheres, though, because they're easy to lose. Now I have Toa Matoro and Toa Nuparu! YOU HAVR TO BUY THIS TOY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
I bought my son this toy after reading all the bad reviews.I agree that you cant reach all the buttons in the time allocated but he loves it and watches it move round the room. I recommend this product for 9 month olds</review_text>
I LOVE this thing! GREAT product, GREAT deal, GREAT times to look forward to with my grandson - he simply goes nuts over it! Thanks</review_text>
Bought Blue, Majenta and Periwinkle for my 2 youngest.  The kids love them!  I have been purchasing Ty products since their inception about 10 years age.  I am so glad the've branched into some characters my kids love: Blue's Clue's and Backyardigans.  Looking forward to more in the Blue's Clue's line!</review_text>
Damn! I just got the yostick and took it to the local gym and streets to demo some new tricks.  At first I had some doubts about the durability of it but after some heavy duty urban testing, it's still mad tricking.  In other words, I've been trying pretty hard to break it.  For it's price, the yostick is incredible fun.  In an age of pricey video-games, $10.99 is not a high price for something that provides exercise, fun and an introduction to the movement and breathing rhythms of martial arts.  A value-priced training tool, not a toy at all.  The movement required by the yostick will help martial arts beginners have fun while learning precise hand-eye controls.  The ends are fitted with rubber tips making it a joy to trick directly off the ground.  Looking forward to collecting other models. Enjoy It</review_text>
if ya trade toon worldu can use toons as regular monsters and the it wont make yacange the other guy plays toon world it jes works for if u play itand it plays on on the opone</review_text>
My friends and I, all in college, are major movie buffs, so when another friend told me about the game, I was eager to try it.  Some parts are tough, but with the team setup of the game, it seems to even out.  Favourite rounds were Still Crazy: a round where scenes are built piece by piece, a word association round: 6 clues are provided and the idea is to name the movie, and the quotes round, of course!  The hardest rounds were the matching and the trivia rounds.  Still, we had great fun.  Its better if the teams are evenly matched, then its more fun.  The main objection I have is that in the 8 rounds, many of the movies are dated and overused.  There are great ones, though...Rain Man, Cast Away!!  Also, this game is linear in progression, there is no variation in the order of the questions.  Scoring uses the honour system.  There are 3 games, each lasting around 45 minutes at the very fastest, its the same as the cost of a regular DVD and is much more fun with lots of people.  I have bought this for several people and some of my friends have as well.  Recently I played a game where a 12 year old and an 82 year old were playing so don't worry about the age thing, both enjoyed it.  Really, I recommend it</review_text>
Best price I saw for this doll and it came in the mail in a very short time, wrapped securely. I love when you can shop online, beat the crowds and get quality merchandise. Beautiful doll too</review_text>
I bought this for my son for Christmas, which at the time he was only 14 months old.  The age says from 18 months.  The problem is he can't hold the button down to make it go so I have to walk around the train and hold the button for him.  We had a playgroup over and there were kids that were over 2 years old and they couldn't hold the button down either.  Overall my son loves it but its not age appropriate for him.Also, this toy is cheaper at Toys-R-Us.  I got ours when it was on sale for $[...].  After Christmas they had them on sale half off for $[...]</review_text>
This Angel is sure to be a gem in any collectors collection. She is elegant and graceful. Her gown in beautiful as well as her spiral curled hair. She is adorned in a golden head chain. She has a chain sash which is also part of her gown. At last she is given beautiful golden wings and holds a bouquet of flowers. This one will definately be worth the value in the years to come</review_text>
THIS IS A VERY BEAUTIFUL DOLL. I LOVE DOLLS, BARBIE AND I ALSO LOVE ANGELS. UNFORTUNATELY THIS DOLL IS ALSO VERYYYYY EXPENSIVE! I WOUDL LOVE TO HAVE HER BUT NOT AT THIS PRICE. I WILL WAIT UNTIL THE PRICE DROPS OR I WILL LOOK FOR HER ON E-BAY. I WILL NOT PAY OVER 40 DOLLARS FOR THIS DOLL. NO MATTER HOW PRETTY SHE IS! I DO GIVER HER 5 STARS THOUGH. VERY NICE DOLL</review_text>
As with all the leap frog products, this ones a lot of fun. Packed full of learning surprises. I have always felt that making learning fun and easy cuts down on the fact that it's 'work'. The Birthday Surprise is fun and full of rhyming words, that make little one want to learn. I have a hard time giving any leapfrog products anything but a 5 star rating, because of the quality in all their products.Learning last a lifetime, so get them started with fun friends from Leap Frog.</review_text>
This case is nice and tough, it holds all the accessories for the FP3 player securely.  I gave it 4 stars because I think things like FP3 players need a home and it serves that purpose great.  It matches with the player and is built to withstand kids.  I did take a star off my rating because, as it does have a smallish loop to hold it by, it should really have a handle.  Little hands need something easy to hold on to, and the little loop does not suffice for any purpose I could see</review_text>
My three children are huge fans of Melissa and Doug puzzles and with as many as we own we sure needed a way to store them neatly.  Being an organization freak myself, I was in search of the perfect storage case.  Not only did it need to hold many puzzles, but it needed to be made well and look nice too.  Melissa and Doug to the rescue - once again!  We purchased the same storage case in natural and it's been a life saver in our toy room - it makes it easy for them to put the puzzles away without them losing pieces anymore.  You might find it hard to spend $30 on an empty storage case so I suggest looking for the storage case that comes with six puzzles for $60 instead.  More for your money!  In our case, we own so many puzzles that we didn't need anymore and especially duplicates of what we already have</review_text>
I bought this bed for my two year old because he got too big for his crib.  He moves around A LOT in his sleep so I wanted a safe first bed for him.  He absolutely loves this bed and actually he is sleeping much better now than he was before.  The only problem was that the mattress and box spring we bought were too high, so we just use the mattress for now. Eventually we'll put the box spring back in.</review_text>
1. Tape as many Jenga sticks together with masking tape on one side to support a favorite picture that you would like to turn into a special puzzle.2. Have your child find a any picture they would like to turn into a puzzle (even a favorite photo can work.)3. Glue whole picture to opposite side of masked taped Jenga.4. Shellac and allow to dry5. Use excto knife and cut the picture apart.6. Remove tape and voila`--your own hand-made puzzle!Even toddlers can put a 5 piece puzzle of an animal or fruit together and they love creating their own puzzle! Enjoy! Aloha</review_text>
Using his superior intellect and quick wit, Einstein takes on all evil doers who dare to engage him in combat. With the energy stored in the mass contained within his mighty chalk piece that he raises confidently in his right hand he commands the vast power of mathematics to defeat those who dare to forget to carry the one</review_text>
I purchased this toy for my 2 year old son. He absolutely loves it! He had played with it before because his older cousin has one. I had searched in stores around me wanting to buy it but no one had it. Sure enough I found it on Amazon. It's a lot of fun to play with and he just loves to rock out with it. I definately recommend this toy</review_text>
MY GRANDDAUGHTER REQUESTED THIS FOR CHRISTMAS, AND I HAD A HARD TIME FINDING IT UNTIL I CHECKED THE AMAZON SITE..IT'S JUST WHAT SHE WANTE</review_text>
I purchased this Train Case for my son last Christmas, (age 6).  It is very sturdy, with handle.  I like that all the trains can be put into one place and carried away simply/easily.  Those moms like myself, when your child has finished playing, there is now a place for them to put their trains in.  The 'metal' case is a great added bonus, the trains have the magnetic ends and they easily go into case.  Next play time, the trains are all in one spot. Thomas, come up with a place like this for the track - I need it</review_text>
These dolls rock! I love Nona. She's really cool! I also love Tess. She rocks! If you put them together, they're double cool</review_text>
I like Bratz Twiins,and I love Tess and Nona.I like Nona very much.I love her clothes.I also like Tess.I think she is very COOL!I might include these COOL Bratz Twiins on my wish list.SARA SIBLINI!!!MY SCENE LOVER!!!BRATZ LOVER!!!*FOREVER</review_text>
I bought the Harry Potter Magic Puzzles for my nieces and I scored some major brownie points.  They loved this at first because it was about their hero, Harry Potter, however, they play with it for hours on end.  Putting the puzzles together is fun in itself, but then there are the cool magic tricks and the VERY COOL optical illusion using the spiral disk too.  This is great for any kid interested in magic, as well jigsaw puzzles and Harry!  A big thumbs up</review_text>
everything was great! great bed, easy to assemble, my son loves it. Though he still wants to sleep in my bed, but he does play in it, that's a good sign, huh</review_text>
I was very happy with the product I purchased and I received it in a timely fashion.  The product was not worn nor used.  It was as if I bought it at the store at a lower cost.  It was a win/win for me.Thank you</review_text>
Our 3 children have had hours of fun with this toy during the 2+ years we've had it in our home.  True, the food is long gone (cardboard boxes - toddlers - no surprise there).  We've also needed lash the front piece on with some string (again, it's not constructed to be a bumper car but toddlers don't often keep their play inside the box).  The simple design means that when they twist it beyond reason, it's flexible enough for me to pop it back into alignment.  It's small enough to be comfortable for the 2 year old to push(for hours), and close enough to the real thing to remain interesting for a 5-6 year old.  It's gender neutral, forgiving enough to go down a flight of stairs (repeatedly) without breaking, light enough to not squish whatever's at the bottom.... and sometimes they do even use it to play grocery</review_text>
I bought two of these trucks for my twin boys when they were 16 months old.  They loved it so much and the bubbles come out the front for added fun. The music and lots of buttons to push, a storage under the seat and a fire helmet makes this a fabulous toy. My boys are now 27 months and have not stopped playing with this truck!!  Its great, buy it, buy it!</review_text>
My kids (4.5 and 1) love this car. The sounds it makes are great. They take turns riding on it and the other one pushing. It is quite durable and they play with it all the time. Only negative is that some of the stickers peeled off. Overall, it's a great toy and the kids play with it every day</review_text>
He's into firetrucks and Mickey Mouse so you couldn't ask for a better toy.  It's small enough to ride around the house without running into everything, but also durable enough to play outside with. It's the first thing he goes for in the morning and the last thing he's playing with at night (most days)</review_text>
This is the Optimus Prime that should have been made 20 years age. It was a difficult decision whether to open it or save it in the original packaging. Finally nostalgia won out and I had to transform him. It was amazing. The transformation took time but it was worth the wait. I felt like a kid again. I am totally satified with this product.</review_text>
theres a few things the are nice about this prime and things that arentpros:extrem detail coloring is good megatron rifle is sweet mouth movescons:primes regular gun will barley fit in primes hands bit more platic then die cast a pain to transform pushing legs in most of all sound base sounds like a ultra magnus mixed with primeI can find more cons then pros I would ONLY get this toy for some one 11 or older not somebody who goes all wild and takes there toys every where oh wait another PRO!:primes leg vents open when you stand him u</review_text>
I just transformed it for the first time into a truck. It was challenging but doable. Probably one of the coolest toys ever, but I was an 80's child. As someone else mentioned, the grill in front does not quite align with the cab windows when it's all set, but other than that it's great. Tremendous amount of detail (moveable leg vents, head, mouth, individual fingers/thumb poseable, light behind Matrix, datacom interface, working shocks on the wheels, and accessories). It's quite tall and heavy for a toy- very impressive. If a piece snaps off from forcing it the wrong way, it is designed to snap back on. I never got to own a Transformer as a teen but my lost childhood is now officially redeemed. This will adorn my office cube as a conversation piece</review_text>
The instructions could of been better on the hooks and the net but you could figure it out. You had to take the target out that they gave you because if you hit it it would slow the ball down. Then you just put ribbon on the outline of the other target. Otherwise I it is holding up great  so far!</review_text>
My son saved and bought this with his own money.Very durable, great for catching practice my son is always in the yard playing with it</review_text>
I've been wanting this forever and when I got it,it was totally AWSOME!! First it comes with a really,really cool chair (that you are going to LOVE!),it also comes with a SWEET guitar with amp (FYI. the amp has some really cool stickers on it) and it also includes two (2) guitar magazines. I truly LOVE this piece mainly because I've always wanted an amp for my guitars. Oh,I HIGHLY,HIGHLY recommend this you'll LOVE it! Well hope this helps. :)</review_text>
I purchased this as a birthday gift for my 11 year old grandson. I knew it would be a hit as my son had received it as a gift from his grandparents as a child and was entertained for hours with it. It did not lose it's charm for 11 year old boys through the years. My grandson was thrilled with it as well. Just enough challenge to keep their interest</review_text>
Our three Asian-American granddaughters got these today for Christmas and they love them! Ignore the 5-star reviews that trash these cute little dolls, then try to steer you to eBay for another doll. These are the genuine article and kids LOVE them, as they have for generations. Our thirty-plus daughter-in-law still has her original Cabbage Patch doll, and she still loves it, just as her daughters loved theirs today</review_text>
The game is fun....we played it when we lost electricity during Hurricane Isabel and was kept entertained! I dont know if I would take everything in the game as seriously as everyone else is, writing bad reviews. If you look to a board game for "truth" in life, youre not going to get far! This game is fun and makes you think and re-think what you THINK you know! I suggest it for teens</review_text>
My daughter received this toy for her fourth birthday.  She plays with it all the time!!!  It didn't come with any tapes and honestly she doesn't need them!  She spends quite some time speaking into the microphone and using the slide to change the sound of her voice.  It is so funny!  We all get a kick out of it.  There are several different sounds to choose from.  Even her two year old twin sisters get into the act.  They love it.Love this toy.  It's extremely durable.  Would absolutely recommend this</review_text>
I have a three year old son, he loves these take along toys. We take them every where with us. The tracks stay together very well we move them from room to room and never have to take them apart. We have almost every part of the Take Along Thomas the Train items</review_text>
I played this game at a Super Bowl party and decided to order one for myself.  My 8 year-old loved playing it and we recently took it to a family reunion and everyone there liked it too</review_text>
The game is good for all ages.  The train sounds are really great for kids.  It is fun for a holiday or any kind of group gathering</review_text>
Yes, all the princess need a prince to fight over.  We had a blonde to do the honors but the girls are much happier having 2 competing males to do the honors.  His clothes are easy to get on and he is as dashing as they come.  Need to find one more less european prince to finish the collection</review_text>
I bought this house for my daughter who will be 3 in 2 month's.  I did a lot of research and was torn between the twin town house and this one the Loving Family Sweet Sound's house. At first I almost went with the My first doll house by Fisher Price but was told by a friend she would proberly grow out of that fast and she was right.  This house the Sweet Sound's is a perfect size for her and I know she will get quite a few year's out of it.  Yes the Furniture is impossible to find.  After reading the review's I didn't look for it much knowing I would never find it.  I ended up buying her the Twin town's bathroom and a few pieces from the My first doll house by Fisher Price.  The pieces work perfect together and are chunkier for her and not so many tiny pieces.  They work great with the doll's that come with it too.  I did also purchase one doll set from twin town house.  The house does make some sound's with just the pieces that come with it, they are cute and my daughter doesn't know any better that it would make more if we could of found the correct sweet sounds furniture.  She's Happy with the way it is. I decided against the Twin Town because I agreed with some reviewers after looking at it that the room's were too tiny.  Yes you get more room's but my daughter I know would get so frusterated with alway's knocking the furniture over in those tiny room's.  This house has big room's.  It fold's up easy in half but not so good when it is filled with furniture.  We leave it open anyway's so that is not a big deal.  It was easy put together but the sticker's took about and hour to put on.  Also a note make sure and put the battery in BEFORE you fill it with furniture, I put the battery in last and ended up spilling the furniture everywhere.Also I didn't see any one mention the front door.  I am not really sure why but it doesn't open from the outside, only from the inside.  You can open it from the outside but you have to pull it very hard and really aren't supose to open it that way.  Why not be able to open it both way's???  I guess their thinking is so if you are moving it so the door doesn't swing open but they could of put a little latch on it so you could of closed it shut when you wanted.Also I am not sure what room is supose to be the bathroom.  I think it is either the bedroom or above that which I thought was the kid's playroom.  I ended up putting the bathroom in the right side of the bathroom.All in all I think is is a great doll house and I would recommend it</review_text>
This Emperor Penguin Puppet is a real hit with my 5 year old.  We almost never use it as a puppet but rather as a plush toy/pal.  This penguin looks round and pregnant, but to my kid, this penguin is a perfect friend.  He has pretty much outgrown all of his plush toys, but for some reason, this one has a place in his heart and in his imagination</review_text>
I have an infant in-home daycare and needed a quad stoller for my four babies.  When I first found these connectors, no one could tell me if they would connect two tandem double strollers together.  I asked every store in town almost (some didn't even know what they were!). I just decided to buy them and hoped that they would work.  So I went out and bought two Kolcraft Lil' Limo strollers, not knowing, of course, if it would work or not.  I'm happy to say that they seem to work really well!  I did have to buy a second set, though, so I have five connectors on mine(couldn't find room for the sixth one).  Just lock the two inner front wheels so they can't turn and you're off!  It is a little hard to turn corners(just take them at a wide angle), but otherwise it works great!  I ended up spending just under [price] for the total cost of it, much less buying an actual quad stroller.  I hope this info will be helpful to someone else also. Good luck</review_text>
I just got the whole set of geotrax and really think they look great and way cheaper than Thomas however the round housecan only hold one train at a time so it derails the train if you have more than one locomotive. they really need to add the reverse as well so they kids and me ( mom ) LOL can really make use of all the options. However, overall I really love this toy but yes I had to convert my office room into the Geotrax room. be ready to do this if not stick to the basic set up. Its very hard though since it all is so coo</review_text>
I was very pleased when this toy finally arrived.  The Blue Devil is removable and semi-posable (his arms move).  He is the same size as the Simpson figures from the Playmates line of toys, so I feel like he was made with collectors of those figures in mind.  The Homer donut-eating action doesn't always work correctly--the mouth and donuts aren't correctly synchronized, so sometimes the donuts miss his mouth--but that does not detract from the fun</review_text>
Classic, durable, fun, educational -- for kids of all ages, including me</review_text>
I played "Atmosfear, The Harbingers" on VHS in the mid-90s and several years later bought a copy of the game through ebay.  Then, I saw this DVD update and gave in to temptation when the price was marked down.  Here's my judgement: 1) The mechanics have been simplified.  This has it's pros and cons.  It could have been made easier to learn without removing as many components.  2) The gatekeeper has less of a nasty/funny balance in the DVD update.  3) It is a major upswing to have his dialogue randomly disbursed.One reviewer seemed to think the game was boring.  I'll guess, instead, that the people he parties with don't have the attention span for board games.  Too bad for them.  Atmosfear - The DVD Board Game get's a B+ from me</review_text>
This is a well thought of game.  A game where the players play along with the DVD as the Gatemaster gives you commands, rewards, or punishiments while they are playing the game.  Players can also watch the rules and the setup instructions on the DVD.  Six keys of six different types will be laid out on some of the spaces, as your goal is to get one of each type and rush to the center before 49 minutes is up.  If neither player wins in 49 minutes, the Gate master has defeated you.  In the beginning you write down your fears and reveal them at the end which is always fun.  The board has six territories.  Each character owns a territory which has a set of the same keys.  You can pick up a key by landing on the key space, having a card telling you to, gate master telling you to, or winning a duel.  A duel is when you land on a battle space and 2 players wager a key for a dice roll to see who gets both.  There are two types of cards... TIME and FATE.  Land on a skull head and get a FATE card which allows you to do something in a certain situation.  A TIME card you get if you land on a clock.  A time card allows you to do something if you play it in the exact second it tells you to. Sometimes the Gate master will give you the power to banish someone.  When there is reward, there is also punisment.  If you land on the cursed key, you have to pick it up and whenever you have it, you cannot win.  If you are landed into a black hole, you cannot participate until you are freed.  Also, you can lose keys.  During the game the Gate master says "Stop!" frequently and the players will have to lisen to what he says or be punished.  All in all, it is one of the best games out there and well worth the money.</review_text>
The 1st version of this game was a fun and exiting game for my family. but we soon got bored of the same video over and over. We could not believe it when we saw a new version of the game out, we rushed out to buy it and found this version not the same and not as complicated or as fun as the first they should have just released the first version of the game with new dvd setup it was a waste of money</review_text>
This toy is wonderful for several reasons. For one thing, it's really the only shape sorter your child will ever need. It has very basic shape sorting (with cut out holes in the sides and one door that can be opened for any shape block to go in), plus pretty complex shape sorting when you open various locks.The toy also helps teach colors and animals, and the locks develop fine motor skills even further.Overall, this toy is very well made. It's real wood, dove tailed together. It could, of course, fall over, but if your child is the 18 months or older that is recommended for this toy, he or she probably isn't small enough for it to hurt. The locks on this toy are a little more chintzy. They wobble, which makes locking or unlocking some of them more difficult...But you could look at this as just another learning tool.My biggest concern is that the blocks are relatively small; they could squeeze through a toilet paper tube. This means they are a potential choking hazard, so you'll want to supervise when your child uses this toy.All that said, my 20 month old LOVES this toy and plays with it more than anything else she has</review_text>
As a mother of 5, this toy has proven to be one of my favorites of all time.  My son received it for Christmas (at age 2 months) and it has been wonderful.  We place it in his bed at naps and at night, and he goes to sleep watching and listening to it.  When he wakes up, it is there for him to play with.  As he has grown (he is now 7 months), he has become increasingly more interested in the sounds and textures of the toy, and now puts the corners in his mouth which has helped with teething.  I have been impressed with the sound quality (it is not annoying like most musical children's toys) and I will be anxious to see if it causes my son to love music on a different level.  LOVE THIS TOY!</review_text>
My six month old enjoys this.  It can keep him occupied for 10-15 minutes at a time, and the music is quite pleasant and soft.  Good toy</review_text>
I bought this for my 6 month old granddaughter and she loves it! The music quality is great and she really enjoys the lights. It has a very sweet face and she smiles and talks to it a lot. I got it on clearance which is good because as cute as it is, I don't think it is worth the original price. I would definately recommend it if you can get it on sale</review_text>
This doll is cute and fun to play with. My daughter loves it. I like these dolls better then bratz. They need to make more dolls that are dressed the way kids are. I think that Lil does. Im happy and my daughter has a toy I think will be around for a long time.</review_text>
It is a very nice product. I bought if for my 1 year old grandbaby to take to nursery with him. I put in pictures of the family so he could look at them with his teachers. My daughter says it very useful, and he is adapting to his nursery quicker.</review_text>
This is a super fun toy that my daughter has had now for over a year. If you can find it ANYWHERE I would highly recommend it. It plays pre-programmed songs plus your child can also be her own musician and even record her music for playback. The microphone is nice for aspiring American Idols (like my daughter!) and it really is pretty. We did lose the dancing Cinderella with Prince Charming, but while we had it is was beautiful to watch them dance while the piano played. It also does a pretty light show. I cannot give this toy enough stars as it is a really wonderful toy for 3-6 year old girls</review_text>
I got this yesterday for my daughters (3 & 6 years old), and they like it very much...let's see how long that lasts.The space is kind of cramped, but both of them fit in there with a few dolls, so I wouldn't complain about that.  Setting it up was pretty easy, and although it has almost no stability (it gets toppled every couple of minutes or so), that doesn't seem to take away the fun from it.However, there were a couple of surprises for me:a)  The product I got is very different from the picture in the advertisement.  It is still shaped like a castle and has the Disney Princesses and all, but it is just different.  I am not complaining, my girls like it a lot.b)  As I said before, setting it up was fairly easy (just keep your face away as you take it out of the box, for it will spring out on you VERY FAST), but, trying to disassemble it and putting it away is a completely different story.  For that, you have to remove 4 rods (which were not so easy to insert in the first place), and then, you have to fold the thing away twisting it in a way that only experienced snake handlers would be expected of being able to do so (I don't care how easy it should be according to the instructions).  I tried it for about 20 minutes until I gave up.  And, if you don't keep the box this thing came in, just forget about storing it folded, it would be like trying to keep a "Jack in the Box" compressed without the "Box".  Think about it.So, if you don't mind adding this to the permanent decor of your house, go for it, your girls will probably like it.</review_text>
My 2 year old daughter recently recieved this as a present from her grandparents. She loves the disney princesses and was ver excited. I was happy to see how easy it was to put up and take down, she plays with it in her room almost everyday and I love the fact that we can take it down before she goes to sleep. Overall we are very pleased with this tent, although it would be nice if it was a bit bigger so that I could play in there with her</review_text>
I was disappointed when I opened the box and set up the tent because it was much smaller than I expected it to be. My friend's daughter has an almost identical tent which is much bigger. Apparently there are two different kinds, one made by Playhut and one made by The Disney Store</review_text>
I gave this as a gift to a friend who is a huge fan. I've never seen a 29 year old so happy as he made the whoosh noise as Starscream flew around in jet form. Great quality, durable, and fun to play with</review_text>
I just gotten this yesterday for my 12th birthday and I love her so much! She is beautfiul and her hair is so soft, the clothes are adorable and she comes with a poster that comes in a accesorie bag for all of you Bratz Kidz accessories! This doll is the best! I am going to get the other Bratz Kidz for Christmas!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
We received Boggle Jr as a gift at Christmas. My daughter is almost four and absolutely loves this game. She is learning her words and is learning to spell. This is a wonderful game for learning picture recognition and verbalization and moving on to spelling three and four letter words. I told my sister and she requested it for her son. He's a happy camper with the game, too</review_text>
My son is 4 1/2 and he loved the set.  He and his dad set it up on Christmas and enjoyed ringing the bell.  I would recommend this for kids any age</review_text>
The Suduko Board Game is the perfect gift for the older kids on your lists.  It is well made and can be played by one or two so they can use it alone or with friends.  Since it is wood it will last a long time whether it is being played by middle schoolers or college kids. Also, I paid $17.99 for this and have not found it anywhere near this price.  It is usually $29.99 to $39.99 for the exact same game</review_text>
My little cousin sarah loves this toy. i bought it at wal-mart in springfield. it works with or without water and features realistic sounds. i am now on my way to purchase another for my 6 year old cousin sean</review_text>
My 6 year old loves this. yes it is small but who wants a big toy around the house this can go right on a shelf when not being played with I would get it again if I did not already have it</review_text>
This doll is so beautful. Back off everybody, I am the bratz number 1 fan with over 120 of them! Seriously, and thats not all, I go on the website 4 hours a day, and am collecting bratz babyz and have many bratz furniture. Consider me the bratz expert.OK so hi everybody! I'm here to give you some tips 'n' tricks as well as handy hints on this particular talking bratz doll, who is my fave character YASMIN!This doll, for starters, is a mixture of diferent bratz collections.  She has a bratz princess T-Shirt, wildwest cowboy a-go-go boots, forever diamonds fur, Bratz Fabulous coat and Passion For Fashion miniskirt. I mean Whoa! If you wanted to buy any of those dolls listed above, just get this! She is a mixture of all!Secondly, she talks! Which is great. She is also interactive, saying over 125 phrases. If you place her with other talking bratz dolls, she will get excited and start to have a conversation! She can also talk to you if you are lonely. She has a sensor so she 'knows' what yor saying and can give a correct answer!Also, she'll be your best friend at nightime. her lips light up while she speaks! The base at the bottom can be removed so she can be like a regular bratz doll! If you, however, press the button on the base, her lips wll still light up as she speaks.And at only $19.99 , parents, all of you parents out there, you don't know what your missing</review_text>
My 6 year old loves this toy.  She made all 3 bears at one time.  My husband helped her.  They are well made and close up in the back with a zipper and special tool, so they do not come undone unless you want to open them and re-stuff them</review_text>
We bought my son a couple of starfighters, the tri-fighter, the AT-RT, and the wheel bike.  He loves the starfighters and likes the AT-RT a little.  He rarely plays with the wheel bike.  I think the starfighters are just simpler, sturdier, and easier to play with.  The wheel bike (and to a smaller extent the AT-RT) are more complicated, and thus less fun for a 5-year old.We run around having mock dog-fights with the starfighters, but poor old General Grievous sits in the toy box.Overall, probably good for older kids who can more expertly manipulate the legs and other stuff, but not all that fun for the younger guys</review_text>
These blocks are so great! They've gone through their different stages of growth. They learned to reach for them, peek inside, grasp them, toss them around and now stacking them to make towers. My triplets are 20 mos and have had them for about a year. Love them all</review_text>
All of the peek a blocks are fun. Although each set has a different 'theme' they are very similar and enjoyable to play with.These blocks are great fun. Each block has something interesting inside it. In our house these have been played with by boys and pretty roughly at times. The windows to see inside are still clear and not one of these blocks have broken. So I would say they are sturdy and hold up well to normal play.On the ends of each block is a texture. Within each block is something interesting. And many blocks have an activity associated with it- push a button to make a noise, twist a knob to make something turn around etc.The one thing I would warn is that these blocks do not stack well, particularly in tall towers. So if you are thinking of buying these for tower building, I'd consider a different set of blocks. Otherwise, these are excellent toys.They provide a basis for communication and vocubulary building with your child. They are sturdy and encourage language, eye hand coordination and so on.If you enjoy toys that are fairly quiet, do more than have a push button to make a noise, foster independent creative play and exploration of the world this is an excellent toy.Enjoy.</review_text>
Fisher-Price is bringing back old time well-made toy construction with their Peek a Blocks! I have 4 kids who are 5 and under, and I have to say that they ALL get use out of these blocks! If you love Peek a Blocks, please feel free to join my Peek a Blocks group at Yahoo Groups:http://groups.yahoo.com/group/fisherpricepeekablocks/It is completely free and we have been having some interesting discussions on there about unknown secrets of Peek a Blocks!</review_text>
My daughter has trouble concentrating in school. I got this for her birthday and her grades instantly improved to the point where her teacher stated that there was a noticable improvement in all areas of her work. The best thing about it is that I don't have to tell her to use it because she loves it. I told her it's just like having a laptop because she always wanted a computer of her own. This is as close as I'm willing to get concenrning her having her own computer at her age, plus it's a minute fraction of the price of a personal laptop.For children who don't have a hard time in school, this may not be for them but for my daughter it is a whole lot of what I needed to help me help her learn. I just wish I could find an adapter.</review_text>
First I have to say Thank You to Amazon for having this game. This was on my daughter's Christmas list and Amazon was the only place I could find it. Second, my daughter loves this game and so do her friends. They have played the game more than any other she received</review_text>
My baby is only a year old and has a blast playing in his tent and tunnel.</review_text>
MY TWO YEAR OLD SON GOT THIS POOH BEAR FOR A &quot;BIRTH&quot; GIFT.  HE BRINGS HIM EVERYWHERE.  IT'S GREAT BECAUSE IT DOESN'T TAKE UP MUCH ROOM.  HE HAS TWO NOW, BUT LET ME TELL YOU HE CAN TELL THEM APART!!!  THE TAG ON HIS &quot;FIRST&quot; ONE IS SLIGHTLY MORE WORN AFTER COUNTLESS WASHINGS AND HE LIKES THAT ONE BEST.  THE &quot;OTHER ONE POOH BEAR&quot; AS HE CALLS IT, WORKS ONLY IN EMERGENCIES.  MY 9 MO. OLD DAUGHTER IS GETTING THE PIGLET SINCE SHE LOVES THE POOH TOO BUT THERE WAS NO CHANCE OF MY SON GIVING ONE UP.  BUY THIS TOY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
i love that soft cat and thought i would get my real cat a friend didnt work oh wel</review_text>
This product is fun for the whole family. I hope my kids have as much fun as I did with them when I was young</review_text>
In Boggle, players compete against one another and a 3-minute hourglass to find word combinations across randomly distibuted letter cubes on a 4x4 grid.The game develops pattern recognition skills, and because most possible words are only three or four letters long, astute younger players can play adults without too much of s handicap.Tactics learned playing Boggle translate well into success at Scrabble and other word games, while the clock management skills help with chess and test taking.Boggle is lightweight and makes a good travel game, though you might want to bring a zipper-lock sandwich bag to avoid losing the letter cubes. As an added plus, the game can be played solitaire with minimal dropoff in entertainment value.If you enjoy Boggle, you might want to seek out Big Boggle, which uses a 5-by-5 grid (56% more cubes). Words and time limit are both longer.</review_text>
I received this Ty pig as a baby shower gift. My son "discovered" it when he was 18 months old and it's his dearest companion besides his "night-night." Piggy must go for car rides, eat with him, get jammies on and go to the Dr. to have his temperature checked. We love Piggy because when he's covered with milky Cheerios, we can just throw him in the washer and dryer. He's good as new in about an hour. Who wouldn't love that? It's also a great toy for allergy sufferers because it can be thoroughly cleaned regularly to remove dust mites. We love it and my son loves it. Now we ordered a spare Piggy so that there is a Piggy substitute when Piggy is bathing. Enjoy your toddler</review_text>
We originally bought this game at the Chiricahua National Monument in Arizona for our kids (8 and 10 years old at the time) and they loved it.  We love that it's Monopoly, but one that creates interest in visiting our national parks.</review_text>
I just bought this doll @ Toys R Us and I was also able to purchase The Hilary Duff Shopping Sisters doll which is supposed to include her sister Haylie Duff which isn't available yet. I have the two other Hilary dolls the first of which was released in 2002 or 2003 and it was a Lizzie McGuire doll which doesn't look much like Hilary at all. Then there was the Hilary dolls released by Playmates which had a more slight resemblance than the first doll. Now Mattel has made a doll of Hilary Duff and it is by far the most visibly accurate doll I've seen. And the clothes and accessories are really cute too. I think a lot of girls would love this doll and possibly older fans too. I'm just waiting for the Haylie Duff doll to debut early next year and her doll also bears a striking resemblance. The dolls are available @ Toys R Us, KB Toys, Wal-Mart all under $20.00.</review_text>
I think this a great item for a child over 3 1/2.  Since there are 4 puzzles in one box, our son, who just turned 3 has a hard time keeping the pieces separate.  They are symbol coded on the back, so I think once he gets older it will get easier.  He loves the pictures and I love that the pieces are sturdy and how much he is learning.Highly recommnde</review_text>
this pony has proved (along with the Princess Promenade) to be one of the most popular of the my little pony's we have bought. It comes with a pink skirt, a pink crown and high heel shoes. The most popular item was the dressing table with revolving mirror and after several months it still hasn't broken despite harsh treatemnt. The pony is white with silver strands through the mane and tail. It was very pretty but the rough treatment really does make the mane matted very quickly. Also, think about getting white pony's very seriously for younger children, While the coloured ones can be drawn on with pen and the stains wiped off and at least partly concealed - on white ponys it is impossible to hide. For the younger ones (3 year olds) it is hard to get them not to at first. Desert Rose was very pretty but is now a bit stained and sorry looking. Never the less she is integral in my children's games still which is nice. One of the more popular ponies we have bought. Generally very hard wearing, including the accessories, the only item which has been broken is the crown which didn't last - it was too thin and got badly bent early on</review_text>
My daughter had a 12 Dancing Princess party and she LOVED the game.  It's a little tricky for her to do the set up, but she enjoys playing it</review_text>
My son received these when he was 7 months old and we are loving them!  They're adorable and chunky and work great on carpets or hard floors. They're easy for little hands to hold on to and a couple of them rattle.  When my nephews come over they always find these--and they're 5 and 7</review_text>
We are huge Blues Clues fans and this is our favorite Blue ever! His is really big and sooooo soft! This buddy is much more cozy than the smaller beanie baby version. He is a great, cuddly, no frills (no buttons to push or batteries to replace) buddy! My toddler sons love this Blue</review_text>
This little toy is cute. My 11 month old son LOVES BLues Clues and loves this toy. He will hold him on his lap while he watches his favorite show! Its really cute</review_text>
Bought this for my 2 1/2 year old for Christmas and he loves it.  All you have to do is press a button on the back and it moves it's head and roars.  Very easy for the young kids to do and my little guy loves it</review_text>
MY CHILDREN LOVED THIS TOY FOR ALL OF (1) HOUR. MY ONLY COMPLAINT IS THE MATERIAL. YOU CAN PROBABLY GUESS THIS PUNCTURED ALMOST IMMEDIATELY. I MADE SURE TO CLEAR DEBRIS BEFOREHAND AND IT SEEMS SOMETHING VERY SMALL WOUNDED THIS TOY. I'VE REFILLED IT BUT I'M A LITTLE APPREHENSIVE ON WHERE TO LET MY KIDS USE THIS. IT SEEMS THAT IT TAKES VERY LITTLE TO DISABLE THIS TOY.</review_text>
This is my favorite game of all time. This is the kind of game my family and i love to play at our beach house every morning. It's a great family game. Really for no one over mabye seven. I recomend this to any family who loves a great game to play with the whole family</review_text>
My son received this toy for his first birthday!  I will be purchasing it as gifts for all my friends!!  He LOVES pushing the button and listening the the music.  I was wondering if he would be able to figure out the gears, but he has caught on very quickly and loves to take the gears off and put them back on.  He also enjoys stacking the gears up and watching them go around!  I like that it has a handle so he can carry it around with him.  It keeps him involved for up to 20 minutes at a time!It is very durable as he carries it around, has chewed on the gears (which are made of strong plastic and cannot be marred by chewing on them).My three year old also likes to play with it!  Her play is a little sofisticated with it as she tries to figure out which gears have to be put where (as in, do they have to be next to the middle spinning one) placed to make them spin and how many can be stacked and they still turn.My one wish is that Playskool would include a few extra gears.  We have them everyhwere in our house and cannot always find them all.  It would be great if they had a place where you could purchase extra ones for replacements and/or to have extras for stacking.This is an awesome toy that the kids love, can learn from, and is very durable!  It is a must have!</review_text>
My one year old has had this toy for about 4 months now and it's still his favorite toy. There is no end to the amount of fun my child has with this toy and he keeps coming up with new ways to play with it. It's hours of endless entertainment!</review_text>
We've had one in the house for a few years now. The kids (5 and 2-1/2) love it. It's soft, cuddly, and sized just right for them. It's been taken all over the place, has provided companionship for them on many a long trip (including two to South Korea), given comfort when they are sad, and been used for countless hours of make-believe. Its worth has been far more than what was paid for it</review_text>
A great way to save kids artwork. I use the pockets to organize by grade - it is great</review_text>
When I ironed my 14M son wanted to play with it. He helps with the house cleaning.  I bought this toy iron that really has an on and off switch, sprays water and pretend buttons.  He loves it and pushes it around the carpet like he is ironing the carpet.  We "play" iron with the water when I have time. This is one toy that I can take anywhere and he stays busy for quite some time.Sigrid Manon Blake - Ramire</review_text>
This is one of the few toys, it seems, which has remained fundamentally unchanged since we were children.  The push-stick is shaped a little differently (I remember a thin blue broom stick with an orange or red handle) but otherwise, it is the same.  No electronic sounds or flashing lights have been added - although you can get it that way, too, if you want.  Personally I think these things detract from the imagination building aspects of certain toys.  I'm not saying we have no talking or musical or flashing toys, but it dismays me when these things are added to the classics (think Little People farm etc).What I love about this toy is it can be ANYTHING.  It's a sweeper!  It's a carpet cleaner!  It's a mop!  It never fails to crack me up when my son comes running after me with his corn popper when I am cleaning.  It's a lawnmower!  So many jobs around the house or yard can be copied with the corn popper.  And if mom or dad isn't up to much, it's still great fun to run around with which means exercise for the kiddies.  It's a solo toy and a playing-with-other-kids toy.  Any time we have other children over to play, the corn popper comes out as they chase each other about the house.We got this toy when my son was 13 months.  He is now 3y4m and still playing with this toy.  I have seen 5 and 6 year olds still playing with the corn popper.  There are few toys that are so simple and yet offer so much fun.  Sturdy, too - very important as it's bound to be crashed into a few walls.  I can't think of another toy which will give you more bang for your buck - unless you count dirt and measuring spoons and all those other free things that kids so exasperatingly pick over the toys you paid good money for.I am a little alarmed at the current PRICE listed for this toy, though.  You should not need to pay that much for it.  Occasionally this item becomes hard to find - especially at Christmas - but usually there are tons of them in the stores for around the cost of a President Hamilton.  Right now this is listed for twice that.</review_text>
This toy is the coolest toy I've ever used! When I have slumber parties I always play music, and my friends always say that I have the coolest boombox. Some of them are even thinking about buying one. I love listening to music on my brand new bratz lips boombox. And this year at my birthday slumber party, I'm gonna play music all night. This toy is just so cool!!!!!!!!</review_text>
My daughters love this supermarket checkout ! They've had it for a few months and haven't lost interest. I would recommend it for any child who likes to play pretend.  The quality is what I expected...works fine</review_text>
Bought this game at Books a Million in North Carolina for a mere $10+tax. A very good deal! Although I don't keep up on a lot of contemporary literature, I was able to do pretty well. Within three hours I had all but one pie. One of the teammates did as well. The third of us wasn't as lucky, but it was a fun game nonetheless. As with all board games, the fun is in the company, not knowing all the answers. The questions were good, and yes - tough - but they were tough for all of us, not slanted towards one particular audience.I would have given this 5 stars except that there really do need to be more question cards. But for $10, three adults had three hours of intelligent entertainment (we went through half of the cards). We got our money's worth</review_text>
If you are not a literature professor or don't read everything that the library gets in, you will probably find this game extremely difficult. On the other hand, you now have a book list</review_text>
We live in Alaska and really wanted two of these games to pass on to our married daughters since it has been a holiday tradition to play.  We found them for purchase on Amazon but were displeased at the cost to ship to Alaska.  Although we are part of the US and USPS ships for a reasonable price, we weren't given that option and paid at least double what it could have been.  UPS and FedEx rip off those of us in Alaska while USPS treats us just like everybody in the Lower-48.  Give us a USPS option</review_text>
We purchased the item hoping that it would be of reasonable size, meaning the food would be closer to "real" size rather than miniature. It was. We also hoped it would be made well and stand up to hopefully more than one generation of use. That remains to be seen, but the stuff is made well and I cannot see it breaking unless you deep-freeze the plastic pieces and hit them with a hammer. Nice texture, nice flexibility, pretty realistic looks. The child it was intended for (age 4 and a bit) plays happily with it, even the older boys (10 and 13) have had a few moments of goofy fun with it</review_text>
I have two boys, 10 and 12.  The younger one bought a webkinz first and after seeing how much fun he had at the website, the older one asked for one for his birthday.  The website is very kid friendly.  You won't have to worry about what they will see on this website.  It is great fun, and even I play on it!  I highly recommend this for any age child</review_text>
I purchased this expansion set, along with the Thomas and Friends Water Towr Figure 8 Set, for my 2 year old this past Christmas. The expansion set was an afterthought, prompted in no small part by the manufacturer's promotion running at the time (50% off this set with the purchase of a Figure 8 set).With the conclusion of many initial hours of intense playtesting (an ongoing process, with no termination in sight), my son agrees that this is an essential choice for any but the most basic (read: boring) wooden railroad layout. This expansion pack comes with switch tracks, and allows little train engineers (and their dads) to reverse directions or explore different parts of the railway. In retrospect, I think that I would have been dissatisfied had I not purchased this set to complement the basic Figure 8 layout, promotional price or not.As far as the quality, the Learning Curve wooden track is made from hardwood, and is more substantial than many other brands of compatible track (i.e. Maxim, First Learning, etc.). This is a consideration when your child insists on taking the track apart by him/herself to put away. We have already broken a couple of pieces of generic track this way, since the male end of the connectors is a bit weaker than the rest of the track.Overall, we are quite satisfied with this set, and look forward to many more hours of enjoyment</review_text>
Wow! This is an excellent deck that lets you automatically get the Harpie Lady Cards, and as well as a monster card based on one of the characters from Legend Of The Mystical Ninja</review_text>
But I like Sasha and Jade better. She's cute though. She has brown hair with blond highlights and big hazel eyes and her beauty mark looks so cute!Her first outfit is a pink tank top with a silver necklace design. Her skirt is a strange black, pink, and gold pattern. Her shoes are pink with small gold hearts and a yellow "stone" in the middle.Her second outfit is a black tank top with a silver chandelier design. Her jeans are light blue with flower designs and a silver and hot pink fringe over it. Her shoes are black mary janes with red designs on them.Thanks for reading my review! Hope you enjoy her</review_text>
Our son plays with this board while I'm feeding him.  He's only 20 months, but using this board is helping us introduce the numbers to him.  It's well built.  Arrived in only a couple days.  Our son loves it!</review_text>
We bought this set for my seven year old boy and we were a bit dissapointed. There are better magic kits out there for the price for older children. (Look at the Marshal Broden Kits by Cadaco). If you have a young child is is four and five though this is a great set. The tricks are easy to work and they are big for small hands. Anyone who has any magic sets or tricks though will find this too simplistic and not as exciting as many of the other kits.</review_text>
My 3 year old opened this for Christmas and loved it.  Who would have guessed that this little car would have been a bigger hit than a lot of the more expensive things he was given!  It doesn't get stuck on any surface that we've tried it on and drives right over things in its path, which my son thinks is REALLY COOL!  Great toy for a relatively inexpensive price</review_text>
No bells, no whistles -- Just an action figure with its' own four-wheeler.  It can capture the mind of a car-obsessed 6 year old boy for an hour at a time at least :-)  Some of the objects that the action figure is supposed to hold don't stay in his hand very well, but oh well -- it seems that all my nephew wanted to do was crach the thing anyway!  And it takes that quite well.</review_text>
My son received this one as well as the other colorfelt toy.  He was not impressed with it in regards to playing with it on his own.It does work well for teaching and using it as a toy that we can play together.</review_text>
I was very pleased with the order and the speed at which it was delivered. More important, my grandson loves it. It was what he wanted and could not find it here so was very glad for AMAZON</review_text>
More track is the first thing you're going to want to buy after your first GeoTrax train set.  It will seem like you never have enough straights and curves to bring the track design to reality.  The "switched" pieces work out better as the child gets older (3-4+)</review_text>
I THINK THE HAIR MAY BE A BIT OVER DONE BUT EVERYTHING ELSE IS RIGHT ON. I LIKE THE MAKE-UP AND THE CLOTHES AND SHE DOES SEEM TO RESEMEBLE VERONICA FROM THE ARCHIE COMICS I REMEMBER READING AS A CHILD. I GIVE HER 4 & THREE-QUARTER STARS. (IT WOULD BE FIVE IF THE HAIR WERE BETTER.) SHE'S STILL A GREAT DOLL THOUGH. NEARLY PERFECT!!!!!</review_text>
I love this doll but the only complaint i have is the eyes why are they looking to the right ! Mattel please if your gona make more then please put the pupul in the middle. Pleeeeeeeeas</review_text>
Easy to follow instructions for set-up and play, very intuitive.  The only thing I would suggest is to make sure the young folks have an 'elder' playing on their team, to have a shot at the questions on old people, events, etc.  If they're real sports history buffs, then it's not an issue</review_text>
Love it!  The questions are great...the "party mode" is great entertainment</review_text>
My son calls this a flute, and rather than argue, we let it go. But his little hands have a hard time holding it. (He's 4). Even I have trouble. I'm right-handed and the right-hand keys are on the bottom. I don't know if that's how real clarinets are, but it's awkward. Also, your whole mouth has to be covering the entire mouthpiece in order to make it play, so that's also a little frustrating. But the sound is great and it's fun to play once you get the hang of it</review_text>
This toy is awsome !I Truly recomend this to you and all your friends!!!</review_text>
We purchased this for our 5 year old along with the spy goggles.  He immensely enjoyed both.  As a matter of fact, the adults were quite taken with it too</review_text>
Nursing Nana is a great gift. It is soft and cuddly, and the puppies attach with magnets, giving a realistic nursing "tug" as you attach and detach them. This would be a great gift for a child when a second or third child is being born to take the angst out of mom nursing the new baby. It is a bit smaller than I anticipated, but it is still worth it because it is well-made</review_text>
I am in my twenties...I had one of these dogs when i was little and i loved it. It shows kids the way dogs naturally  feed their puppies. Of course it is only a stuffed animal so it is not going to do anything. But in my opinion it is a very cute toy for a dog love</review_text>
This is a beuatiful dining set.  True, it doesn't come with the pony as it clearly states in the product description, but we have too many already.  Anyway, I would recommend it for the crystal princess castle or you can even use this with other doll houses</review_text>
I keep this on my desk at my office, people love it, and it a lot of fun to watch them during the day. I highly recommend</review_text>
I bought the Sea Monkeys on Mars for my 7 year old son.  He loves them.  They hatched easily, grew quickly and are quite cute.  He loves to feed them and watch them swim.  They are eductational and fun</review_text>
Webkinz Hippo arrived in an exceptable time frame and in good condition.I will definitely order others</review_text>
This concept is very interesting and new fangled (at least to me) as far as plush animals.  The interactive/internet/game aspect is very clever and provides a lot of fun for kiddos.  I got this for my nephew and he likes it.  It keeps him entertained.  One thing--they just don't make stuffed animals the way they used to as far as quality.  Justin is not rough with his toys, and this hippo has already lost some of his hair.  I wish we could find good quality plush anymore.  I hate the idea of disposable toys because I grew up with tonka toys and teddybears that I still have.  I still have my Raggedy Ann and Andy dolls from about twenty-five years ago, and they have never lost hair.  So buy the hippo for fun, but don't expect him to survive</review_text>
this was a super soft animal and one of the kids in my life ended up with it being and aunt/grandma a lot of them end up in new home</review_text>
This is a fun toy for anyone who is a StarWars and Mr. Potato Head fan</review_text>
A retooled mold brings this 60s sci-fi kit back to the hands of today's kit builders!Not QUITE accurate to the sets & miniatures of the original show... the passenger compartment should have 2 more seats, the control yokes are not included with the pilot's console, plus the top dome is round instead of teardrop-shaped... but these are all true to the original Aurora model.Wouldn't take much to fix the mistakes, as there are plenty of references & replacement decal sheets out there... or just build it "as is" for nostalgia value</review_text>
I started playing this game in it's original German version. Which, went through some revision as the expansion decks were put out. As a result, the english version may end up being a little more together as you get the expansion decks. Talk about a wonderful game to play for two people! It is absolutely well put together, though certainly different in playing than the boardgame version of Catan. It uses the same notions, but has a far more dynamic involvement within the game play itself. The expansion packs are absolutely great, and overall add lots of options and twists to the play of the game. IT takes a couple of hours, and a signicant amount of table space. It travels well enough in it's box, but to actually play it you need time and lots of space.I highly recommend it, especially if you are only two people and looking for a game that you can play that is fun, involving, and certainly full of strategy. This is one of the many wonderful games made by Klaus Teuber, and I hope he keeps coming up with winners</review_text>
This is a great game for two players (and two players only).  The first one or two times I played, it was very, very slowgoing because there is a lot to take in.  However, once you adapt to the numerous cards and they become familiar to you, games tend to take about an hour.  It's a fairly involved game, so you have to be in the mood for that.  There's a lot of strategy and many ways to win.  I greatly recommend it for those who already enjoy playing games.  It might be daunting for a really casual gamer, though.  If you like it, there are now expansion sets available that add lots of spice and variety to the original</review_text>
I bought this for my niece and it arrived within a few days in great condition.  It was still in its original box and it wasn't dented or anything.</review_text>
Lots of fun for young children. My kids ages 2, 4 and 7 all enjoy building creatures with this set. The only negative is that there aren't very many pieces. If more than one child wants to play at a time you will need more sets</review_text>
Of all the toys our son has gotten, this one has stood the test of time. For over 2 years he has consistently sought out this train to play with. It has survived being dropped on almost a daily basis and still keeps going. Highly reccommend</review_text>
I stumbled upon this game years ago, and my family has enjoyed it--even my adult friends, who seemed to balk at first at playing a kids' game.  This past year, I decided to purchase it for my sixth grade classroom.  I must say...WOW.  I allowed the kids to play it for a while during homeroom, and kids would be waiting early outside the room to get in and snag the Frog Juice.  They would even play it over other outdoor games at recess.  Anytime you heard a "NOOOO!" in the room, you knew someone had pulled out the Witch Wash.  The kids LOVED it.So, I have come back to purchase a new deck for this upcoming year.  To any educators who might be reading this, it makes a great addition to the intermediate classroom for those few minutes of downtime, and because of the math and bit of strategy involved, you don't feel guilty about it at all.  Plus, it is something different and for the teacher, inexpensive as far as games go</review_text>
This is a veary FUN baseball game, I first played it at my summer camp and it was so fun, I got it for Myself!!!!!</review_text>
A great game for the whole family.  My visiting Swedish friend enjoyed playing so much that she bought one to bring back home with her.  If you like Sequence you will have fun with Kings in the Corner</review_text>
Our family played this game a lot during the 60's.  We had a blast with it.  I didn't think much about it until this year when my son turned 6.  It's a blast for family fun</review_text>
This was my first Schleich World of Knights figure, given to me Christmas of this year. It's a highly detailed classic dragon, with no moving or detachable parts (the wings are an integral part of the figure). As such, it's safe for very young children, and you don't have to worry about someone's eye getting put out. As to its historical accuracy and educational value, I really cannot say, never having seen Dragons in the wild, but the level of detail is wonderful, and it should encourage children to obtain the more "practical" members of the balance of Scheich World of Knights collection, which are excellent, as well</review_text>
I recently purchased this game using a gift certificate.  My little boy LOVES it. I think it's quite interesting as well but there were several typos on the game cards.  Frankly, there needs to be better proof reading.  Was this game assembled and printed in another country other than the USA.  That would probably account for it</review_text>
We had looked a lot of places for jack in the boxes and were pleased to find this unusual one. My girls love horses so it was a pretty easy decision to make. The music is great and it is easy to operate for both of them ( ages 20 months and 3 1/2 )</review_text>
It takes a few hands to learn all the tricks to this game, but once learned, it is a lot of fun. A good game for four players, and a great game for six players.  It generates lots of lively action, with the bidding for the cards.We played this game on a cruise with four strangers. They were no longer strangers, after the game.  Everyone we have played with say they are going to buy it.  That's how we got it.  Bought the game after playing with family.</review_text>
This figure is one of the best in the marvel legends series. I have over forty of the marvel legends figures and this is the tallest. The hair on his body looks real and his joints aren't to tight, but not to lose either their just right. I couldn't wait for them to release more Exiles members like Noctourne, Blink, Morph, & Mimic. I wasn't very happy to see the marvel legends series coming to an end with the seperation of marvel from Toy Biz the last series are going to be realeased later this year. I'm glad to see Psylocke & Falcon before the series end, but what about the wildly popular She Hulk. They've got the loser Sabertooth from the Exiles coming out, but not She Hulk. If you're going to bring an Exiles to the series at least bring characters we like. NOCTOURNE, MORPH, BLINK, MIMIC!!!!</review_text>
We purchased this game for our son for Christmas.  He is a chess lover, and we wanted to get him something a little different.  Chaturanga was perfect, since it is the precursor to chess.  He has enjoyed the game.  All of us were impressed with the bookshelf edition.  It is an attractive box.   We are very pleased with every aspect of it</review_text>
Chaturanga is the oldest known form of chess.  It dates back to India in the seventh century A.D.  Front Porch classics has carefully re-created this game and it is now available to everyone!The game itself is beautiful.  It is played on a fabric playing board (all games were once played on fabric, it's extremely portable and cheap, and cardboard wasn't even invented until the late 1800's!).  Unlike chess, the game can be played with two to four players.  Each player gets 8 playing pieces, made of clay: A Raja, an elephant, a horse (cavalry), a ship and four infantrymen.  These pieces are kept in beautiful velvet bags.  Each piece does have a loose equivalent in modern chess.The Raja is the most important piece, much like the king.  The elephant acts much like the rook.  The ship is the bishop, and you cannot capture a Raja with the ship.  The Cavalry moves exactly like a knight.  The infantry, which in this game look kind of like tiny Buddhas in lotus position, are like the pawns.  The big difference between Chaturanga and chess is that Chaturanga is played with a four-sided die (it's a long rectangle, instead of a perfectly square cube).  The die tells you which piece you have to move.The game is somewhat easier to learn than chess, but easily as much fun.  The game can and should be used by teachers and parents to introduce their children to the history and culture of India.  The rulebook includes lots of interesting information about India as well as about the history of the game.The game comes in a convenient Bookshelf Edition, where the game is kept in a beautiful book-shaped box that looks great on any bookshelf or coffee table</review_text>
We bought this for our daughter's first birthday. She was immediately interested and so was her three-year-old brother. In addition, her five cousins (ages 5-16) and their father (36)were also captivated. There are eleven gears in five colors that spin when the button is pushed. Initially, she loved to take the gears off and teeth on them. She is fourteen months now and puts them back on. She presses the button to watch them spin. She has taken it to the sitter's and the kids there have played with it all day. When we take it to the sitter's, I put it in a bag because the gears do not stay on when the toy is vertical. So far,it appears to be a toy that will grow with her as she and her brother play with it differently. We rotate toys, but I leave this one out continuously and I often find her playing with it quietly by herself. I have given it five stars because it offers a variety of ways to play (the gears can even be stacked), is different from all other toys they have, appeals to a wide range of ages, grows with the child, does not use up batteries (we are still on the first set), and seems very durable. I recommend this toy</review_text>
This game is a great way to pass twenty to thirty minutes.  It is very easy to learn and does not have any pieces to lose, or money to count.  The strategies, however, are numerous, and there is an equal amount of luck as skill involved in good gameplay.I really liked how the game could ONLY be played with two people, as I was tired of games that COULD be played with two, but which were really meant to be enjoyed by three or more...Game Contents: 1 deck of game cards, and one small board.  Note: If you want to make this game really portable you don't even need to bring the board.  It is just a place to put discarded cards and a way to help organize your cards.  As long as you have a pencil and paper for scoring at the end of the game, you can play it everywhere that you have a table.  (I figure you need as much space to lay down your cards as the size of a typical Monopoly board).Playing Note: One thing that was initially a little confusing to us when we were reading the instructions, was that the instructions do not explain that you are to place your cards on the opposite side of the board as your opponent.  You can each play all 5 expeditions, in a head to head manner.  We were sitting on a couch at a coffee table, and we had turned the board horizontally to face us (instead of vertically) and the instructions were confusing until we moved the board 90 degrees.  The game designers assumed that you would play the game as one would play a game of checkers, sitting across from one another, but you don't actually have to play this way, even though you DO need to turn your board for the same effect.This game is really fun and I would highly recommend other games from the same manufacturer (Rio Grande Games).  They really have a knack for publishing great strategy games.  They even release expansion sets to their popular games, and they credit the players who gave them the ideas for the expansion cards.  Pretty neat</review_text>
This is the first game I've tried by the venerable Reiner Knizia.  I was really taken in by the combination of simple rules, but interesting strategy.  Since then, I've purchased several of his games.  For those who like Lost Cities, but also have a soft spot for Poker, try Battleline.  Samurai is a great introduction to the sometimes complicated world of "tile games", with Tigres and Euphrates being the much more complicated cousin (although again, the rules aren't that complicated...the difficulty comes via strategic decision making.)So far, my all time favorite Knizia game...and frankly, one of my favorite games period, is Modern Art.  The game mechanics are fairly simple, easily explained in 5 minutes, with some of the more complex bidding rules explained in a trial game.  Essentially, it's a game about playing an auction...who is the best at playing the market, guessing at art values, and spending money wisely.  It's also a true crossover game... non-gamers, or those only exposed to the standard Monopoly, Trivial Pursuit, etc, will quickly learn how much fun it can be... and will probably be asking to play again</review_text>
Lost Cities is a really fun game, and very addictive.  I've personally played over 200 matches already on the free online version available at http://www.flexgames.com/  Check it out and play against some really good players across the globe and get a feel for the game itself before buying.  I've had my name in the notification list for this game on amazon.com for some time now, so I'll definitely be purchasing it right away</review_text>
Vakama is very cool.You must get him!He wears the Great Mask of Concelment and comes with a kanoka disk</review_text>
Hello,My name is Cloe. Yes, because I love Bratz so much I changed my name from Matisyahu to Cloe. I love this doll. IT BEATS BARBIE AND KEN BY A MILE. Speaking of Barbie I also reccommend the singer AQUA she sings " I'm a Barbie Girl." Buy Cloe and the others while you can!!! It's worth it and it will be a decision you will NEVER in your whole entire life, however long that may be, regret</review_text>
The girls liked this doll.  The wings are velcro so they can make her into a princess or play with her as an angel- they like that.  Great buy from Amazon</review_text>
I wish I had one of these when I was a kid.  The canopy tops this stand, it rotates to block the sun.  Every passerby will know what's for sale.  We even use it inside for play. It's a well made toy and I would purchase more products from this company</review_text>
My two year old boy absolutely loves these puzzles. They're soft but sturdy and are more challenging than peg puzzles. It's a great puzzle for kids that can do more than peg puzzles but aren't ready for the regular 10 piece interlocking puzzles. There's a base template for each puzzle to help put it together or you can remove it for a bigger challenge. The only downside are some of the very small pieces...definitely need parental supervision for kids under 3</review_text>
Well, this is the expansion for Settlers of Catan, and a lot of things have changed. The ability to build military forces adds depth to the game, as does the city improvements. The abundance of new cards is worth it if for the beautiful illustrations alone. The expansion makes the game a little bit longer to play, but it still should finish out well inside two and a half hours. My only complaint is that in several games, the Barbarians have not beaten us once, they are way too easy. However, this is minor and can be remedied with a house rule of your own. All in all, this makes a great game TOTALLY AWESOME</review_text>
Maybe it's my computer or browser, but the picture here doesn't do this doll justice.  I bought one at my local drug store before I saw it here at Amazon.  I can tell you that this Beach Glam Barbie is gorgeous!  The picture here looks faded to me, but I have the doll right here in front of me, and the pink accessories are a lovely perfect shade of vivid pink, not pale or washed out as it appears to be in this photo.</review_text>
This toy is pretty stellar. I mean, you can play battleship anytime you want w/o having to ask someone else to play with you. It is awesome for long trips or just something to do if your bored</review_text>
My girls were given this game a couple years ago. . .ages 2 and 3.  They crack up over the voices and play it still.  I like it also b/c it's so darn cute</review_text>
This is a great Barney musical songbook, and can also be used as a play piano.  It's great that it has an auto turn off, after non-use.  However, if it is turned off, and something touches it, it automatically turns on by itself.  Many times, after the kids went to bed, and we happen to put something on top of the Barney Sing 'n Play Songbook, it turns on by itself.  Because the Songbook does not have a physical turn off switch, and something touches it, Barney will start talking in the silent room when the kids are asleep.  Just wish it has an on/off switch, so it will not be turned on accidentally.  Otherwise, my 3 year old loves it</review_text>
My son got this toy for his birthday about a year ago, when he was two. It was one of the gifts we let him pick out on his own. He loved it and played with nothing else for a week! The songs are cute and familiar to him, plus Barney talks and sings to the music. The only draw backs were that I couldn't find an off button and that it is $20+ at local retailers. I wish the toys companies would cut us parents a little slack. LOL</review_text>
This Schleich Haflinger is a good buy. Schleich is as detailed as Breyer, and are as big as Breyer Paddock Pals. This Haflinger stallion is a palomino, with a shaggy mane and tail. This horse is full of personality, and is well worth the money. Your kid will love this model horse.</review_text>
I don't agree with the other review this doll is great to play with. She has such a pretty dress and vail. Her hair is very long and it get tangled pretty easy but if your good with barbie hair its not a problem. I would suggest that you buy the groom at the same time take it from me I still really want him. The barbie with blond hair is also very pretty</review_text>
I love anything Barbie, anything pink, and anything that supports the Susan G Komen Foundation.  This doll is all of those wrapped up in one neat package.  I am thinking about giving them to my female relatives for Christmas</review_text>
My little granddaughters loved receiving this.  Especially after they figured out the sandbox works best when not dumped on each others heads and the lawn</review_text>
We have had this sandbox for five years.  It has been durable and my two kids ages 3 and 5 just love it.  Color of the plastic is still bright and has been under sun for years.  Sometimes water seeps in when it rains but this makes sand play even funner for kids.  We tend to put a rock on top of lid to keep it in place though it does cover the box perfectly.  It is also nice that the lid is attached to the box itself and is easy for kids to remove and put back on when done.  The kids usually sit outside of it though it can accomodate 1-2 small kids inside it as well.  I find most kids dont want to get sand all over and end up sitting outside of it regardless. Overall good investment and the kids love it</review_text>
I noticed that this ladybug sand box only had 3&amp;1/2 stars and the others all had 5. I felt a need to speak up.  We bought this sandbox for our first son when he was three.  We lived in an apartment with a small back patio.  It was perfect, not too big but still room for a toddler or two to sit in it and play.  He played for hours!!  Now 5 years later, his little brother loves it and my first son, almost 9, still plays with the little one in it.  It still looks brand new, nestled under the tree in our big back yard.  It's really great just smaller than the others. We have since given this for every two year old birthday present we've bought! I highly recommend it</review_text>
I give this toy low marks for educational value for two reasons: first, humans were not contemporary to the brontosaurus, and second, the egg is too big to have been laid by the adult dinosaur included in the set.  My mother sent this toy as a gift for my son's first birthday.  The package suggests this toy for ages 2-5, and in typical fashion, my son found the box to be just as interesting as the toy itself, but my three-year-old daughter was immediately and completely enchanted with the toy.  She began role-playing with the dinosaurs right away.  "I love you very much," said the mama dinosaur to her baby.  Supercute</review_text>
No hiking dad would be complete without a Kelty kid carrier.  We have taken ourseverywhere.  From Disneyworld to the Redwoods.  They distribute the weight to your hipsmaking it much easier to carry a child where ever you want to go</review_text>
She is so cute! I love the real hair, I've made loads of crazy designs. Also, I made a discovery, if you squeeze her tummy, she cries, falls asleep or says "I luv you mama"</review_text>
This chart has been an excellent way for our children to track their daily progress towards completing their weekly chores and an excellent way to begin the work for allowance process. Only draw back there really isn't enough room to track chores for more than one child</review_text>
This is a GREAT way to get your child(ren) to do the things that need to be done around the house.  I purchased two, one for each of my older children and they love that they have control over keeping up with the board. It is easy for them to use and easy for you to keep track of their progress.</review_text>
Got this as a fun birthday present for my husband who adores anything Star Wars. He liked it so much he brought it to work and we now occassionally hear stories about Darth Potato and the Spud Troopers waging war on unsuspecting engineers. It's a GREAT Geek toy</review_text>
I just bought this yesterday and surprised my girls (3 and 5)  with it today.  It does blow tons of bubbles!  They love chasing them all over the yard.  The Gazillion bubble solution that comes with it is cool because the bubbles are really colorful when they come out.  It does used 8 AA batteries as previously mentioned but there is an order from inside to send away for an adaptor.  Yes, it has a plug for an adaptor to plug it in so you don't use so many batteries.  Where I'll plug it in in the backyard I'm not sure yet.  I definitely recommend for the young children that are so excited by bubbles</review_text>
My son loves the Imaginext dino collection. He has almost all of them. They're durable, fun and educational</review_text>
This thing is great. Our 4 year old loves it.  The working drawbridge, breakaway wall for cannon fire and trap door are great.  Considering the size and number of pieces, it was remarkably easy to put together.  Allow 2 to 3 hours for assembly, but the directions are excellent.  Only complaint is that some of the small pieces that don't always want to stay together - some of the "details" will likely be missing after a few weeks.  Overall, very happy with it</review_text>
My son received this toy as a present from his father on Christmas (Dec '05) and he was able to play with it straight out of the box.  I bought my son the V Smile system and he can't use that as easily as he uses the read with me system.  While a agree with some of the previous reviews that this system would not take him to seven years old, it does build his confidence level and keeps him motivated to keep playing because he was getting the answers right.  While with the V smile system he prefers I play and he watch. So I am happy with this purchase and will buy more DVDs for the system.  I have  only one complaint and that is  I wish they would use both traditional stories and use some of the newer characters.  My son loves Thomas the train and even though he has the little engine that could I think he would also like to see Thomas the Tank Engine, Dora the Explorer, and maybe even some books in foreign languages.  But all in all a great system for the younger preschool children.</review_text>
I was skeptical at first and I am so happy that I got this for my kids. I homeschool my children and needed something to keep one of the kids busy while I was working with another. This is easy to use, fun to play and I like the stories that are available. I think you get a great product for a great price</review_text>
I gave this game to my 13 year old nephew for Christmas.  He actually wrote me a thank you note for it.  In the note he said "I like it better than normal Monoply.  There's a lot more thinking and strategy involved".  I might even go up to five stars</review_text>
I recently bought this toy for my 2.5 year old daughter.  She likes it and plays with it everyday.  All the parts assembled easily - I didn't even use the directions.  I have not had any trouble with parts falling off or breaking.  It's great to use an outside toy</review_text>
This is a must-have item if you want to add the Clock Tower to your set.  It also works well with the other "elevation" sets, particularly Mile High Mountain.The set includes the following:4 ramps (these are made from two shorter pieces that are screwed together)2 curves2 short straights2 guard rails2 end ramps8 arches (2 supports and 1 crosspiece each)The crosspieces of the arches have a picture of how the ends of the track should be aligned.  The screws are a little tough but never need to be removed.  The set is enough to run up two full levels and back down again (my son has played with this set just by itself having fun running up, around and racing back down).  You can also make two single-level bridges, a single level bridge and a ramp down from Mile High Mountain, or many other setups.This set literally adds a new dimension to a Geotrax set.  Lots of fun.  The short pieces also allow for different configurations that may have been frustrating in the past.  Definitely fun.</review_text>
There are so many great things about this that I don't know where to start.  Availability--price--shipping--the list goes on and on.  Bottom line is that my daughter is a big Care Bear fan and it's impossible to find this bear anywhere else.  It arrived quickly, was just as described (in fact it was softer) and occupies a place of honor on my daughter's bed.  I give it a 5, only because that's the highest.  Makes a wonderful gift!!</review_text>
This track set is ok but it's not that thrilling.  We ended up buying more track and other stops.  Over all the train is great.</review_text>
What a wonderful toy. The no volume control worried me, but it isn't that loud. Great value,Great toy</review_text>
We got this for my daughter for Christmas and she just loves it. The music is a little loud but she highly enjoys it</review_text>
My little girl loves her, and she always has Magenta with her when she's watching Blues Clues. Only thing is she is a beanie baby so she's small.</review_text>
This doll looks like it will be a collectible in a few years. The Lucy in Paris Barbie is already worth more than double what it was selling for a few years ago. This doll will probably go up in value as well. In regards to the person who returned this doll twice for a slightly dented box...GET A LIFE! Who in the hell would return a doll just because the box had a dent! If the doll wasn't damaged why are you returning it????It's life, nothing's perfect, GET OVER IT! You can't expect perfection...as long as the item itself isn't damaged there's no reason to make a big fuss over the cardboard box it comes in! This is a nice doll (even if the box is dented) and I would recommend purchasing it. I ordered this doll and the box mine came in was in good shape (to me anyway). As far as I know, buyers on ebay aren't extremely picky on the condition of the box...they are more concerned on the condition of the doll and whether or not it is still in the box.</review_text>
I like that everything fits in the case.  My 2 year old enjoys dumping all the pieces on the floor.  No big deal.  You can also store a few parts in the potato and take it with you.  Very happy with purchase</review_text>
This is sooooo cool the fashons DO smell like fruit!!!! polly looks sooo sweet! and WHAT IT ITS ANA!!!!! Lisin BUY This it comes with ANA!!!!! Ana is RARE!!!!!! WOW! it comes sooooooooooo much outfits!! you can get it at Toys r us or target or was it walmart??? oh well get it now! I also have the one with lea and lilla Get both they are SOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO COOL!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Gota go now! BYE Love jackie age... YOU SHOULD NO BY NOW!!!!!! :) :) :</review_text>
I'm not sure why so many of these (all?) reviews are for a different product, but this one is actually for the balancing bike. We got this for our son for Christmas and he loves it. He just turned 5 and has a bike with training wheels but it's still too big for him. I don't really like the idea of training wheels anyway so I started looking for something like this balancing bike. I saw a German one for $350 so I was thrilled to find this one for under $100.It was so easy to assemble. I love that the seat height adjusts. My son rides it around the house and after just a few tries was able to coast down the hall on it with his feet off the floor. I think it's a much better way to learn to ride a bike.The quality is good, the seat has a bit of padding, and I expect it will hold up well for my other child when she's old enough to ride it in a couple more years.I gave it four stars instead of five because it's put together with screws, it's not fine craftsmanship. Best buy in its category though</review_text>
I loved this trike!  It was given to my son for his first birthday and he loved it.  Daycare was in walking distance (I lived in the city) and I used the trike to take him.  My son loved to hold onto the handle bars, it gave him a sence of freedom from the stroller that he hated.  My son is now three years old and I am buying a new one for my one year old. I understand some people give this product bad reviews but there is a 1-800 number that goes with the toy.  The brand  Radio Flyer is well known and the customer service line is very helpful and willing to replace parts or defects.  This is the only gift that was given to my son that I can say "I LOVE" and have had for more than just one year!  Enjoy</review_text>
We recently purchased this playhouse, and discovered that it does not come with the peek-a-boo shutters (I don't see the shutters in the photo either although they are mentioned in the product description).  Our 3year old and 18 month old both enjoy it, but I would say it is more fun for the 18 month old than my 3 year old since there is little to actually "do" inside the house.  The doorbell makes fun sounds.  It is very easy to put together</review_text>
even though i dont have this i think is the most cutest thing i have ever seen</review_text>
I give this 4 stars, because I like it (maybe more than my toddler). When I was in kindergarten or 1st grade, my little brother, who was 1 or 2 at the time, had the original -- the one that just popped, and he loved it.  He would push it around until the popping drove my father "crazy." This one does even more.  It pops, counts from 1 to 10, plays music, and has flashing lights.  I think it's an awesome toy, especially for the price.  My daughter doesn't play with it every day, but when she grabs it, she'll push it around for maybe 10 minutes or more (we haven't found a single toy that will occupy her attention for longer than that).  Sometimes, she'll push it around several times a day.  It's great for that stage when your toddler likes to push or drag things around with them.  The popping was inconsistent when we first received it, but we took it apart, got the gears aligned correctly (through trial & error), added more Vaseline to the gears for lubrication, and now it pops, counts, plays music, and the lights flash consistently every time.  If you take this toy apart, be careful not to pull out the speaker wires -- we did that, but it was no problem.  My husband soldered the wires back together</review_text>
I bought this game two weekends ago and have had both fun and frustration with it.  I'm a Freecell junkie and have gone so far as to download a better version (more games) than the one that came with my computer.  I lost track of how many total games I've played over the years since I've used several computers, but I play about 10 games a day on average.  I'm very competitive and love keeping track of my stats.  Unfortunately, that is the weakness of this version of the game.  For example, if you get into a position were you can move only one card back and forth between two columns and there are no other moves, all you can do is hit the replay button or move on to another game.  If you hit the replay button you don't get a loss recorded, which of course you should.  Consequently, it is easy to run up a high win percentage with this version of the game just by resigning a game when you think you are going to loose and replay it.  Then when you finally win, you get credit for a win.  Of course, that is not proper scoring either.  Also, there is a key combination that when you do lose a game outright and want to replay, you don't get any further losses counted against you.  That's as it should be.  The only problem is that key combination is very flaky and doesn't always work.  Other than scoring inconsistencies, it's a great game!  It's very easy to use.  Although different to use than playing with a mouse on your computer, if you've played a lot on your computer you'll pick up the operation of this version almost immediately.  The display is large and easy to see, and there is a low light level sensor on the front that will automatically light the screen when you are playing in an area with poor lighting.  That is a great feature.  I love playing this game while sitting in the airport waiting to board a plane and on the plane itself while in the air.  It's a great and challenging way to pass the time away if you like playing solitaire.  On the next version of this game, I hope they will beef up the statistics capabilities of the unit</review_text>
My 3 year old loves this toy. He has a lot of the Krypto toys and getting Mechanikat was essential. We just got it for Christmas so am not sure of its longevity. It does seem to be pretty well made. Also got Snooky Wookems with it. Great for fans of the Krypto cartoons</review_text>
Her favorite toy... she loves the microphone... keys light up to prompt her to press the keys and play a song.... this thing is great</review_text>
This is the third or fourth Quixo game we have purchased to give as a gift!  We originaly recieved ours as a gift about 5 years ago and it has been a favorite ever since.  Quixo is tic tac toe with pieces that move.  You have a strategy, then oops, your opponent chages it all with one move. It is suitable for anyone from age 8 to adult.  We keep ours out at all times - a coffee table game.  It is very high quality with real wooden blocks as playing pieces.  Enjoy!</review_text>
We have this product and LOVE it!  At first we had a problem with the hooves not working.  I called the number on the box.  They were wonderful and sent me new hooves at no expense or item return.  Then I find it was user error!  Santa didn't realize there were buttons in the heel of the hoof that push down when walking.  I called the company back and they told me not to worry about the exta hooves they sent.  To enjoy.  I would order from them again</review_text>
This was a Christmas gift, and the person loved it.I was so happy I chose this website to purchase from!!</review_text>
This is without a doubt the best [...] we have spent on a toy for our 7-year-old son, but it isn't a toy. It's a highly functional, albeit inexpensive, metal detector. We've had it now for 3 years and take it camping, etc.It will easily find something as small as a rusty staple, and will detect a railroad spike as far as 4 1/4 inches down, very good if you consider how small the detection coil is. When camping the kids love to find and dig up ancient tent stakes, rusty nails, and the occasional coin.Adjusting the sensitivity is trivial, just hold it away from any metal, and turn the sensitivity knob until the red detector LED just goes out. Other reviewer has noted that the three-piece shaft breaks easily, which happened on ours, but a little duct tape goes a long way and this shouldn't stop you from buying one.If you get one, make sure to bury some coins and other treasures in the garden for the kids to find.PS It also really works great for locating studs and plumbing pipes in walls</review_text>
This is perfect for any stop-motion animator. With over 30 posable joints, Thoron is inexpensive compared to other figures.Also, Thoron's nemosis,Stendhal, is a great figure for animation</review_text>
After three years of dragons who walk on all fours, we get a dragon who stands upright.  Seems kind of strange.  Thoron's debut appearance was in the "Fire & Ice" Portal Of Fire set.  He makes another appearance here in The Metal Ages, and he looks a lot meaner here.  Perhaps the rigors of battle are wearing on him.  I bought Stendhal first and was very pleased with him.  I found Thoron to be somewhat disappointing.  He's got some great detail, but he's not as articulated as Stendhal is.  Replacing the standard light-up feature is a dragon roar feature.  Thoron doesn't light up, but he has a variety of growls and roars that are activated by a button on his chest.His articulation is pretty decent.  His hind legs (which he stands on) are stiff and can only move back and forth.  But it gets much better when we examine his arms and head.  His arms can move back and forth, and away from his body.  The shoulder joint can move in two directions.  We get two additional points of articulation at the elbows and wrists.  Thoron's wrists aren't as versatile as Stendhal's are (Stendhal's wrists can turn in addition to the claw moving back and forth).  His neck can move left and right, and his head can move in all manner of directions.  As always, his jaw opens.  His tail is flexible for super-posability, as are his towering wings.  He can also turn at the waist.  My complaints with Thoron's articulation are twofold.  It would've been nicer if his hind legs were posable, and it definitely would've been nice if his wrists were articulated like Stendhal's are.Thoron is mostly dark green with white highlights on his wings, white claws on his feet, and silver colored armor.  As mentioned, the detail here is better than ever, and everything has a realistic look.  He comes with a removable piece of armor for his head.  I think he looks better without it, but maybe that's just me.  Thoron is one of the most charismatic dragons I've seen (it's all in the face and eyes).  He looks kind of mean and vicious.  Stendhal is supposed to be the bad guy, and he doesn't look this mean.  The original Thoron from the Fire & Ice series has a better facial expression.This action figure comes almost completely assembled.  I just had to attach his wings.  Also included are some parts for building a small tower with decorative blades and flag, and a Draigar warrior with shield and weapon.All things considered, Thoron isn't quite as nice as Stendhal is.  Nevertheless, he gets a thumbs up from me.  He's a good addition to any dragons collection and a fun action figure to play around with</review_text>
My 9 month old son LOVES this toy!  It's easily his favorite toy.  He'll gladly do tummy time hitting the piano keys and hitting the dial and characters.  He has a great time making it go, and will now sit up and scoot the car a little.  His other toys were good for a couple weeks at best, this one he only seems to be enjoying more the longer he plays with it.  The music is not nearly as loud or as annoying as most toys and is actually a little fun. Well worth the purchase price</review_text>
This is now on clearance at Target... $199.99.  They're going fast, I hid one in a display wooden chest in the furniture department til it drops even lower</review_text>
I also found this item at Target for $39.99. If you buy it at amazon or ebay, your wasting your money</review_text>
This Barbie is better than some of the other new ones but I did`nt see the street style one yet.But I don`t know if they are that good by the reviews i am hearing so far.I like her outfit,typical,shop-o-holic and typical school girls is quite nice and fits her personality.She has a locker with basic stuff you take to school with a secret inside.Her out fit is denim capri`s,black jacket,matching beret,and a tube top with a necklace</review_text>
Pixter is a fantastic learning tool for ages 3+. As a parent, I love that many of the learning activities are based around drawing and creating so the child is not only gaining knowledge but also creating art at the same time. My son who will be 2 in a few weeks has a Pixter, and though he is far below the age recommendation, he absolutely adores drawing with his Pixter. He is very gentle with it and it can keep him entertained for hours.Compared to the LeapFrog Leapster, Pixter has many more creativity-based activities and Leapster tends to be more of an arcade-style system. However, the Leapster cartridges are much easier to find and there is a bigger selection of titles. I plan to purchase the Leapster for my son for his 3rd birthday because the L-MAX can play games on the TV as well as on the handheld.Also, contrary to popular belief, the Pixter is NOT being discontinued as of this writing. I spoke with a representative at Fisher Price myself and she said that they are redesigning the system with new colors but not discontinuing it or any of the software. Beware when purchasing these games on eBay for ridiculous prices from people claiming they are discontinued. Wait for the stores to restock after the holidays and it will be a different story</review_text>
We have this up on the wall for our baby and use it as a diaper changing night light.  The luminosity is just right for changing baby but is not too blinding for sleepy eyes.   My 9-year daughter also loves to cycle through the phases before bedtime.The room has to be very bright for the night light to turn off automatically.  The remote is very handy and we liked the 3 viewing options.We'll be getting this as gifts for our friends and their babies.</review_text>
This is the first RC (radio control) aircraft I have ever flown, although I have raced RC cars for quite awhile. It comes fully assembled with a nice manual and even a quick intro DVD to get you in the air quickly.I started out in my living room and it has worked just great. With just a little trimming out the heli is very stable and easy for which to get a feel. I've run it for a few hours now with no incidents and I'm getting pretty good at hovering although I still have a tough time with head-in flight (controls thus reversed).The Blade CX RTF makes a great first heli or just a great indoor heli. Probably fine for anyone over 10 years old. I am getting 10-15 minutes of flight time on a battery charge. The only disappointment is that charging a battery takes 60-90 minutes (typical with all LiPo batteries). I'd recommend getting an extra battery or two and maybe even an extra powersupply and charger. Also I have tried the Training Gear add-on for the Blade CP/CP Pro -- it fits the CX just fine and allows you to use it later if you move on -- and it helps with damage but makes the Blade CX slightly less stable in hover in my opinion but not terribly so. They're probably worth the trade off at first.In a few more hours I think I'll be ready to move up to the Blade CP Pro. Highly recommended for anyone interested in entering RC helicopters or who just wants a heli to fly around the house.Two good sites for further info are [...]</review_text>
We have the original &quot;Super Mastermind&quot; which is the exact same layout.  It's fun and enjoyable year after year but too many games at one sitting can cause a headache.  It's fun to watch others work at it too.  The pieces are small so should be kept away from little kids but age 10 and up seem to enjoy it.  It's a great addition to our game shelf and we are getting more to give as gifts</review_text>
these make meals a lot more fun for children...i know my son loves them</review_text>
This is a great lego set.  My 1 1/2 year old son loves them.  He crashes the truck and Caravan all the time and they never break.  He really likes the Bob and cat that come with it.  These are also the right size to use with the Bob click brick sets.  This truck fits in to the parking thing with the talking click brick trucks</review_text>
oF COURSE, THIS IS EVERY CHILDS DREAM !!!!!! THESE PETS, THE TURTLES, ARE THE BEST! I GOT THEM AND PLAYED WITH THEM FOR ALONG TIME!!!!!! I WISH I HAD EVERY ON OF THEM!!!!! AND IF I COULD, I WOULD RATE THIS A BILLION STARS!!!!!!! I RECCOMEND THIS TO ANYONE WHO LOVES BUT CAN'T HAVE REAL PETS, CAUSE THEY WOULD REALLY LOVE THESE "LITTLEST PETS!!!</review_text>
We just got this for my daughter's 5th Birthday. This toy was what received the greatest excitement. While opening presents, my daughter exclaimed at the the top of her lungs, "I got a Brietta Pegasus!" The pegasus itself is durable, beautiful, and creatively sparks hours of imaginitave play. I didn't think it was a big deal trying to get it out of the box. Many toys are packaged that way these days... Perhaps an anti-theft plan. I just got some scissors and Brietta was out to play. So far we also haven't had any trouble with the wings. If they do fall out occasionally- they pop right back in. A small price to pay for such a well-loved toy that my 5 year old plays with for hours. As a mom who also loved unicorns and Pegasus ponies as a girl, I'm glad I can give that magic to my own girls</review_text>
THIS TOY IS GREAT FOR MANY REASONS!! Tengamo are collectible gaming magnets with funny characters. You get 6 in a pack and really cool stickers! Each character has point value and rarity. If you're lucky, you might get one of the very rare Tengamos and sell it for $$$$ on Ebay! You can also play hundreds of games with the Tengamo magnet special design and little steel ball that comes in the pack. Hurry to collect all of Series 1 before it is "retired" for Series 2.HIGHLY RECOMMENDED</review_text>
I went online to look for other Little Tikes toys with the handle and saw that this truck - which my 17-month old son loves - only had two stars and I wondered why. I disagree with most of the other reviews. The handle on top makes it easy for him to push around and carry - he can run it up slopes, on the ground, anywhere. He has never fallen or injured himself on it. In fact his frustration occurs because he can only pull the dump truck end up about 50% of the time. Usually he just hands it to me, and points that he wants it open. I do agree that the handle does make it difficult to put large items in the back and that the opening at the end of the dump truck makes it difficult for items to fall out. This is the only reason I'm not giving this toy five stars. But my son loves this truck and has pretty much been playing with it constantly since we got it about a month ago. I'm planning to get him the train with the handle because he likes this toy so much.</review_text>
We stretched it across our pool but we have a stoper in the line so you fall in the pool. we just used some special clamps and a high compression spring. The kids love it because they can fly right into the pool</review_text>
It's cute, well packaged and easy (but time consuming) to put together.  For the price it can't be beat.  Too bad there's no photo.  She'll use it for a while and we'll sell it online when we are done and probably get most of our money back</review_text>
This is the perfect size swimming pool for my 21 month old. She loves this pool. I love the fact that only the top ring has to be blown up then once you start filling it with water - it stands up. Less risk of tears or holes! The only thing I would recommend would be some sort of cover for it since it does not come with one</review_text>
My daughter got this pool for her first birthday and she loves it.  This pool is big enough that I can just get in with her and we have a blast.  Because of her age I don't fill it up all the way and it still works just fine. (it just looks a little funny) I found it really easy to set up and easy enough to pack away.  I was a little confused at first when folding it up but within moments I had it put away and every time I use it I find it easier and easier. This pool is great for traveling to Grandma's house too!  I would recommend this to anyone young and old</review_text>
I was pleasantly surprised at the quality and size of the pool.  The price is quite reasonable, and I was not expecting such a great deal</review_text>
I liked the pool for this very hot summer that we have had; I would recommend a cover for it</review_text>
These Weebles are bigger then the ones that come with the box sets</review_text>
T.J. is a great learning tool for children.  All the stories have been wonderful lessons for children as well as helping them to read</review_text>
When my 3-month old nephew received this for Christmas, my 15-month old and 3-year old immediately started fighting over it.  They played with it so much that we decided to buy our own, even though I thought they might be too old for it.  Two months later, it is still the hottest toy in our house.  The shapes are vibrant colors, rattle, and have rounded edges, making them easier than most shape sorters for younger children.  The top and bottom pieces screw off to remove the shapes, and my 3-year old can take them on and off herself.  My kids also like to lay the top and bottom pieces on the floor and set the shapes on them like it is a puzzle.   They also like to play "catch" by rolling the sorter back and forth to each other.  I would say this is one of the best toys you can buy for a 6-18 month old</review_text>
I wanted my daughter to be able to listen to music without headphones.  This product, the FP3 Speakers, was perfect.  She loves to walk around from room to room singing her favorite songs and carrying this around.  It is easy to turn on and very kid friendly.  The only downfall is that the price dropped right after I purchased it!</review_text>
My son received this when he was 15 months old and has never stopped playing with it regularly.  He loves putting things in the back and zooming around the living room.  Great buy</review_text>
Very pretty game and fun; but for OLDER children.  This game has way too many cards to be played properly for my [..].  This is going to stay on the shelf until she can play with all the cards</review_text>
What a great game! My 4 year old loves the disney princess. It is such a great educational toy. We love it</review_text>
This game is make-involve, make-think and fun. Side effects leave you much smarter. Its fun game for parties driving everyone to involvement and fun.Art of asking questions and elimination gets better and better just by playing this game !!!!!. Strongly recommended for parents who want their kids to spend time on creative and learning game, yet fun. They can be be part of game and share there thoughts. Though it recommends age 10+ might as well be good for 7+ to 100+ ..."I wish I had this game little earlier, never stop telling how much its fun and good for personality development!!</review_text>
This is a game that will help you practice, while you are having fun, to ask the right questions, to zero in on the answer and at the same time keeping tab of the progress. I believe it is the right questions that you ask that help you succeed in a game or in life.This is a game with a educational value that will enhance your creative thinking with a dose of fun.If you liked Pictionary you will love Questionary.</review_text>
much smaller than i imagined it would be, but then again i am not very good with measurements.it is a very cute doll and my niece loved it</review_text>
I bought her and veronica too! I love to them!!I play Archie and date them..they are my fun girls!! My wife likes them too</review_text>
SHE'S A BEAUTIFUL DOLL. I LOVE THE BLONDE PONYTAIL AND THE MAKE-UP IS FINE. I EVEN LIKE THE JEANS. BUT WHY THE UGLY WHITE UNTUCKED SHIRT AND THE SUPER-SHORT PINK SWEATER??? IT JUST LOOKS TAKCY TO ME. IF I BUY HER SHE WILL BE WEARING A NEW SHIRT RIGHT AWAY. OTHER THAN THAT SHE'S A LOVELY DOLL. AND I, LIKE THE PREVIOUS REVIEWER, ALSO REMEMBER AND LOVE THE ARCHIE COMICS FROM MY CHILDHOOD. A 5 STAR DOLL EXCEPT FOR THE SHIRT</review_text>
I have loved reading Archie comics since I was in high school. I was thrilled to find the Archie dolls for sale. Thanks</review_text>
This is absolutely adorable.  Not only is it a great jack in the box for a boy or a girl but you can also play peek a boo with the monkey.  My daughter is 20 months old and she loves it!!!</review_text>
We purchased this set for my son Christmas 2003.  He loves it.  The age range on the listing is off, though.  It should be the same for any of the Little People toys - 12 or 18 months and up.  There are no small parts.  Highly recommended and fun during the holidays or any time</review_text>
This was the webkinz my daughter wanted, and she's been very happy with it.  There was a delivery problem, but the seller from whom I bought it was a pleasure to deal wit</review_text>
We  bought two sets of the Alphabet Foam Play Mats - so glad we did!  We have a concrete basement floor, and now the kids have a nice, colorful, and soft place to play.  Plus, the foam floor isn't as cold as the concrete - wer're in Colorado.  The colors are great - so inviting.  The pieces fit together perfectly, and the border gives it a finished look.  Great purchase!  We'll probably buy more so that we can increase the size of the play area!</review_text>
He loves the Dog. I has very happy to find him. Since Toy Story was out 10 years ago I did not thing i would ever find  Slink my Grandsons favorite</review_text>
Along this is not the most exhilirating toy.  However, my son has collected many of the Toy Story Toys and enjoys playing with all of them together.  For any child who does this you need to have Slinky Do</review_text>
I added this toy to my son's xmas list. With much luck he did get it; and we are pleased ! I would not say that it's a "fun to play with" toy but the entertainment value still exists. The planets are large enough without being overbearing up on the ceiling. They glow at night..which is the best part !! At 36 years old I can't wait for  nighttime to hang in my sons room to check out the  planets!  The stars the set comes with are perfect. They are NOT the bulky plastic ones that can be seen day or night. They are paper stickers that disappear during the day (on the celing they do anyway) The planets come with name stickers which adds educational value. My son is five and LOVES, LOVES, LOVES these planets. I say get 'em !!Lisa Avilio-Meyer</review_text>
My nephew who is 3 years old got My First LeapPad not to long ago and he loves it. He loves train so he got one that is Thomas the train and he playes it the morning when he get up and at night before he goes to sleep. There are many different types, and they are everywhere you just have to know where to look. For instance [...] Over all I think this is an amazing learning toy for toddler and young kids who look forward to reading and writting.</review_text>
I really like My first leap pad and so does my 3 year old son.I bought it for him for Christmas last year (he was 2 1/2 then)and though some the activities we're alittle hard for him to start with, there were still plenty of things he could do with it.Every picture you touch the pen on says a frase/says the name of the object or make a sound,so even without playing the games he still had great fun with it.A year on,he can now play all the games on it and has recently noticed letters make words,so now he touches the words and the leap pad reads it for him,so he is still learning from this toy after a year!I will be buying more my first leap pad books for him this Christmas,this toy is worth every penny</review_text>
Got this as a gift and it was one of the first things she "played" with, well more like laid and stared at.  Now she's 4 1/2 months old and she still loves it.  She loves to grab at the fish, shake the rattle and twirl the lobster.  For awhile, it was a whole new toy every week because she would notice something new on it.  Great for putting her down and keeping her entertained while mom grabs a bite to eat.  Also good to take places because of the hard plastic bottom.  Music isn't too annoying either</review_text>
great poseability and a fun transformation.  the super robot mode helmet is a little goofy looking when it's on but other than that he's fantasti</review_text>
thease dolls are ok i agree with the other reviewer that the third edtion is wayyyyyyyy better roxxi is kinda ugly lol  phope is nic</review_text>
My 22-month-old has loved this toy for almost a year.  The shapes are attractively colored and very pleasing to hold, and the attached hammer never gets lost!  All in all, a very nice version of a timeless toy</review_text>
My 5 and 7 year-old granddaughters love Baby Alive. This doll held their attention even to the exclusion of the other stuff they "really wanted" for Christmas. And the doll is adorable! Even the adults were fascinated. Fun and educational</review_text>
I've enjoyed playing this game with people from around the world- it seems to work best with a group of people who haven't been hanging out together since childhood. It gets people talking and makes for an evening of all sorts of interesting stories- and you get to find out what interesting people your friends are</review_text>
This is perfect for any Kurt Cobain/Nirvana fan. It looks great, definitely reminiscent of the Smells Like Teen Spirit music video. I bought it as a gift but almost kept it for myself! If you are thinking of getting it, I would recommend you do so. You won't be disappointed</review_text>
This is a very pretty doll. I waited until this year to buy her and got her for only fifteen dollars. In my opinion that is the only way to buy these fancy dolls--ON SALE! Otherwise they are just too darn expensive. I give this particular doll 4 stars. She has a pretty face and I like her hair. I think the dress is a bit overdone but that is just me. I have very simple tatstes</review_text>
I bought the African-American 2005 Holiday Barbie for my little girl.  I agree with her statement that "She's too pretty to play with!!".  Mattel did an amazing job this year.  The face on this doll is EXQUISITE. "Miss 2005" is absolutely proportionate in classic Barbie terms. The gown's colors definitely put you in a festive spirit.  In fact, the ball gown, as a whole, is supernaturally beautiful.  Picking Bob Mackie as this year's designer was nothing short of GENIUS.  When I saw that Mackie was the HOLIDAY designer, I knew that Mattel had finally gotten it right!</review_text>
this is a great toy, i play with it all the time and it still works</review_text>
Really nice toy.  But I don't understand why there are only 3 knobs on the grill but there are 4 burners...I think this might confuse some of our future fast food employees....</review_text>
I remember playing this game as a kid.Im sure glad someone still makes it.Good family fu</review_text>
I don't have the tin version but an earlier version.  The cards look different but the game is played the same.  I have been playing this with my now current 10 year old for 2 years and we both love it.  A little luck, some strategy, and a whole lot of fun.  Don't let the age levels fool  you-adults will enjoy this as well.  A classic that will never go out of style</review_text>
My 4 1/2 year old recieved this red engine last Christmas, and for the first couple of months was used practically every day. (And yes, I agree with the rest of the reviewers- buy rechargable batteries since this engine eats them, and prepare to be disappointed since it cannot pull many cars up the hills without getting stuck.) I will tell you that I cannot BELIEVE my son has not touched this engine since. His complaint is that all it does is go around and around. Instead, he enjoys playing out stories from Thomas, or making up his own train sagas. My husband likes to watch the engine more than my son. I don't know how other children play with their trains, but the battery operated engines just cannot hold his attention for very long. Nevertheless, for the first few months, watching it is really mesmerizing, I could watch it for hours. Perhaps instead of buying this one engine, purchase a setup with more cars and track for the same money. It will probably get more use in the end</review_text>
Why people purchase a toy for tikes when it is specifically targeted at older kids is beyond me. Always look at the box for the minimum age a toy is best for. That said, all LTTO taggers, including this one, have a simple "grab and go" game called LTAG. All you have to do is pull the trigger twice and you're on your way. This is early in the manual, way before all the complicated games that frustrate 6 year olds and their parents.I love LTTO. I even run a club that uses it here in Auburn, WA. But I *always* start new players out with LTAG, then move up to hosted games, and then to the more complicated games. Never try to start out by hosting a team Hide and Seek game, 'cus it's just too much for a young or completely new player. But that's why the LTAG game exists! Just grab it and play! No messing with the control panel.Don't take a low rating based on an inapproprate purchase as worth much. Similarly, take my rating with a grain of salt since I'm a huge fan. But for kids 8 and up to adults, LTTO taggers are a wonderful, durable, and long lived toy that gets you moving AND thinking</review_text>
This was a christmas gift, however I can rate it on the base that I own one just like it.  This is good for a lifetime of fun</review_text>
This is a challenging game, even for adults.  It's great for getting both sides of your brain going.  Questions range from easy to difficult and topics cover pop culture, history, and science. Great game to play with  teams</review_text>
We had a blast making up our on questions and  playing this game. The guys played it and the guys never want to play games</review_text>
It would be easier to keep score on a book that is not glossy or bound; ink smears, pencil does not show up, and writing in the crease is difficult.  They should include a score book similar to the typical baseball scoring books; spiral bound, paper.  Other than that, the product is exactly what we were looking for.</review_text>
My 4.5 year old loves this! Awesome way for young kids to learn God's word! I wish there were more. My daughter hasn't put it down since we bought it</review_text>
I purchased this card game as a spur of the moment christmas gift for my son who loves monopoly but can get no one to play the board game because of how long the board game version takes. My son as well as the rest of the family was wonderfully surprised to find this monopoly card game addictive and fun to play.  Each of the hands goes quickly and the goal of $10000 is very attainable to reach in a fairly short period of time. I will have to admit 3 people was a bit more challenging and fun than just 2 and we decided it would be easier to keep score of the money by using pencil, paper, and a calculator. Overall, I highly recommend this version</review_text>
This pack makes this game more fun and allows more people.  The rules change a little when using it, but they are easy to understand and lots of fun.  I highly recommend getting this pack if you have ever wanted to play with more people</review_text>
My 2.5 year old Border Collie just loves the tunnel and we train with it a few times per week.  Since the agility tunnels for dogs are a bit pricey, I decided to try this more affordable kid's tunnel instead. It's not as heavy and robust as the official agility tunnels, but it has been serving me great for just about a year - there's just some minor wearing around the rings and small toe nail runs in it - but it's still very usable.My ratings would change a bit for kids though - probably a 3 for educational and 5 for durability</review_text>
I've read the other reviews...as I was skimming the website to order another of these wands.  Guess you folks had a bad batch of wands, because my son is crazy about his.  We gave it to him shortly after his 2nd birthday, and it's one of his favorite toys!  Yes, it is messy...it's a giant bubble wand...when was the last time you played bubbles that there wasn't a mess?  But if you keep it out doors, I don't see the problem.  My son was able to make bubbles right away (something he wasn't able to do with smaller wands since he can't seem to blow (he sucks air in instead of out).  His father and I played for over an hour with this wand...taking turns making the bubbles and letting him pop them (and vice versa).  I don't know why the other folks had some difficulty...but I would highly recommend this toy for a 2-3 year old.</review_text>
We wanted to purchase more traditional toys for our daughter for christmas 06.  We bought a lot of M&D toys and this by far was the better of their toys.  Even though our daughter is still a little young to put pieces together properly it will be even better when she figures this out.  Like other said the sound is very appropriate.  I like this toy and definitely recommend this to others. The only reason I gave it a 4 is colors on blocks could be a bit brighter or more colorful</review_text>
My mother-in-law purchased the sandbox for my son, who was not quite two at the time.  He has played with it everday for the last four months straight.  I can't even hide it from him.  He loves filling the sandbox with other trucks that he has.  This toy keeps him occupied for hours.  He has so much fun with it that we are using others for his second birthday</review_text>
This is a great (and relatively cheap) way to expand your Brio starter set.  A nice selection of straights, curves, and a few switch tracks that really add to the interaction / fun.While Brio in general is expensive, this track pack represents a pretty good value (v. buying switches, curves, straights, etc on their own.... although you'll "need" to do that eventually too!).The finish, fit, and quality is great.  Worth the money considering the play it'll get & it's durability</review_text>
Great idea to hang clothes. The hangers are not long enough to keep the clothes on.  If your child is like mine who loves to dress and re-dress dolls, the armoire is not big enough if you purchase more then 3 outfits. The price is great now. I paid $20.  Great item just wish it was a little bigger maybe even a drawer.</review_text>
My 3 yo twin boys love this, but one station is a little difficult to maneuver, it is very sensitive, even for my 6 yo boy. All in all, I would recommend this for all those little train lovers!</review_text>
My son loves this game.  When moving around the tracks, in the one game it can be difficult, the key is if you moving up or down, depending on which direction you need to go, push the joystick the direction once and let go, after that push the joystick the direction the train needs to go. I hope this helps.  My son will be 3 in less then a month and it took him a week to figure out how to move around the tracks.  Mom, dad and sis had to play before that.  The other games are a little easier, but I found the games educational and my son loves it</review_text>
My child loves this little crib.  I think the canopy was the winning feature and the rollers.  She can easily move it without having to carry it to the next room.   All her dolls fit the crib.  We really think it works.  It isn't as sturdy as a wooden crib, but it hasn't come apart on us</review_text>
I am the Star Wars FanaticI really like this toy! It has firing misiles and stickers to put on the vehicle. And, you can open the wings! This is a great toy!</review_text>
if you dont have a obiwan pilot just buy a rebel pilot an put it in the ship I did it a I licke it and if you have obiwan imagine it change cloth.I thinck this starfighter is best only for the colors because for me al jedi starfighter are the same and the firing misiles I tacke them out because then they get lost</review_text>
This is an awsome ship! Well at least Anakins is. My cousin has a green Anakin jedi starfighter and I want to get the new Obi-wan Kenobi one that is coming in September. The only thing that is not good about it is that there is a little opening in the cockpit that Anakin's hand (the Green ship comes with an Anakin that has a normal hand and one holding a lightsaber) fell through</review_text>
I think that this was a great gift and definitely worth the money. I gave this to my 3 1/2 yr old niece as a Christmas gift. She loves the Wizard of Oz. She is a big fan of dress up clothes and I also have two more nieces that roughly the same age so there was an outfit for each of them.</review_text>
I bought a set of these Uno cards for my 9-year-old grandson, a Nintendo "freak." The first night he had them he played three games with whoever was handy, and spent an hour alone arranging the cards just so. He took them to bed with him. A few days later he dashed into his other grandparent's house showing off his fancy deck of Uno cards and insisted that they play a game. He even wrote us a Thank You note telling us that the cards were the "coolest present I ever got."The rules of the game have not changed, just the look of the cards. Nintendo characters, in all their bright colors, are the "suits." The cards are housed in a metal box, a throwback to the front half of the 20th Century. Excellent art work on the cards and on the box.The cards and the game are appealing to all ages. I enjoyed playing and getting acquainted with the Nintendo characters (my grandson explained them all to me). This is a great family game and this Nintendo set is a great gift. It helps close the "generation gap." I highly recommend this item. Enjoy.One last thing: I bought a second deck for another grandson and his response was pretty much the same.</review_text>
Now you can add Risk to your libary in this handsome bookshelf edition.  The game remains a perennial favorite, and in this day and age of global conquest you can play out your vicarious need to be king of the world without harming anyone, atleast not physically.  But, be prepared for a few bruised egos, especially when combatants start teaming up on weaker victims.  While the places and names don't exactly match today's geographical boundaries, kids can still get some sense of the world in which we live, even if the object of the game remains to wipe each other out</review_text>
Love this game. With family and/or friends it's one of the best card games around. It is easy and doesn't require a lot of attention (you can watch movies, talk, hang out, etc.) yet keeps your interest. It's also a game people of many ages can play because it's not too difficult. A good card game for having friends over to play over dinner or while watching a ballgame.</review_text>
I found that for the price. this set was great!  It comes with one Rascus figure, and one shadow knight.  The catapult is very orginal, and powered by a rubber band, I got it to go 3 and a half feet.  There were also some improvements in the pieces.  For example, the flagpole was less annoying, the weapons were improved, and the head pieces came on and off much smoother.Whether you are starting Lego Castle or are an expert builder, this is great set</review_text>
We just got this lego system for our 3 year old son and he loves it!  He doesn't want to put it away or out of his sight at any time.  The Scoop and Lofty characters are easy for him to assemble and we are working on the little buildings, but he may not be quite old enough yet to assemble them.  Overall, this is a great toy for anyone who loves Bob the Builder.  We can't wait to purchase the other sets to add to the fun!!  Lego always makes great and challenging toys!</review_text>
Whenever we take this bike to the park, boys and men of every description crown around it in awe.  My son, who is seven and so far not athletic at all, loves the recognition, not to mention the nifty spin outs he can perform for everyone watching.  We just wish it came in an adult size</review_text>
It was what I expected and it came in time for my grandsons birthday</review_text>
You need to be old enough to look at a set of several horse cards and decide which kind of horse show a particular hose would do best in and which horse you would get the most points for if you had that particular horse compete in a dressage show, jumper show, ect. points are added up and who evers horse earned the most points wins that horse show and that player gets to keep the cards. So I would say ages 8 to 12, but younger children could play with help from someone who can read and add up numbers.There is a limited amount of rounds in a game, since there is a limited number of cards to play for each horse show so the game last around 15 minutes or so. I like this part a lot, since games like war "Chomp" can go on forever.It does take a table top to play the game, I originally purchased the game for my daughter thinking she could play it on the bus with a friend, but you need to have a surface to lay out some cards. I quess you could try to squeeze them onto a larger text book laid onto your lap. But it wouldn't be easy.</review_text>
My toddler and all of her friends love this play house.  It is great, no assembly required</review_text>
I bought this as a Halloween gift for my then 3 year old son in 2004.  He loved its spooky sounds and the neat turns and tricks in the house.  He doesn't really use it much anymore, but now my 18 month old loves it!  He can actually follow the whole progression, turning and pulling levers and platforms at the right time.  This toy has been great for our family.  It is pretty durable, some pieces are not quite as smooth as they once were and the pop out skeleton at the bottom is not working anymore, but considering what it has gone through, it has performed amazingly well</review_text>
Well, I just think that the little beauty on the cover easily sells this product.  Can you even imagine her tooting?  She's too cute!  The slick gentleman blowing on the whistle like it's a saxophone and he plays in a be-bop quartet of fart blowers makes me wonder if he is blowing out both ends.  This thing is going to sound like a true to life fart...but without all the hassle of the smell.  One warning...do not use this whistle on your key chain as an emergency device.  Please use a real loud whistle.  You wouldn't want to be alone in an empty parking garage with some ghoulish thug chasing you and then you just start blowing your fart whistle to get someone to come to your aid.  If I heard farts in an empty parking garage I would most likely run the other way.  This whistle is for good times only.</review_text>
Toby is one of the regulars on the Thomas & His Friends TV series, and this little wooden tram engine is well-made and durable for those who have the wooden railway sets.My only complaint - and this is very minor - is that Toby is a bit taller than other wooden Thomas engines, meaning that he cannot fit under bridges very well</review_text>
My 7 year old son got this set for Christmas last year, and with all the toys we have for our 5 kids, this K'nex set gets the most use.  He built with it every day for months, and still builds something new about every week with it.  He has built about every model in the book and he is getting better at building his own ideas.  We've gotten a lot of the models on video tape, and he loves to show his grandparents the new ones.  I loved the sea turtle that "walked" across the floor, and he builds amusement park rides and puts little people in them.  This thing keeps him busy for hours at a time, and he's getting another tub of them for his birthday.  His little brother wants one for his birthday this year.  The motor is very cool, and he figures out how to use it with the models that don't call for it.  Since Christmas, he has only broken 2 pieces, so I thought that was pretty good.  Highly recommended</review_text>
If you know the movies inside and out, this game is fun for the dedicated fan.  I play with my son that knows so much more Star Wars trivia than I do but find the game enjoyable.  The only minor annoyance is when you land on a pie question too many times, the DVD portion of the game runs out of questions and tells you to use a question from the card deck.  Not sure why they could not load up more questions on the DVD but maybe the game is not intended for a poor old Mom that answers so many questions wrong</review_text>
Star Wars Trivial Pursuit Saga Edition (2005.)INTRODUCTION:Despite having been around since the middle of the seventies, the Star Wars series has never declined in its popularity. George Lucas created a science fiction phenomenon that has stood the test of time, and then some. And needless to say, many games have been based on the series - video games, role-playing games, and no shortage of board games have been adapted for the Star Wars universe. In 1998, Star Wars Trivial Pursuit was released. Being a die-hard fan of the series, it was by far my favorite (non video game) Star Wars game ever. Unfortunately, it outdated fast, due to the fact that it didn't cover the prequel trilogy it was immediately followed by. But in 2005, seven years and three Star Wars episodes later, a new version of the game has hit store shelves! Read on for my review of the new version of Star Wars Trivial Pursuit.OVERVIEW:Quite honestly, who doesn't know what Trivial Pursuit is? Well, for those of you who have been living under a rock all your life, here's the concept behind the game. Players alternate rolling a die and moving their game token across a wheel-shaped board. There are six different-colored spaces. Each color represents a different category. The player is then asked a question of that category. If he or she gets it right, he or she goes again. If he or she misses it, it's the next player's turn. At six spots on the board are wedge spaces. The objective of the game is to gain a wedge in all six colors and return to the central hub of the wheel, and answer a game-winning question. Some changes for this edition of the game are, rather obviously, the questions and overall game design being Star Wars based, and two DVDs, which contain the wedge and game-winning questions. A new concept to the game includes a player being able to "steal" if another player is unable to answer the wedge question, in the last few seconds of time. Essentially, the game play stays play to the classic stylings of Trivial Pursuit, but gives it a Star Wars overhaul. In other words, this game is exactly what it says it is.REVIEW:The original Star Wars Trivial Pursuit was, without question, my favorite Star Wars game of all time that wasn't a video game. This new version is a MASSIVE improvement over the old version. For starters, the new version covers the ENTIRE Star Wars film saga. The classic Galactic Civil War trilogy (Episodes IV, V and VI) AND the prequel Clone Wars trilogy (Episodes I, II, and III) all get equal emphasis. If you hated the original version for not covering the prequel trilogy, that problem has, obviously, been corrected, and in a major way. The DVDs also add a nice new twist to the game. It's good to finally have a method of setting the wedge questions apart from regular questions. And, of course, you can do anywhere from two to four players or teams. I do have a few minor complaints, though. First of all is the selection of the tokens of characters you can play as. The original version had Luke Skywalker, Princess Leia, Han Solo, and Darth Vader. In other words, a nice assortment of main characters. The new version has Luke Skywalker, Darth Vader, Obi-Wan Kenobi, and Yoda. In other words, ONLY JEDI CHARACTERS. This is strictly a cosmetic flaw, but still, I think they could have picked a better assortment of characters than those four. Another complaint is the inclusion of a die. For those of you who never played the original version of the game, it included an electronic R2D2 figurine which would tell you how many spaces to move when you tapped its head, via an LCD screen. I liked that better than rolling a die because it helped to give the game a unique Star Wars feel that playing with a die just doesn't have. Another problem is the price of the game - I've seen it everywhere from $45 to $60! Even at the lowest MSRP, it's still a rip off. One of the biggest problems is one of the most obvious - if you're not a die-hard Star Wars fan, you will not get very far in this game. My last and biggest complaint is with the questions themselves - like the original game, they are HORRIBLY imbalanced. Some questions are so simple, a casual fan could answer them easily. Some are so difficult, even die-hards will have trouble with them. This brings me to my complaint about the DVD questions. Not only are these questions really no more difficult than the card questions, but as time ticks down, the questions become EASIER! This makes it ridiculously easy for another player to "steal" the wedge if the question receiver is unable to answer. If I were designing the game, I'd straighten up these flaws. But I'm not, and overall, I am very satisfied with it.EDITION NOTES:This game is a fairly recent release, and it remains readily available at most major stores that sell board-style games and movie merchandise. If you want the game, it shouldn't be too hard - just be ready to pay a fairly high price for it.OVERALL:Despite some minor issues, this new version of Star Wars Trivial Pursuit is a leaps-and-bounds improvement over the original game. If you're a huge fan of the series who thinks your knowledge of the series is supreme, don't hesitate to buy this game. There have been many Star Wars trivia games/books/etc. over the years, but Star Wars Trivial Pursuit is the ultimate Star Wars trivia experience. No fan should pass this game up</review_text>
I like the language tutor and the music stuff! I also like the screen savers! It's given me great ideas! I play with  it in a different way than you are supposed to. Like if I need a story starter I go to the "Magic Act" and read the sentences for an idea</review_text>
Our family loves this game and has played it for years.  The tiles on this version are smaller than the original and some might find them difficult to handle.  If you like Scrabble, you will love this game!</review_text>
Even better than Scrabble, you build words on the board AND build words "up" by adding letters over existing words.  So "tree" becomes "free" and "braces" becomes "blades".  The scoring might be a little too easy, but if you're hard core, you can use the point values from Scrabble to raise the score difficulty.  The board is small so you have to start thinking up instead of out fairly soon into the game, and the game doesn't drag on for too long.  It is addictive and you will not look at words the same way again.</review_text>
My daughter (age 13) really enjoyed this game. It provides more options than scrabble, which sometimes frustrates her because her Mom and Dad are better at that.</review_text>
It's soo cute and cuddly! Not only is extra soft, it's small enough to fit in your palm or make a great addition to a desk. It looks realistic too, it had the little cat fur covering its eyes making it even more adorable, the only downside if you trying cuddling with it to go to sleep make sure you take out the "TY" tag otherwise you would end up with heart shape marks on your face=</review_text>
This game is awesome!  It is addictive though so be prepared.  A little complicated once you get started, but becomes easier.  Best if someone already knows the game to teach it.  Really fun though</review_text>
I definitely can tell when a great game show can be fun as a board game. Unfortunately, that absolutely isn't always the case. One of my all time favorite quiz shows back in the 80's was Super Password with Bert Convy. The game of course showcases a celebrity and a regular contestant trying to guess their way to guess a mystery word for a puzzle. This edition doesn't reflect on that edition. This board game edition is a example of the original Password with the late Allen Ludden. The game is still fun and enjoyable for those who actually haven't seen the original Password like myself, but it is just delightful. Unfortunately, it isn't much fun reflecting on this version and relating to the Bert Convy edition. Hopefully, when Password is remade, it will be just like the themed 80's edition of the NBC game show.Price: B-Game: C 1/2+Fun & Enjoyment: B-Overall: C</review_text>
This is a great game! Using clues to get others to say the secret word. Another great classic game brought back by Endless! A++</review_text>
I purchased this for my daughter a bit before Christmas and she loves it.  It is a great item for the price and does what the bigger brand names does.  Thank you</review_text>
This is a very good Webkinz as the plush and as the virtual pet. It comes with a rare TV and other supplies. it is also very soft. The only bad thing is the price. Don't buy Webkinz online, the price can go up to $50. The real Price is $11.99, which you can find them for that price in stores</review_text>
sure this doesn't make the popular clanking sound going down the stairs as the metal originals, but it still works well, and has been copied by many companies.  I even have one with a business name on it.  These fun, functional, and keep a kids imagination engaged.  No noise or batteries needed.  Buy someone you know this for a stocking stuffer this year</review_text>
My 9 month-old granddaughter likes her Christmas present of Octotune;  as a matter of fact, we played with this toy yesterday when I stayed with her.  It is colorful, she can grab the legs and the music is pleasing, so it stimulates more than one sense.</review_text>
I bought this for my year old grandaughter and am more than pleased. It is very heavy so as the child stands up to play it does not move at all. The corners are rounded so there are no sharp points for the child to hurt themselves on. It will hold their attention for quite a while as there are five activities for them to play with. The price was very reasonable compaed to other similar products.</review_text>
I bought this set for my grandsons 2nd birthday.  My son found it very easy to assemble and my daughter in law loves it because it is a lovely piece of furniture.  My grandson loves to sit at the table and look at books or build with blocks.  This is a sturdy set that will last for many years</review_text>
I love Melissa and Doug toys, they're always well-made and always thoughtful. They encourage learning and their pieces, made of natural material, not only hold up well but are environmentally friendly.This game is a particularly nice example. It's a classic wooden puzzle with a twist. Each vehicle puzzle piece has a magnet on it and the players yank them out with a magnetic "tow truck".  Melissa and Doug have made two other puzzles similar to this, a fish puzzle and a butterfly puzzle, with the same concept.  This one, however, might appeal more to kids whose current fascinations lie more along the lines of cars and trucks.One of our pieces (on the fishing version of this puzzle) did stick, but a quick rub around the edges with some sandpaper loosened it right up. The downside of using real materials is that wood does have a tendency to warp in humidity or dryness. That's a downside I'm willing to live with! Excellent toy!</review_text>
I can't believe how well made this set is. I have been looking for good quality kitchen toys for my daughter for Christmas. I wanted something sturdy and not plastic. I just received my order today and these items are great! My son opened the box and tested them for his little sister and he can't wait to play with them with her.I ordered this set and the baking set and both are made out of solid wood and are extremely durable. I am very impressed and wish amazon carried the matching coffee pot and blender!I also had a problem with the velcro on the butter.  It was an easy fix with some super glue.  I think the heat during the shipping made the velcro come off</review_text>
This was a gift to my Grand Sons (10 & 7).  They were well pleased with it.  The 10 year old has joined a Chess Club after school.</review_text>
This product was delivered fast.......It was so easy to install.......and the light is a pretty blue just like the picture.When the light is on it does not show up as well</review_text>
If you are a hardcore Family Guy fan like me (I am actually one of the few people that watched Family Guy when it was originally on the air), you will not be disappointed with this Monopoly version. The box is beautifully designed with the Griffin family pictured on center, and some easter eggs to look around for. The board is not the most impressive one especially compared to The Simpson's and Muppets Monopoly versions but it is pretty nice with the Griffins at center. What you will love of the board is the properties, which include everything from Chris' Closet and Seamus' Lighthouse to James Woods High and Geronimo's Palace to The Clam and Channel 5 News to Mayor West's Mansion and finally Petoria, all from both old and new seasons plus some scenes from the Stewie's Untold Story movie. The property deeds are somewhat disappointing though. The do not have color watermarks like those found in the Simpson's version, but I guess they will do.Peter's Fishing Boat, Hinden-Peter, Peter-Copter and the Pope Mobile replace the Railroads. I bet you will not be laughing too much when you have to pay $200.00 (Income Tax) for Volcano Insurance or $75.00 for Workplace Sensitivity Training (Luxury Tax) but hey, you can't stay mad for long at the Salesman Guy, right? It would have been cool to have Joe Swanson on the Go To Jail space and have a picture of Quahog Prison on the jail space but well, what can you do?The Pewter Tokens are nice. You can chose from TV Junkie Peter, Mug in hand Brian, Nose picking Chris, Lois, Stewie in a high chair and Meg (who looks like a Peanut character). You can also order four more tokens that include The Giant Chicken, Quagmire, Joe and the Evil Monkey.The coolest changes are the Chance and Community Chest cards that are replaced by the What the Deuce! and Giggity! Giggity! Giggity! cards, respectively. They are beautifully done in full color and you will find things like; Made Sheriff of Bumblescum ADVANCE TO GO, Get Liposuction and Implants Pay $100, Confederate Civil War Veterans are After You Go Back 3 Spaces, Take Big Fat Paulie to The Movies as a Favor Collect $25.00, Help Death get a Girlfriend Collect $100, and many more.The money goes as follows $1 - Meg, $5 - Chris $10 - Lois, $20 - Brian, $50 - Stewie, $100 - Peter, $500 - The GriffinsThere are no special rules for this version, which is weird since it has been the norm for some time in these special Monopoly versions.To wrap it up I must say that even though they could have done a better job this is a beautiful and wonderfully done Monopoly game. Family Guy fans will love it making this a great gift. HAVE FUN</review_text>
Hi, Esweetie I would love to be your friend.Oh yeah this is a great doll you should really get her.End the bratz/ my scene warLENZIE:</review_text>
The build a figure (BAF) program of Marvel legends keeps on rocking.  This time build a giant 14" Apocalypse.  This BAF is big and cool, super articulated, with sculpt and paint fine enough to be a sculpture.  For Apocalypse 5 stars.For Iron Fist...  Well he's super articulated and does come with the mighty booty (that's the buttocks) of Apocalypse, but really is the weakest figure in this series.  A lot of that is just charater design though.  Green tights with an open v-neck green shirt, and what is that tattoo supposed to be anyway, ballet slippers and a dew-rag?  Pretty horrible looking.  If you can, try to find the red suit variant, at least that's a little cool.  Also, the accesories (besides the booty) are two rubbery flames to fit into his hands to give a fire fist effect.  Good luck with that.  They are kind of flimsy and hard to place in the hands.  Once you get them in you better not touch the figure again or they will fall off.  Overall, not the quatlity of figure or accesories I'd expect.But the rest of the figures in the series will make up for this one, plus you do still get that booty</review_text>
we received this for my daughter's 4th birthday.  it has been a lot of fun to play--simple enough for her to play, and hard enough to grow with her for the past year.  although it has a lot of pieces, they have remained durable and have withstood tiny fingers.</review_text>
My daughter received this for her 5th birthday and she absolutely loves it.  It combines the classic board and memory games together.  The pieces are made of very thick cardboard and are very durable.  The only small complaint is the spinner which tends to get stuck easily.  We have played this game multiple times each day since received and she is still excited everytime we open the box.  An excellent game!!</review_text>
Well, I got this ahwile ago I got this toy and I was very excited. I made the blanket but it was a hassel. The glue didn't work, and the instuctions are a bit ocnfusing, but It is fun when your done!!</review_text>
My 8 year old son LOVES this toy. He has spent many hours acting out the cartoon and loves that fact that the cape pops out at the push of a button and winds back in by moving a leg back and forth. He likes the food dish that shoots the disc. and also thinks the cryptonite is cool!!! It says it changes colors when warm, but we havent seen that. Maybe nn to run it under hot/cold water?! Overall a fantastic buy</review_text>
Insta Sundae in a Can: Simply take the can and squirt some of the stuff into a bowl, cover it in whipped creamand chocolate sauce, put a cherry on top and, voila, you've instantly created a sundae</review_text>
it is fun to play with and kind of educational because you have to strap the babies in their car seats</review_text>
My daughter absolutely loves Rarity. It is the perfect size and goes everywhere with us.  The bright colorful hair is fun to play with</review_text>
This play tent is great - my son got it when he was 1 and still loves it a year later.  He brings toys in there and "hides" to play.  It is not unsafe, it will tip over at times, but it's so lightweight that it could not hurt him.  I think that it's a great buy for the money and would recommend it</review_text>
My 3 1/2 year old son has older sisters with iPods and always wants to use them to listen to.  We bought this for him for Christmas and he calls it his iPod and he absolutely loves it.  We download new songs and stories from time to time as a reward.  We also bought the speakers for him to listen to stories or songs while going to sleep or just hanging out at home.It's tough and durable and withstands being dropped and rough handling like a 3 year old dips out</review_text>
I got this for my 6 year old son with moderate autism. what a god-send! he uses it every day, for several hours. i bought the speaker accessory so he doesn't have to use the head phones all the time. it is so easy to change the song list. he is able to use it independently, except for pushing the song vs. story button. the icons and ability to customize the icons have made it so he can quickly search for what he wants. i found the drawing screen for the icons challenging at first- but even me with my lack of artistic talent was able to accomplish the task so he knows them. i would give this my highest recommendation- very tough player- dropped who knows how many times- yet keeps going. the best thing i've purchased for him in a very long time. well worth the money.</review_text>
It is an okay seat. My only complaint is that my son has slightly chubby legs and the area on the chair where his legs go and the whole "pummel" thing seem kind of tight and uncomfortable for him. We started him in it at about 4 months. He sits in it for only short periods of time, he gets uncomfortable pretty fast. Otherwise, a decent chair</review_text>
I'll start off by saying that THIS is the company to buy Naruto headbands from. It is high quality fabric that is very comfortable on the skin and the length will fit around anyone's head (trust me, I have a pretty big head). The insignia plate is made out of real metal and is engraved superbly. A velcro padding on the back ensures that the plate doesn't touch your forehead and cause discomfort. In other words, this headband is like it was plucked out of the show itself, and for the price, it is a very nice addition to any Naruto fan's wardrobe</review_text>
I got this for my 3 year old niece. She loves it and requests that it go with her all the time. The box to hold all the pieces is handy, the magnets are easy and there's lots of variations of outfits. Having 2 dolls makes it easy for friends, parents etc to play along and interact. The only cons I see is that the box with all the pieces is a bit heavy, it could use a handle. And the magnets are strong but sometimes the pieces slip a bit. All in all, a great gift and toy!</review_text>
My 3 year old daughter has this dress up set and it is great for little hands that are not coordinated enough yet to dress and undress actual Barbi dolls.  She loves changing their outfits and switching their accessories - and I love that she can do this without any frustration.  Mellissa and Doug toys are made with the quality of older toys - they are well constructed and made to last - and the sturdy box allows for easy clean up and storage.</review_text>
It is a little smaller than I expected...But I guess i shoulda wrote down the measurements and took a tape measure in the room before hand. Other than that, It's perfect. My son's room has an Atlanta Braves theme so the colors are perfect. The main reason I bought this was to use as a toy box. So far, it's worked out great! I don't have or plan to put books on top so the fact that the bookends are small don't bother me. The only thing I have sitting on top is a teddy bear and a piggy bank.</review_text>
We recently purchased this toy storage unit for our 22 month old son and we couldn't be happier. It is sturdy and durable..a hard combination to find these days, looks great but most of all is very functional and user friendly!! It only requires 14 screws to assemble and it looks great. Our son can't wait to get up and play, yelling toy box and jumping out of bed to grab a bin.I will purchase more of these for the different "toy" areas of our home and would certainly give it as a gift</review_text>
I bought these stilts for my 10 year old daughter.  My other children who are 8 and 9 love them and so do all of their friends.  They are affordable and sturdy!!  I recommend them !!!</review_text>
Wingo looks like the real car from the movie, drives great, it was a hit with both my boys ages 3 and 6.  The color on the car is bright and just like the one in the movie, the back of the car is exactly like the one in the movie.  My boys were very excited to see it!  They play and act out the whole cars movie with all their cars</review_text>
I love this toy! I'm 12 years old and I still love to play Barbie's! I would reccomend this toy to any mother who has a little girl or boy that loves to play Barbie's</review_text>
I bought four of these for my husabnd, son in law, daughter and myself for Christmas. I wrapped a bag of marshmallows for each of them and gave them the wrapped guns and marshmallows on Christmas eve. The second they opened the marshmallows they knew what was in the box. They ripped into them and were shooting each other like crazy. They had a blast! I will tell you that the marshmallows do hurt at close range when the gun is pumped way up. My dogs loved it too. They ate all the marshmallows that fell to the floor. Well, not ALL of them..I did find some in the Christmas tree and on the bookshelves. (Yes they played with them in the house.) One trick...to get the marshmallows to shoot really well, we genlty rolled them in our hands from side to side to make the mallow just a bit skinnier. Stale marshmallows work great too</review_text>
Ms. Pac Man was always my game back in the day.  She just seemed less clunky than her male predecessor.I just received this game in the mail today and after a mad scramble for eight (count 'em EIGHT) AA batteries I got down to business.  I admit that I bought this game for Ms. Pac Man, exclusively.  Here's what I found, in a nutshell:Pros:1) Graphics & sound are faithful to the old arcade game with the minor exception of the placement of the score, lives and fruit.  No problem.2) Old skool joystick.  Nice touch.3) Plug 'n play set-up.  No brainer.Cons:1)  I honestly don't mind cords one bit.  The eight batteries can be a bit of a logistical problem as I don't usually have a dozen-or-so batteries lying around at any given time.2)  My main gripe is that the joystick is frustratingly unresponsive and has the habit of moving Ms. Pac in directions I don't want her to go.  I understand, however, that the previous version of this game was worse in this regard and has been slightly improved in this version.  Fair 'nuff.All-in-all a neat little contraption that is every bit as addictive as it was in my youth.</review_text>
I bought this toy for my 3 year old son before his baby brother was to be born.  He absolutely loves this doll!  I babysit during the day and he took care of his baby right along with me while I cared for the baby I keep.  He had regressed and started wetting his pants again when I began babysitting but is now going to the bathroom on his own again after getting this doll and having his own baby to care for!  The yawn as some other reviewers have said does sound a bit weird but it IS only a doll!  If the baby is not attended to properly to make her stop fussing or to put her to sleep then she'll eventually just do it on her own so it's not frustrating for my son, great for younger kids.  My husband did not want our son having a "girl" doll and I can't find any clothes to fit the doll to turn it into a boy so my only wish is that this doll was also made as a boy or at least boy clothes were sold for her.</review_text>
A wonderfully complete set for toddlers to set up a complete dinner just like Mommy & Daddy.  the pieces are easily recognizable and realistic.  The children enjoy sharing the dinner with their "friends"</review_text>
My 5-year-old adores this addition to his moonsand play set. The kit includes enough sand to make cars and other items to "run over" with the included Monster Truck. He had a ball and still plays with it at least once or so a week after a month of me purchasing it. The new inserted play mat for the original blow up moonsand kit makes it that more fun for him to play like he's at the Monster Trucks show!Great Idea! for a new and fun way to make and keep moonsand play sets interesting.Yes, moonsand can get messy, but didn't we all learn creatively through making messes when we were younger? I'll gladly sweep this up when he's done</review_text>
I purchased the 12-Prank Kit for my 83 year old aunt this past Christmas.  On Christmas Morning, as everyone opened the usual boring gifts of knit sweaters and scented candles, my elderly aunt carefully tore open her Prank Kit.  It was an instant hit!  As she laid out her Fake Dog Poop on the floor next to the Christmas tree and blew her new Fart Whistle, everyone started to roll with laughter.  Oddly enough, this inexpensive little gift became the high-point of our family Christmas gift-giving.  Maybe that sounds pathetic, but my Aunt was carried back to younger days when she used to pull pranks with whoopie cushions on her little nephews. Thanks to this great little package, we all laughed so hard it hurt.  What an awesome gift</review_text>
tamagothchis are so much fun they are really col and there a little hard to care for  and its fun watching them change they are a great item and worth there valu</review_text>
I have a videonow player and I luv it!!! There are over 100 discs!</review_text>
Both of my kids got these for Christmas - great idea; not as expensive as a DVD player for the car (especially for those of us who don't want the portable one/plan to get next vehicle with built in) and the picture was really better than I thought it would be.However, I only got my children two discs a piece to start.  Now, NO discs worthwhile can be found anywhere.  The only ones that are ever on the racks/online en masse are the Star Wars 3 pack (none of today's kids really want that), the Tony Hawk Skate Park (obviously they aren't interested there either) and Fear Factor (let's face it, if you let your kids watch FF you need to take the VideoNow player and hit yourself in the head - HARD).And even if I do find a couple on Ebay, the selection is so limited.  I wish I'd just bought a cheap portable DVD player.  Hasbro really missed the boat on this one - it could have been a great thing but they didn't make enough discs of the ones they do produce and need to put more shows out for the kids.  My advice: Don't buy it.  I am very disappointed in the disc selection - this is already at the bottom of the toy box.</review_text>
Webkinz Pets are an excellent choice for a child who wants to use the internet and a parent who values internet safety. The pets are adorable and my children are addicted! Fun for parents too!</review_text>
This umbrella can be used with lots of other playsets, not just the Little Tikes brand. We use ours staked in the ground next to our Step 2 Naturally Playful sandbox/wading pool and we take it along and use it with his folding plastic chair that has an umbrella hole and clip. Great for hot days at the pool, beach or just hanging around in the backyard. It comes with a storage/ carry bag that has a carrying strap for over-the-shoulder hauling around, too. It has a wind vent at the top, but I would still close it at night or take it indoors if you have high winds, since it is a petite size and weighs less than similar full-size versions sold to adults. Nice forest green color and white pole and finial; the fabric is heavy-weight and overall the umbrella seems well-made. A great buy at this price</review_text>
this toy teaches history and stories to improve the imaginations of kids everywhere it and its others are a must have</review_text>
I was unable to find this product until now and it was great!!! Delivered fast and absolutely  no problems!!!!</review_text>
My son is 11 and loved this.  He was very proud when he built it by himself.  It is very detailed and has movable parts so that you can also play with it (gently of course).  This is the type of piece that is great all by itself without getting all the other pieces in the series.  It is also a classic piece in that it doesn't have a cartoon or charter theme</review_text>
Every time I see my twin daughters riding these bikes around I make a promise to write a review of the product. Here I am fulfilling my promise. They were able to pedal the bike within 2 - 3 days of getting them. They are a great size for two year olds plus they fold up so that I can carry both in the back of my small car (89 chevy camaro) and are light enough that I can carry them by the big handle in the back when the girls want to run instead of bike. The only drawback is that they are a little unstable on tight turns.</review_text>
My daughter (15 months) literally started running in place with excitement when she opened this baby doll, which was a gift from my best friend.  I've NEVER seen her react like this to any gift. My daughter has continued to bring this baby doll around with her everywhere--usually she just ditches her toys and plays with the tupperware. The doll has a soft, squishy body that makes her cuddley despite the fact that she has, as my husband is constantly saying, "a hard plastic head."</review_text>
My son needed this gun to go with his Halloween costume.  Needless to say he was thrilled with it.  It has held up under a lot of use, and the noise is not too loud and irritating.</review_text>
My son (5 year old) chose this toy as his reward and was so excited when he received it. He and his brother and dad enjoy countless hours of pretend play as they are all Star Wars fans.  It has a realistic appearance and the sound is not irritating as are many toy guns. Highly recommended</review_text>
This toy Is awesome, I am a starwars fanatic so I'll get anything starwars. But not cheesy like the Darth Vader voice changer. Overall this toy is great</review_text>
The X-23 figure availible on Amazon.com is dressed in purple but there also is a black one - a variant that is alot harder to find [I resorted to eBay for mine].  The build of the figure is great - There's so much articulation, it's insane; and her feet claws actually tuck under her shoes so they can be concealed which is beyond cool.  The articulation, for the most part, is great.  My only qualm with it is it makes her arms look funny but I can deal with that.  She's barely 6 inches tall, I don't expect her to be perfect.  However, the reason I'm giving her three stars is because I feel the purple outfitted one is far inferior to the black outfitted X.  I recieved my black clad X-23 first and expected the same figure but in a purple for my other one but I was wrong.  The black X-23 has very dark brown hair that lays straight and lank while the purple X-23's hair is jet black and windblown which makes her head almost impossible to move around.  Also, the thing that bothers me the most is that X's eyes are green on the black suited version but on the purple suited version, they're orange.  I am a big X-23 fan and I understand that when she's "triggered", her eyes go crazy reddish orange, but that's not something I really want to see sitting on top of my computer monitor.  It's kind of creepy!  And on a sidenote, when did X-23 wear purple?  In her comics she was either in black, dressed as a civilain or in the old Wolverine costume [which you can see in the comic that comes with X-23].  I would've prefered a variant wearing the Wolverine costume while the black X-23 was mass produced.  So, personally, I would recommend hunting down the variant of X-23 for your collection.  She looks nicer and, I think, is more true to the character</review_text>
I bought this toy for my daughter almost a year ago now. She still plays with it all the time. It is by far her fav toy. The only problem is that it's a bit too load and no way to turn it down, or off. Well, besides that it is a perfect toy for small kids. My daughter is almost 4 and still is not tired of it</review_text>
The is one of the fastest and easiest to learn games I have ever played.  The first time we played was on Christmas Day.  We had 10 players that ranged from 16 years to 77 years and everyone loved it.  We played for over 3 hours and decided we had to stop to eat.  It is also a great way to break the ice.  I would recommend this game to anyone whether you are a big game player or a beginner, this game can't be beat</review_text>
Okay, we all know about the Disney CARS craze and trying to hunt down all the new die-cast characters Mattel puts out. These 1:24 scale models are very, very nice and the size is perfect for young boys, girls or collectors.  The only downside is that they only made Mater and McQueen. Who wouldn't love to see Chick Hicks or The King in 1:24 scale?! Come on Mattel! Get with it!!  ;</review_text>
My son has really enjoyed this, however, after marks are made with the "washable" markers, it actually takes about 3 washings to get the marks out but they do come out eventually</review_text>
